PREPARING  CONSUMERS  FOR  THE  DIGITAL 

TELEVISION  TRANSITION 

S.  HRG.  110–1168 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JULY  26,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

75–739 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

...............................................................................
Hearing held on July 26, 2007 
Statement of Senator Cantwell 
..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator McCaskill  .............................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Snowe  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Sununu  ................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Barnett, Nelda, Member, Board of Directors, AARP  ............................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Kneuer,  Hon.  John  M.R.,  Kneuer,  Assistant  Secretary  for  Communications 
and  Information,  National  Telecommunications  and  Information  Adminis-
tration, U.S. Department of Commerce  ..............................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Nogales, Alex, President and CEO, National Hispanic Media Coalition  ............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Seidel,  Catherine  W.,  Chief,  Consumer  and  Governmental  Affairs  Bureau, 
Federal Communications Commission  ...............................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Zirkin,  Nancy  M.,  Vice  President,  Director  of  Public  Policy,  Leadership  Con-
ference on Civil Rights (LCCR)  ...........................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

ment 

from Gary Shapiro, President and CEO, Consumer Electronics Association 

Lautenberg,  Hon.  Frank  R.,  U.S.  Senator  from  New  Jersey,  prepared  state-
......................................................................................................................
Letter,  dated  July  26,  2007  to  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye  and  Hon.  Ted  Stevens, 
.
Letter,  dated  August  30,  2007  to  Hon.  Claire  McCaskill  from  John  M.R. 
Kneuer, Assistant Secretary for Communications and Information, National 
Telecommunications  and  Information  Administration,  U.S.  Department  of 
.............................................................................................................
Commerce 
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lautenberg  to: 
Hon. John M.R. Kneuer  ...................................................................................
Catherine W. Seidel  ..........................................................................................

Page 
1 
28 
1 
21 
23 
31 
26 
15 
7 
18 
33 

37 
38 

2 
4 
41 
43 

7 
11 

45 
46 

51 

55 

51 

56 
57 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

PREPARING  CONSUMERS  FOR  THE  DIGITAL 

TELEVISION  TRANSITION 

THURSDAY,  JULY  26,  2007 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10  a.m.  in  room  SR– 
253, Russell Senate Office Building, Hon. Daniel K. Inouye, Chair-
man of the Committee, presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The CHAIRMAN. Between 15 and 21 million households rely exclu-
sively on over-the-air television. Many more have second and third 
over-the-air sets in their homes. 

In  February  2009,  these  Americans  could  see  their  TVs  go  dark, 
disconnecting  them  from  the  news,  public  safety  announcements 
and  their  community,  unless  they  get  a  converter  box  and  attach 
it to their television. Yet, far too few of these consumers know that 
the  transition  from  current  analog  TV  technology  to  digital  TV  is 
underway. 

An article in the—last month’s National Journal stated that only 
10  percent  of  our  citizens  know  that  DTV  transition  is  slated  for 
2009.  Many  stakeholders  in  industry,  in  government,  and  in  our 
communities  are  engaged  in  well-intended  efforts  to  publicize  and 
promote  the  upcoming  transition.  To  date,  however,  their  efforts 
have  yielded  too  few  results.  We  need  to  get  the  digital  transition 
right. 

Consumers  stand  to  benefit  mightily  from  the  DTV  transition. 
They can expect sharper pictures, served up with CD-quality sound 
that  provides  a  dramatically  improved  viewing  experience.  DTV 
also  makes  possible  multicasting.  This  could  mean  whole  new 
channels  devoted  to  local  news,  weather,  children’s  fare,  and  non- 
English-language  programming.  Along  with  these  improvements, 
public safety will receive unbroken slices of our airwaves to enable 
interoperable communications and improve information-sharing. 

Managing the transition is, by no means, easy. We are now near-
ly 18 months away. We have seen working groups, conferences, tip 
sheets, and a converter box coupon plan. What we do not have yet 
is  a  public  that  is  aware  that  digital  TV  and—transition  is  taking 
place. 

The time to act is now, before the digital transition devolves into 
a digital disaster. We must work together to ensure that no citizen 
is left behind in the transition to digital television. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

2 

Today, we have a panel of very knowledgeable and distinguished 
men and women. Our first panel is the Assistant Secretary of Com-
merce,  for  Communications  and  Information  of  the  National  Tele-
communications  Information  Administration  of  the  Department  of 
Commerce,  the  Honorable  John  Kneuer;  and  the  Chief  of  the  Con-
sumer  and  Governmental  Affairs  Bureau  of  the  Federal  Commu-
nications Commission, Ms. Cathy Seidel. 

Secretary Kneuer, welcome, sir. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN M.R. KNEUER, ASSISTANT 

SECRETARY FOR COMMUNICATIONS AND INFORMATION 
NATIONAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS AND INFORMATION 

ADMINISTRATION, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 

Mr.  KNEUER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thanks  for  having  me, 

and for this opportunity to testify before you. 

As  you  know,  NTIA’s  traditional  responsibilities  have  expanded 
considerably  with  the  enactment  of  the  Deficit  Reduction  Act  of 
2005.  Specifically,  the  Act  charged  NTIA  to  administer  a  number 
of  new  one-time  programs  to  be  funded  from  the  anticipated  spec-
trum auction proceeds associated with the transition to digital tele-
vision. These programs include our recently announced Public Safe-
ty  Interoperable  Communications  Program,  as  well  as  two  impor-
tant  initiatives  that  are  directly  germane  to  the  digital  TV  transi-
tion. 

First,  Congress  directed  NTIA  to  implement  a  Digital-to-Analog 
Converter  Box  Program,  provide  financial  assistance  to  those  con-
sumers  that  wish  to  continue  to  receive  broadcast  programming 
over-the-air, using existing analog-only televisions. 

Second,  to  ensure  that  viewers  in  primarily  rural  and  remote 
areas  who  rely  on  LPTV  or  television  translator  stations  are  able 
to  continue  to  receive  these  services,  Congress  authorized  NTIA  to 
provide funding to assist licensees of those stations with the transi-
tion. 

Under  the  Digital-to-Analog  Converter  Box  Program,  eligible 
U.S.  households  may  obtain  up  to  two  coupons  of  $40  each  to  be 
applied  toward  the  purchase  of  a  digital-to-analog  converter  box. 
The Act authorizes NTIA to use up to $990 million to carry out this 
program,  including  up  to  $100  million  for  program  administration, 
$5 million of which will be used for consumer education. It author-
izes  an  additional  $510  million  in  contingent  funding,  to  be  avail-
able upon 60 days notice to the Congress. 

To  meet  the  mandated  deadlines  to  start  and  complete  this  cou-
pon program, we published a request for proposals in March to pro-
cure  end-to-end  services  to  implement  and  administer  the  coupon 
program,  including  the  consumer  education  and  communications 
component.  I’m  happy  to  report,  this  procurement  process  is  well 
underway.  We  expect  to  make  an  award  by  the  middle  of  this 
month. 

To  make  the  most  effective  use  of  the  $5  million  available  for 
consumer  education,  NTIA  has  focused  its  consumer  education  re-
sources  on  population  groups  most  likely  to  lose  television  service 
as  a  result  of  the  transition.  We’ll  obtain  optimum  leverage  from 
those  dollars  by  maximizing  our  engagement  with  the  diverse 
range  of  stakeholders  through  partnerships.  Indeed,  we  received 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

3 

support from many partners in the private sector who are working 
to help inform consumers of the digital transition. 

Over  120  business,  trade,  and  industry  groups,  as  well  as  grass-
roots  and  membership  organizations  that  share  an  interest  in  the 
transition,  came  together  earlier  this  year  to  charter  the  Digital 
Television  Transition  Coalition.  NTIA  has  been  working  with  the 
coalition  since  its  inception.  To  reach  those  most  likely  to  be  af-
fected  by  the  digital  transition,  NTIA  has  identified  five  target 
groups for its consumer education efforts: seniors, the economically 
disadvantaged, rural residents, people with disabilities, and minori-
ties. 

With  respect  to  seniors,  NTIA  is  working  closely  with  the  AARP 
to  ensure  that  the  coupon  program  is  highlighted  in  their  publica-
tions  and  online  newsletters.  We’re  also  reaching  out  to  establish 
partnerships with the Administration on Aging, the National Coun-
cil  on  Aging,  SeniorNet,  and  other  organizations,  to  ensure  that 
seniors are not caught by surprise by the digital transition. 

We’re  expanding  our  outreach  efforts  into  minority  and  rural 
communities.  We’ll  work  with  the  U.S.  Hispanic  Chamber  of  Com-
merce,  the  U.S.  Black  Chamber  of  Commerce.  NTIA  is  also 
partnering  with  the  Southeast  Asian  Resource  Action  Center  to 
translate  and  distribute  coupon  program  information  in  Chinese, 
Korean,  Vietnamese,  and  Filipino  communities.  We’re  pursuing 
partnerships  with  the  Koahnic  Broadcast  Corporation  for  the  dis-
semination  of  coupon  information  to  Alaskan  native  villages,  as 
well as Native Voice One to reach tribal reservations through radio 
communications. 

We’ve  printed  our  brochures  in  both  English  and  Spanish  to  ex-
plain the digital transition and the options available to households, 
depending on the type of television service. We’ve distributed copies 
of those brochures to every member of the House and Senate, com-
munity organizations, constituency groups, industry stakeholders. 

We’ve  established  a  toll-free  number,  1–888–DTV–2009.  This  is 
currently  in  English,  Spanish,  and  with  TTY  capability  for  people 
who  are  hearing-impaired.  In  addition  to  the  toll-free  number, 
we’re  working  with  the  American  Association  of  People  with  Dis-
abilities,  we  maintain  our  website,  Consumer  Information  Acces-
sible  Form,  to  ensure  disabled  Americans  are  made  aware  of  the 
transition. 

In  addition  to  the  private  sector  partnerships  I’ve  discussed,  we 
are  also  leveraging  our  relationships  with  other  governmental 
agencies to extend the reach of our message. In particular, we will 
work  with  agencies  that  target  economically  disadvantaged  Ameri-
cans. We’re currently in discussions with the IRS, the U.S. Depart-
ment of Agriculture Food Stamp Program, Social Security Adminis-
tration, Department of Veterans Affairs, GSA, and others. 

As I mentioned at the outset, Title III also directed NTIA to im-
plement  and  administer  programs  related  to  the  digital  television 
transition  with  regard  to  eligible  low-power  television  and  tele-
vision  translator  stations,  to  obtain  equipment  to  enable  them  to 
convert  the  incoming  digital  signals  into  broadcast  format,  and  to 
ultimately  convert  to  the  digital  signals.  We’ve  been  working  ag-
gressively to effectuate the statute’s requirements to begin the pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

4 

gram  authorized  under  the  statute,  and  recently  posted  informa-
tion about these programs on our website. 

Thank you, again, for the opportunity to testify, and I’ll certainly 

look forward to your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Kneuer follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON.  JOHN M.R.  KNEUER,  ASSISTANT SECRETARY FOR 
COMMUNICATIONS AND INFORMATION,  NATIONAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS AND 
INFORMATION ADMINISTRATION, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 
Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to 
testify before you today. As you know, NTIA is responsible for the development and 
implementation  of  United  States  national  policies  related  to  domestic  and  inter-
national telecommunications and for the effective use of Federal radio spectrum and 
state-of-art  telecommunications  research,  engineering,  and  planning.  NTIA  also  ad-
ministers the provision of grants in support of the equipment needs of public broad-
casting stations. 

NTIA’s  responsibilities  have  expanded  considerably  with  the  enactment  of  the 
Deficit  Reduction  Act  of  2005.  Specifically,  the  Act  charged  NTIA  to  administer  a 
number  of  new  one-time  programs  to  be  funded  from  anticipated  spectrum  auction 
proceeds  associated  with  the  transition  to  digital  television  broadcasts  through  the 
Digital  Television  Transition  and  Public  Safety  Fund.  These  programs  include  our 
recently  announced  Public  Safety  Interoperable  Communications  (PSIC)  Grant  Pro-
gram  and  two  other  important  initiatives  that  are  directly  germane  to  the  digital 
television  transition  that  is  the  subject  of  today’s  hearing:  (1)  the  Digital-to-Analog 
Converter  Box  Coupon  Program,  and  (2)  the  Low-Power  Television  (LPTV)  and 
translator  digital  conversion  and  upgrade  programs.  My  testimony  today  will  focus 
chiefly  on  our  activities  with  respect  to  the  Converter  Box  Coupon  Program,  which 
will most immediately help to prepare consumers for the transition. However, before 
closing,  I  would  also  like  briefly  to  discuss  our  work  in  the  LPTV  and  translator 
areas. 
NTIA’s Role in the Digital-to-Analog Transition 

Title  III  of  the  Deficit  Reduction  Act  of  2005  (the  Act)  directed  the  Federal  Com-
munications  Commission  (FCC)  to  require  full-power  television  stations  to  cease 
analog broadcasting on February 17, 2009. To avoid any unnecessary service disrup-
tions  for  American  television  viewers  during  the  conversion  from  analog  to  digital 
television  broadcasting,  the  Act  established,  and  directed  NTIA  to  administer,  two 
sets of programs. As I will explain, these programs are intended to bridge the gaps 
between the analog and digital platforms that will continue to exist for some period 
of time. 

First,  Congress  directed  NTIA  to  implement  a  Digital-to-Analog  Converter  Box 
Coupon  Program  to  provide  financial  assistance  to  those  consumers  that  wish  to 
continue receiving broadcast programming over-the-air using analog-only televisions 
not  connected  to  cable  or  satellite  service.  Second,  to  ensure  that  viewers  in  pri-
marily  rural  and  remote  areas  who  rely  on  LPTV  or  television  translator  stations 
are able to continue to receive these services, Congress authorized NTIA to provide 
funding to assist licensees of these stations with obtaining equipment to (A) enable 
them to convert the incoming digital signal of their corresponding full-power station 
to analog format for rebroadcast; and (B) to ultimately convert the LPTV and trans-
lator facilities themselves to broadcast in digital format. 
The Digital-to-Analog Converter Box Coupon Program 

Under  the  Digital-to-Analog  Converter  Box  Coupon  Program,  eligible  U.S.  house-
holds  may  obtain  up  to  two  coupons  of  $40  each  to  be  applied  toward  the  purchase 
of  digital-to-analog  converter  boxes  that  will  convert  digital  signals  for  display  on 
analog  television  sets.  The  Act  authorizes  NTIA  to  use  up  to  $990  million  to  carry 
out  the  program,  including  up  to  $100  million  for  program  administration,  $5  mil-
lion of this for consumer education. It also authorizes an additional $510 million in 
contingent funding to be available upon 60 days advance notice to Congress. 
Activities to Date 

NTIA  has  made  substantial  progress  in  fulfilling  its  requirements  under  the  law 
to ensure that coupons for converter boxes will be available to U.S. households upon 
request beginning January 1, 2008. Because the auction receipts that fund this pro-
gram  are  not  anticipated  to  be  available  until  after  this  date,  NTIA  entered  into  a 
Borrowing  Agreement  in  May  2006  with  the  Department  of  Treasury  to  borrow 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

5 

funds  necessary  to  implement  the  Coupon  Program.  NTIA  then  initiated  a  rule-
making seeking comments from interested parties on the most efficient and effective 
way  to  administer  the  program.  In  March  of  this  year,  NTIA  published  regulations 
that  set  forth  the  framework  for  the  Coupon  Program  and  provide  guidance  to  con-
sumers, converter box manufacturers, and retailers. The regulations outline require-
ments related to household eligibility, converter box technical specifications, and re-
tailer certification. Shortly after releasing the rules, NTIA held its first public meet-
ing to discuss various aspects of the Coupon Program. 

To  meet  the  mandated  deadlines  to  start  and  complete  the  Coupon  Program, 
NTIA published a Request for Proposals (RFP) in March of this year to procure end- 
to-end services to implement and administer the Coupon Program. The procurement 
covers  three  broad,  functional  areas:  (1)  consumer  education  and  communications; 
(2)  systems  processing  (e.g.,  determining  consumer  eligibility,  distributing  and  acti-
vating coupons, certifying retailers, and providing training materials); and (3) finan-
cial  processing  (e.g.,  administering  the  processes  to  authorize  coupons  for  redemp-
tion  and  ensure  payment  to  retailers,  and  performing  independent  auditing).  I  am 
pleased to report that this procurement process is well underway, and we expect to 
make an award by mid-August. 

NTIA  also  continues  to  collaborate  with  the  FCC  to  ensure  that  the  converter 
boxes offered to consumers under this program meet our technical specifications. In 
that regard, NTIA and the FCC entered into a Memorandum of Understanding pur-
suant to which the Commission will provide verification and testing services for the 
converter boxes. Moreover, in May of this year, NTIA issued a Notice that provides 
guidance  to  converter  box  manufacturers  regarding  the  submission  of  test  results 
and sample equipment. To accommodate the numerous inquiries that the agency re-
ceives daily from consumers, manufacturers and retailers, NTIA maintains and con-
tinuously updates a ‘‘Frequently Asked Questions’’ section on our website. 
Consumer Education Initiatives 

As the title of this hearing reflects, it is essential that consumers be prepared for 
the digital television transition. The success of the transition will be judged by how 
smoothly  and  efficiently  it  occurs,  and  this  will  depend  to  a  critical  extent  on  effec-
tive  outreach  to  consumers.  Consumers  will  need  to  know  the  options  available  to 
them  to  participate  in  the  transition.  For  example,  consumers  who  receive  cable, 
satellite  or  other  pay-television  services  to  view  television  will  not  need  converter 
boxes. Likewise, consumers that have televisions equipped with digital receivers will 
not  need  a  converter  box.  Neither  of  these  groups  will  need  to  apply  for  a  coupon 
as part of NTIA’s program. Likewise, consumers may choose to effect the transition 
on their own, by subscribing to cable or satellite, buying a digital television, or buy-
ing a converter box with additional functionality, such as a DVD. 

As  I  mentioned  earlier,  the  Act  allotted  NTIA  $5  million  for  consumer  education. 
To  make  most  effective  use  of  these  funds,  NTIA  will  focus  its  consumer  education 
resources  on  population  groups  most  likely  to  lose  all  television  service  as  a  result 
of  the  transition,  and  we  will  obtain  optimum  leverage  from  those  dollars  by  maxi-
mizing  the  engagement  of  a  diverse  range  of  stakeholders  through  partnerships.  In 
this  regard,  I  would  like  to  acknowledge  the  support  we  have  received  from  our 
many partners in the private-sector who have stepped up to the plate to help inform 
consumers of the digital transition. 

Over 120 business, trade and industry groups, as well as grass roots and member-
ship organizations that share an interest in a smooth transition, came together ear-
lier  this  year  to  charter  the  Digital  Television  Transition  Coalition  to  ensure  that 
no  consumer  is  left  without  broadcast  television  due  to  a  lack  of  information  about 
the transition. The Coalition will use marketing and public education strategies in-
cluding paid and earned media placements to distribute consistent, unified, and ac-
curate  information  about  the  transition.  NTIA  will  work  with  the  Coalition  to  co-
ordinate our messages. In particular, we encourage the industry to get the message 
out  about  the  benefits  of  the  digital  transition.  For  example,  consumers  should  be 
made  aware  that  digital  transmission  is  a  more  efficient  technology  that  will  allow 
broadcasters  to  provide  a  better  viewing  experience  and  give  consumers  more 
choices while using less radio spectrum. 

We  also  understand  that  consumer  education  must  be  made  at  an  optimal  time 
to  afford  consumers  sufficient  time  to  prepare  for  the  transition.  To  reach  those 
most  likely  to  be  affected  by  the  digital  transition,  NTIA  has  identified  five  target 
groups for its consumer education efforts: (1) seniors: (2) the economically disadvan-
taged; (3) rural residents; (4) people with disabilities; and (5) minorities. 

With  respect  to  seniors,  NTIA  is  working  closely  with  the  AARP  to  ensure  that 
the  Coupon  Program  is  highlighted  in  their  publications  and  online  newsletters. 
AARP The Magazine reaches 22.5 million of the organization’s members and AARP 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

6 

Segunda Jeventud reaches another 400,000 members. NTIA is also working with the 
American  Library  Association  to  distribute  posters  and  coupon  applications  to  par-
ticipating  libraries,  and  to  train  librarians  to  help  seniors  fill  out  coupon  applica-
tions. NTIA has also reached out to establish partnerships with the Administration 
on Aging, the National Council on Aging, SeniorNet, and other organizations to en-
sure  that  seniors  are  not  caught  by  surprise  by  the  digital  transition.  During  the 
recent  National  Cable  and  Telecommunications  Association  convention,  I  partici-
pated  on  a  panel  hosted  by  Retirement  Living  TV,  available  via  cable  to  24  million 
households, for the purpose of raising awareness among seniors of the upcoming dig-
ital transition. 

NTIA  is  also  expanding  its  outreach  efforts  into  minority  and  rural  communities. 
We  will  work  with  the  U.S.  Hispanic  Chamber  of  Commerce  and  the  U.S.  Black 
Chamber  of  Commerce  to  disseminate  coupon  application  information  nationwide 
through  retailers  in  predominantly  Hispanic  and  African-American  neighborhoods. 
NTIA  is  also  partnering  with  Southeast  Asia  Resource  Action  Center  to  translate 
and distribute coupon program information in Chinese, Korean, Vietnamese and Fil-
ipino communities. We are pursuing partnership opportunities with Koahnic Broad-
cast Corporation for dissemination of coupon information to Alaskan Native villages 
as  well  as  Native  Voice  One  to  reach  tribal  reservations  through  radio  communica-
tions. In addition, NTIA will collaborate with the Appalachian Regional Commission 
to  distribute  information  packets  about  the  transition  to  70  councils  of  government 
and  local  development  districts  representing  23  million  people  in  410  counties  (42 
percent rural). 

Moreover,  we  have  printed  brochures  in  both  English  and  Spanish  to  explain  the 
digital  transition  and  the  options  available  to  households  depending  on  the  type  of 
television service, and we have distributed copies of these brochures to every mem-
ber of the House and Senate, community organizations, constituency groups, and in-
dustry stakeholders. We have also established a toll free number, 1–888–DTV–2009, 
to  assist  consumers  who  do  not  have  Internet  access,  are  hearing  impaired,  or  who 
simply prefer to receive information about the Coupon Program over the telephone. 
In addition to this toll-free number, NTIA is working with the American Association 
of  People  with  Disabilities  (AAPD),  and  we  maintain  our  website  and  consumer  in-
formation  in  accessible  form  to  ensure  disabled  Americans  are  made  aware  of  the 
transition. 

The NTIA staff will also continue to participate in meetings and conferences over 
the next 2 years to spread the word about the transition as well as the Coupon Pro-
gram  through  events  such  as  the  upcoming  White  House  Faith-Based  and  Commu-
nity  Initiatives  Conference  in  August  and  the  AARP  convention  in  September.  We 
will be hosting a public meeting on September 25, 2007, to discuss progress in edu-
cating  the  public  about  the  Coupon  Program.  This  public  meeting  will  focus  on  our 
partnerships  in  the  digital  transition  and  will  feature  two  CEO-level  panels  from 
the impacted industries. The public meeting will also include an expo in the Depart-
ment  of  Commerce  lobby  which  will  include  displays  form  over  a  dozen  companies 
and  organizations  featuring  products  and  services  to  enable  consumers  to  make  a 
smooth  digital  transition.  We  invite  you  to  attend  that  meeting  and  welcome  any 
suggestions or concerns you have about the Coupon Program. 
Government Partnerships 

In  addition  to  the  private  sector  partnerships  discussed  above,  NTIA  will  also  le-
verage  our  relationships  with  other  governmental  agencies  to  extend  the  reach  of 
our message. In particular, we will work with agencies that target economically dis-
advantaged  Americans.  We  are  currently  in  discussions  with  the  Internal  Revenue 
Service,  the  U.S.  Department  of  Agriculture  Food  Stamp  Program;  the  Social  Secu-
rity Administration; the Department of Veterans Affairs; the White House Office of 
Faith-Based  and  Community  Initiatives;  the  General  Services  Administration;  and 
the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services’  Administration  for  Children  & 
Families,  Administration  on  Aging,  and  Centers  for  Medicare  &  Medicaid  Services. 
Separately,  as  I  noted  above,  we  are  also  working  in  cooperation  with  the  FCC 
to  implement  significant  measures  to  increase  awareness  among  the  general  public 
about  the  DTV  transition  and  the  Coupon  Program.  Both  the  www.DTV.gov 
webpage  and  NTIA’s  website,  www.ntia.doc.gov/otiahome/dtv/index.html,  provide 
significant information about all aspects of the transition. I encourage the Members 
of this Committee, and all of Congress, to help us in this important effort by linking 
your own websites to these consumer education materials. 
The Low-Power Television and Translator Upgrade Program 

As  I  mentioned  at  the  outset,  Title  III  of  the  Deficit  Reduction  Act  of  2005  also 
directed  NTIA  to  implement  and  administer  other  programs  related  to  the  digital 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

7 

television  transition.  Specifically,  it  mandates  that  we  provide  funding  to  assist  li-
censees of eligible Low-Power Television and television translator stations to obtain 
equipment  to  enable  them  to  convert  the  incoming  digital  signal  of  their  cor-
responding  full-power  station  to  analog  format  for  rebroadcast;  and  to  ultimately 
convert the LPTV and translator facilities themselves to broadcast in digital format. 
We have been working aggressively to effectuate the statute’s requirements to begin 
the  program  authorized  under  Section  3008  of  the  Act  in  Fiscal  Year  2008  and  re-
cently  posted  information  about  these  programs  on  our  website  (www.ntia.doc.gov/ 
otiahome/dtv/lptv.html). 

With respect to the LPTV and translator upgrade program under Section 3009 of 
the  Act,  however,  NTIA  has  discovered  an  inconsistency  in  the  statute  that  we  be-
lieve must be corrected in order to enable us to implement Congress’ intent. Specifi-
cally,  as  presently  drafted,  Section  3009  requires  the  Assistant  Secretary  to  ‘‘make 
payments  . . .  during  Fiscal  Year  2009  from  the  Digital  Television  Transition  and 
Public Safety Fund . . . to implement and administer [the] program’’; however, the 
same  provision  later  states  that  ‘‘[s]uch  reimbursements  shall  be  issued  to  eligible 
stations  no  earlier  than  October  1,  2010’’  (i.e.,  the  beginning  of  Fiscal  Year  2011). 
These  conflicting  payment  obligations  cannot  be  resolved  without  a  technical  cor-
rection  to  the  dates  contained  in  Section  3009  of  the  Act.  The  Department  of  Com-
merce  has  raised  this  issue  with  appropriate  Congressional  authorizers  and  appro-
priators to suggest a legislative remedy. 

In conclusion, I want to thank the Committee for the opportunity to testify before 

you today. I will be happy to answer your questions. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Mr. Secretary. 
Ms.  Seidel,  before  I  call  upon  you,  I’ll  call  upon  the  Vice  Chair-

man for his opening remarks. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. I’m 
sorry to be late, but I would like to put my statement in the record, 
as though read, to begin with. 

The CHAIRMAN. Without objection, so ordered. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  holding  this  important  hearing.  One  of  the  most 
important  steps  this  Committee  took  last  year,  on  a  bipartisan  basis,  was  to  set  a 
hard  date  for  the  digital  television  transition.  This  transition  will  reap  important 
benefits for all Americans, but especially with respect to public safety because they 
will  receive  much  needed  spectrum.  Additionally,  the  auction  will  fund  vital  pro-
grams  like  the  $1  billion  for  interoperability  grants,  $1.5  billion  for  the  convertor 
box  program,  more  than  $7.3  billion  for  deficit  reduction  and  $43.5  million  for  E– 
911. 

As such, Congress cannot afford to let the transition delay or fail. I am concerned 
that  some  of  the  proposals  currently  coming  out  of  the  FCC  regarding  the  auction 
may threaten the overall value and affect the American taxpayer by potentially cost-
ing them billions of dollars. 

With respect to the TV side of the transition, I am pleased by the progress made 
to  date.  We  all  know  that  some  elements  will  require  special  attention.  I  look  for-
ward to hearing from our witnesses as to how the transition will address rural areas 
of  the  country,  like  Alaska.  We  have  our  fair  share  of  residents  in  Alaska  who  rely 
solely  on  broadcast  TV  for  their  news  and  entertainment.  I  am  also  concerned  that 
no  demographic  is  overlooked  as  the  transition  moves  forward.  Thank  you,  Mr. 
Chairman. 

The CHAIRMAN. And now, Ms. Seidel? 

STATEMENT OF CATHERINE W. SEIDEL, CHIEF, 

CONSUMER AND GOVERNMENTAL AFFAIRS BUREAU, 

FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION 

Ms.  SEIDEL.  Good  morning,  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman 
Stevens, and members of the Committee. Thank you for the oppor-
tunity  to  speak  about  the  ongoing  efforts  of  the  Federal  Commu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

nications Commission to facilitate and promote consumer education 
and awareness about the upcoming digital television transition. 

8 

The Commission is working, consistent with its statutory author-
ity  and  budgetary  capacity,  to  ensure  that  no  American  is  left  be-
hind in this important part of the digital revolution. For some time 
now,  we  have  been  working,  both  on  our  own  and  in  cooperation 
with industry, other government agencies, and consumer groups, to 
advance the transition and promote consumer awareness. 

Our  efforts  to  date  have  been  threefold.  First,  we  have  been 
working to get the right rules in place to facilitate a smooth transi-
tion.  Second,  we  have  been  actively  enforcing  our  rules  to  protect 
consumers.  And,  third,  we  have  been  promoting  awareness  of  the 
transition  through  our  consumer  education  and  outreach  efforts. 
Through  all  of  our  activities,  the  Commission  has  been  dedicated 
to  minimizing  the  negative  impact  of  the  digital  transition  on  con-
sumers, while maximizing the benefits to them. 

The  Commission  has  initiated  several  rulemaking  proceedings 
designed  to  facilitate  the  upcoming  transition.  In  one  recent  pro-
ceeding, the Commission proposed to ensure that cable subscribers 
do not lose access to broadcast signals because of the digital transi-
tion.  About  50  percent  of  cable  subscribers  today,  at  least  32  mil-
lion people, subscribe to analog, not digital, cable. These consumers 
are at risk of losing their ability to watch broadcast television after 
the digital transition, unless the Commission acts. According to the 
1992  Cable  Act,  cable  operators  must  ensure  that  all  local  broad-
cast  stations  carried  pursuant  to  the  Act  are  viewable  by  all  cable 
subscribers. The Commission is currently considering a rulemaking 
that  would  require  cable  operators  to  ensure  their  analog  cus-
tomers  don’t  lose  their  broadcast  signals.  Cable  operators  can  ei-
ther  continue  to  carry  signals  in  analog  format  to  the  millions  of 
analog  cable  subscribers,  or,  alternatively,  cable  operators  who 
have chosen to go all-digital can provide their subscribers with the 
necessary equipment to view broadcast and other channels. 

One  of  the  most  important  actions  we  have  taken  to  facilitate  a 
smooth transition is to ensure that electronics retailers fully inform 
consumers  at  the  point  of  sale  about  the  DTV  transition  date  and 
the equipment necessary to continue to be able to receive over-the- 
air  television  signals.  Consumers  have  certain  expectations,  and 
one  of  which  is  that  the  television  that  they  purchase  today  will 
also  work  2  years  from  now.  As  of  March  1st,  all  television  receiv-
ers  shipped  in  interstate  commerce  or  imported  into  the  United 
States must have an integrated digital tuner. 

Despite  this  prohibition  on  shipment,  retailers  may  continue  to 
sell  analog-only  devices  from  their  existing  inventory.  In  April  of 
this  year,  the  Commission  released  an  order  requiring  retailers  to 
disclose  to  consumers  that  a  television  with  only  an  analog  tuner 
will  not  receive  over-the-air  broadcast  signals  after  February  17, 
2009. Such notice should ensure that consumers are making a fully 
informed  decision  about  the  television  that  they  seek  to  purchase 
before  bringing  it  home.  It  will  also  help  educate  consumers  about 
the upcoming digital transition. 

Just  last  week,  the  Commission  adopted  a  Notice  of  Proposed 
Rulemaking  on  several  DTV  education  initiatives.  This  NPRM 
seeks comment on proposals that would require broadcasters, mul-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

9 

tichannel  video  programming  distributors,  retailers,  and  manufac-
turers to take certain actions to publicize the digital transition. The 
Chairman  intends  for  the  Commission  to  complete  this  proceeding 
expeditiously. 

In addition to our policymaking efforts, we have also been vigor-
ously  enforcing  our  digital  transition-related  rules.  As  I  described 
earlier,  in  April  the  Commission  adopted  labeling  requirements  to 
ensure that consumers are protected from the unknowing purchase 
of  television  equipment  without  integrated  digital  tuners.  As  of 
July  24,  2007,  Commission  staff  had  inspected  about  1,089  retail 
stores around the country, as well as retailers’ websites, to monitor 
compliance with the labeling rules. As a result of these inspections, 
the Commission issued over 262 citations notifying retailers of vio-
lations.  As  an  outgrowth  of  these  investigations,  the  Chairman  re-
cently  presented  his  colleagues  with  Notices  of  Apparent  Liability 
against  seven  large  retailers  for  apparently  violating  the  Commis-
sion’s  television  labeling  requirements.  These  fines,  in  aggregate, 
total over $3 million. 

The Commission has actively pursued entities violating the DTV 
tuner requirement by acting on complaints and staff review of U.S. 
Customs data. On May 30, 2007, the Commission issued Notices of 
Apparent Liability against two companies, Syntax-Brillian Corpora-
tion and Regent USA, Incorporated. 

Swift  enforcement  of  all  of  our  DTV-related  rules  is  critical  to 
protecting  consumers  from  purchasing  television  sets  that  may  be 
rendered  useless  in  18  months.  Enforcement  activities  in  this  area 
will continue to be a priority for the Commission. 

In addition to our policymaking and enforcement efforts, we have 
devoted resources to promoting consumer awareness of the upcom-
ing  transition  through  education  and  outreach.  Specifically,  the 
Commission  has  prepared  and  disseminated  numerous  consumer 
publications  to  alert  and  inform  consumers  about  the  transition. 
For  example,  we  have  issued  a  consumer  advisory  on  what  con-
sumers  should  know  about  buying  TVs  as  the  analog  cutoff  date 
approaches.  We  have  also  issued  a  consumer  advisory  on  closed 
captioning  for  digital  television,  which  will  help  inform  and  advise 
people  who  are  deaf  and  hard  of  hearing.  And  we  recently  revised 
one  of  our  DTV  fact  sheets,  ‘‘DTV  is  Coming,  (And  Sooner  Than 
You  Think),’’  to  add  a  section  focused  on  helping  consumers  deter-
mine whether their current TV set contains a digital tuner. 

Moreover,  we  are  reaching  out  to  consumers  through  many  dif-
ferent  venues,  including  forming  partnerships  with  government 
and  other  organizations.  For  example,  we  are  working  together 
with  government  agencies,  including  the  NTIA  and  the  United 
States  Administration  on  Aging  to  enhance  the  Commission’s  con-
sumer  education  and  outreach  efforts.  In  addition,  we  are  working 
with  the  Digital  Television  Transition  Coalition,  of  which  we  are 
now  a  member,  to  coordinate  consumer  education  and  outreach  ef-
forts. 

We have also partnered with several organizations, including the 
Consumer  Electronics  Retailers  Council,  the  NACAA—and  the 
NACAA—to help us disseminate DTV education information. In ad-
dition,  we  are  continually  developing  working  relationships  with 
state  and  local  entities  and  educational  institutions.  For  example, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

10 

we  have  been  in  contact  with  representatives  of  the  Council  of 
Great City Schools, which is a coalition of 66 of the Nation’s largest 
urban  public  school  systems,  about  ways  that  we  can  work  with 
them  to  inform  and  educate  school-aged  children  about  the  transi-
tion.  We  have  also  reached  out  to  state  and  local  entities  to  enlist 
their  participation  in  consumer  education  and  outreach  efforts. 
Some of the organizations we have reached out to include the State 
Chambers  of  Commerce,  the  National  Association  of  Regulatory 
Utility  Commissioners,  the  National  Association  of  Telecommuni-
cations  Officers  and  Advisors,  the  National  Council  of  State  Legis-
lators, the National Congress of American Indians, and other tribal 
organizations,  as  well  as  the  United  States  Hispanic  Chamber  of 
Commerce. 

Our  consumer  outreach  and  education  activities  are  geared,  in 
part,  toward  reaching  consumers  who  are  likely  to  be  unaware  of 
the  upcoming  digital  transition,  including  senior  citizens,  non- 
English-speaking  consumers,  minority  communities,  people  with 
disabilities,  low-income  individuals,  and  people  living  in  rural  and 
tribal  areas.  For  example,  earlier  this  month  we  held  an  Indian 
Telecommunications  Initiative  Regional  Workshop  in  Albuquerque, 
New  Mexico.  The  workshop  focused  on  the  DTV  transition,  with 
the  goal  of  assisting  Indian  tribes  in  preparing,  organizing,  and 
conducting  DTV  outreach  campaigns.  While  there,  we  organized 
and  conducted  DTV  panels,  exhibited  equipment,  and  distributed 
DTV education materials. 

In  addition,  we  have  coordinated  with  the  National  Council  of 
Aging,  as  well  as  the  Umbrella  Leadership  Council  of  Aging  Orga-
nizations,  to  find  ways  that  we  can  work  together  to  educate  sen-
iors about the upcoming transition. 

the 

We have also taken a number of measures to ensure that we are 
communicating  with 
large  Spanish-speaking  community 
throughout  the  country.  For  example,  all  of  our  DTV  consumer 
publications  are  available  in  Spanish  versions,  and  our  dedicated 
DTV.gov webpage has an entire section in Spanish. 

Furthermore,  consumers  who  call  our  toll-free  number,  1–888– 
CALL–FCC,  may  receive  assistance,  including  DTV-related  infor-
mation, in English or Spanish. 

Another  important  way  we  have  been  disseminating  information 
is  through  our  participation  in  events  and  conferences.  For  exam-
ple,  we  have  worked  with  AARP  to  arrange  a  speaking  role  for 
Commission staff on the DTV transition at AARP’s Annual Conven-
tion  this  fall  in  Boston  on  one  of  the  convention’s  presentation 
stages.  We  are  also  working  with  AARP  to  obtain  prime  exhibit 
space  on  their  convention  floor  that  will  further  enable  us  to  spot-
light the DTV transition and its implication for seniors. 

We recently announced that we will host a DTV Consumer Edu-
cation  Workshop  on  September  the  26th.  The  Commission’s  work-
shop  will  consist  of  officials  from  organizations  who  represent  a 
broad  range  of  DTV  stakeholder  groups,  including  government 
agencies,  industry,  tribal  organizations,  disabilities,  community 
groups,  non-English-speaking  groups,  senior  citizen  organizations, 
low-income consumers, and other public interest organizations that 
may  represent  underserved  communities  or  those  living  in  rural 
areas.  The  purpose  of  this  workshop  will  be  to  provide  an  oppor-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

11 

tunity for all interested parties to jointly discuss the challenges as-
sociated  with  the  upcoming  transition,  and  explore  ways  in  which 
these  organizations  can  work  together  and  with  us  to  develop  co-
ordinated consumer outreach initiatives. 

In addition to furthering the activities already discussed, the ad-
ditional  funding  we  have  requested  from  Congress  will  allow  us  to 
undertake  several  new  initiatives  that  will  greatly  enhance  our  ef-
forts  to  reach  these  consumers,  those  who  currently  rely  on  over- 
the-air  service.  For  example,  in  order  to  reach  consumers  more  di-
rectly, additional funding would allow us to expand our dissemina-
tion  of  published  materials  through  targeted  direct  mailings  of 
DTV-related  information  to  hundreds  of  thousands  of  households, 
with  a  focus  on  underserved  communities  and  senior  citizens,  and 
we could translate our DTV consumer education materials into lan-
guages  other  than  Spanish,  possibly  including  French  and  Man-
darin, and distribute these materials through government and com-
munity  organizations  serving  immigrants  and  non-English-speak-
ing consumers. 

In  conclusion,  the  Commission  is  committed  to  ensuring  that 
Americans  are  not  left  in  the  dark  after  the  DTV  transition. 
Through all of our activities, policy enforcement, and consumer out-
reach, the Commission is dedicated to minimizing the negative im-
pact of the upcoming transition. We look forward to working closely 
with  Congress,  other  agencies,  and  industry  and  consumer  groups 
during  the  next  18  months  to  minimize  the  burden  on  consumers 
and ensure that all consumers reap the benefits of the digital tran-
sition. 

As the deadline approaches, we plan to continue our close coordi-
nation  with  NTIA  and  the  DTV  Transition  Coalition,  and  to  accel-
erate  our  consumer  education  and  outreach  initiatives,  as  funding 
permits,  to  ensure  that  all  Americans  are  aware  of  the  transition 
and  understand  what  steps  they  need  to  take  in  order  to  continue 
watching TV when analog broadcasting ends. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Seidel follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CATHERINE W. SEIDEL, CHIEF, CONSUMER AND 
GOVERNMENTAL AFFAIRS BUREAU, FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION 

Good  morning,  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  and  members  of  the 
Committee. Thank you for the opportunity to speak about the ongoing efforts of the 
Federal  Communications  Commission  (Commission)  to  facilitate  and  promote  con-
sumer education and awareness about the upcoming digital television (DTV) transi-
tion.  The  Commission  is  working,  consistent  with  its  statutory  authority  and  budg-
etary  capacity  to  ensure  that  no  American  is  left  behind  in  this  part  of  the  digital 
revolution. 

For  some  time  now,  we  have  been  working  both  on  our  own  and  in  cooperation 
with  industry,  other  government  agencies,  and  consumer  groups  to  advance  the 
transition  and  promote  consumer  awareness.  Our  efforts  to  date  have  been  three- 
fold.  First,  we  have  been  working  to  get  the  right  rules  in  place  to  facilitate  a 
smooth transition. Second, we have been actively enforcing our rules to protect con-
sumers.  And,  third,  we  have  been  promoting  awareness  of  the  transition  through 
our consumer education and outreach efforts. Through all of our activities, the Com-
mission has been dedicated to minimizing the negative impact of the digital transi-
tion on consumers while maximizing the benefits to them. 
Policy and Rulemaking Activities 

The  Commission  has  initiated  several  rulemaking  proceedings  designed  to  facili-

tate the upcoming transition. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

12 

Viewability NPRM. In one recent proceeding, the Commission proposed to ensure 
that  cable  subscribers  do  not  lose  access  to  broadcast  signals  because  of  the  digital 
transition. About 50 percent of cable subscribers today—at least 32 million people— 
subscribe  to  analog  not  digital  cable.  These  consumers  are  at  risk  of  losing  their 
ability to watch broadcast television after the digital transition unless the Commis-
sion  acts.  According  to  the  1992  Cable  Act,  cable  operators  must  ensure  that  all 
local  broadcast  stations  carried  pursuant  to  this  Act  are  ‘‘viewable’’  by  ‘‘all’’  cable 
subscribers.  The  Commission  is  currently  considering  a  rulemaking  that  would  re-
quire cable operators to ensure their analog customers don’t lose their broadcast sig-
nals.  Cable  operators  can  either  continue  to  carry  signals  in  analog  format  to  the 
millions  of  analog  cable  subscribers  or  alternatively,  cable  operators  who  have  cho-
sen  to  go  all-digital  can  provide  their  subscribers  with  the  necessary  equipment  to 
view broadcast and other channels. 

Consumer  Information  and  Labeling.  One  of  the  most  important  actions  we  have 
taken  to  facilitate  a  smooth  transition  is  to  ensure  that  electronics  retailers  fully 
inform consumers at the point of sale about the DTV transition date and the equip-
ment necessary to continue to be able to receive over-the-air television signals. 

Consumers have certain expectations and one of their expectations is that the tel-
evision  that  they  purchase  today  will  also  work  2  years  from  now.  As  of  March  1, 
2007,  all  television  receivers  shipped  in  interstate  commerce  or  imported  into  the 
United  States  must  have  an  integrated  digital  tuner.  Despite  this  prohibition  on 
shipment, retailers may continue to sell analog-only devices from existing inventory. 
In  April,  the  Commission  released  an  order  requiring  retailers  to  disclose  to  con-
sumers  that  a  television  with  only  an  analog  tuner  will  not  receive  over-the-air 
broadcast  signals  after  February  17,  2009.  Such  notice  should  ensure  that  con-
sumers  are  making  a  fully  informed  decision  about  the  television  that  they  seek  to 
purchase before bringing it home. It will also help educate consumers about the up-
coming digital transition. 

DTV  Education  NPRM.  Just  last  week,  the  Commission  adopted  a  Notice  of  Pro-
posed Rulemaking on several DTV education initiatives. This NPRM seeks comment 
on proposals that would require broadcasters, multichannel video programming dis-
tributors, retailers and manufacturers to take certain actions to publicize the digital 
transition.  The  Chairman  intends  for  the  Commission  to  complete  this  proceeding 
expeditiously. 
Enforcement Activities 

In addition to our policymaking activities, we have also been vigorously enforcing 

our digital transition-related rules. 

Labeling  Requirement.  As  I  described  earlier,  in  April  we  adopted  labeling  re-
quirements  to  ensure  that  consumers  are  protected  from  the  unknowing  purchase 
of television equipment without integrated digital tuners. As of July 24, 2007, Com-
mission staff had inspected about 1,089 retail stores around the country, as well as 
retailers’ websites, to monitor compliance with our rules. As a result of these inspec-
tions, we issued over 262 citations notifying retailers of violations. As an outgrowth 
of  our  investigations,  the  Chairman  recently  presented  his  colleagues  with  Notices 
of Apparent Liability against seven large retailers for apparently violating the Com-
mission’s  television  labeling  requirements.  These  fines,  in  the  aggregate,  total  over 
$3 million. 

DTV  Tuner  Requirement.  The  Commission  has  actively  pursued  entities  violating 
the  DTV  tuner  requirement  by  acting  on  complaints  and  staff  review  of  U.S.  Cus-
toms  data.  On  May  30,  2007,  the  Commission  issued  Notices  of  Apparent  Liability 
against two companies—Syntax Brillian Corp. and Regent USA, Inc. 

Swift  enforcement  of  all  of  our  DTV-related  rules  is  critical  to  protecting  con-
sumers from purchasing television sets that may be rendered useless in 18 months. 
Enforcement activities in this area will continue to be a priority for the Commission 
in the coming year. 
Consumer Education and Outreach 

In  addition  to  our  policymaking  and  enforcement  activities,  we  have  devoted  re-
sources  to  promoting  consumer  awareness  of  the  upcoming  transition  through  edu-
cation and outreach efforts. 

Consumer  Publications.  Specifically,  the  Commission  has  prepared  and  dissemi-
nated  numerous  consumer  publications  to  alert  and  inform  consumers  about  the 
transition.  For  example,  we  have  issued  a  consumer  advisory  on  what  consumers 
should  know  about  buying  TVs  as  the  analog  cutoff  date  approaches.  We  have  also 
issued  a  consumer  advisory  on  closed  captioning  for  digital  television  which  will 
help  inform  and  advise  people  who  are  deaf  and  hard  of  hearing.  And,  we  recently 
revised  one  of  our  DTV  fact  sheets—‘‘DTV  is  Coming  (And  Sooner  Than  You 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

13 

Think)’’—to  add  a  section  focused  on  helping  consumers  determine  whether  their 
current TV set contains a digital tuner or whether they will need to purchase a new 
one. 

Collaborative  Partnerships.  Moreover,  we  are  reaching  out  to  consumers  through 
many  different  venues,  including  forming  partnerships  with  government  and  other 
organizations.  For  example,  we  are  working  together  with  government  agencies  in-
cluding  the  National  Telecommunications  and  Information  Administration  (NTIA) 
and  the  U.S.  Administration  on  Aging  to  enhance  the  Commission’s  consumer  edu-
cation  and  outreach  efforts.  In  addition,  we  are  working  with  the  DTV  Transition 
Coalition,  of  which  we  are  a  member,  to  coordinate  consumer  education  and  out-
reach efforts. 

We  have  also  partnered  with  several  consumer  organizations,  such  as  CERC  and 
NACAA, to help us disseminate DTV education information. In addition, we are con-
tinually  developing  working  relationships  with  state  and  local  entities  and  edu-
cational  institutions.  For  example,  we  have  been  in  contact  with  representatives  of 
the  Council  of  Great  City  Schools,  a  coalition  of  66  of  the  Nation’s  largest  urban 
public  school  systems,  about  ways  we  can  work  together  to  inform  and  educate 
school age children about the transition. 

We  have  also  reached  out  to  state  and  local  entities  to  enlist  their  participation 
in consumer education efforts. Some of the organizations we have reached out to in-
clude  State  Chambers  of  Commerce,  the  National  Association  of  Regulatory  Utility 
Commissions,  the  National  Association  of  Telecommunications  Officers  and  Advi-
sors, the National Council of State Legislatures, the National Congress of American 
Indians,  other  Tribal  organizations,  and  the  U.S.  Hispanic  Chamber  of  Commerce. 
Targeted Outreach. Our consumer outreach and education activities are geared in 
part toward reaching consumers who are likely to be unaware of the upcoming dig-
ital  transition,  including  senior  citizens,  non-English  speaking  consumers,  minority 
communities,  people  with  disabilities,  low-income  individuals,  and  people  living  in 
rural and tribal areas. 

For example, earlier this month we held an Indian Telecommunications Initiative 
Regional Workshop in Albuquerque, NM. This workshop focused on the DTV transi-
tion with the goal of assisting Indian Tribes in preparing, organizing and conducting 
their  own  DTV  awareness  programs  and  initiatives.  While  there,  we  organized  and 
conducted  DTV  panels,  exhibited  equipment,  and  distributed  DTV  education  mate-
rials. 

In  addition,  we  have  coordinated  with  the  National  Council  of  Aging,  as  well  as 
the  Umbrella  Leadership  Council  of  Aging  Organizations  (LCAO),  to  find  ways  we 
can work together to educate seniors about the upcoming transition. 

We  have  also  taken  a  number  of  measures  to  ensure  that  we  are  communicating 
with  the  large  Spanish-speaking  community  throughout  the  country.  For  example, 
all  of  our  DTV  consumer  publications  are  available  in  Spanish  versions  and  our 
dedicated  DTV.gov  webpage  has  an  entire  section  in  Spanish.  Furthermore,  con-
sumers  who  call  our  toll-free  number,  1–888–CALL–FCC,  may  receive  assistance, 
including DTV-related information, in either English or Spanish. 

Events  and  Conferences.  Another  important  way  we  have  been  disseminating  in-
formation  is  through  our  participation  in  events  and  conferences.  For  example,  we 
have  worked  with  AARP  to  arrange  a  speaking  role  for  Commission  staff  on  the 
DTV transition at AARP’s annual convention this fall in Boston, MA, on one of the 
convention’s ‘‘Presentation’’ stages. We are also working with AARP to obtain prime 
exhibit  space  on  their  convention  floor  that  will  further  enable  us  to  spotlight  the 
DTV transition and its implications for seniors. 

We  recently  announced  that  we  will  host  a  DTV  Consumer  Education  Workshop 
on September 26. The Commission’s workshop will consist of officials from organiza-
tions who represent a broad range of DTV stakeholders, including government agen-
cies, industry, tribal organizations, disability community groups, non-English speak-
ing  groups,  senior  citizen  organizations,  low-income  consumer  representatives  and 
other  public  interest  organizations  that  may  represent  underserved  customers  or 
those  living  in  rural  areas.  The  purpose  of  this  workshop  will  be  to  provide  an  op-
portunity  for  all  interested  parties  to  jointly  discuss  the  challenges  associated  with 
the  upcoming  transition  and  explore  ways  in  which  these  organizations  can  work 
together, in conjunction with the Commission, to develop coordinated consumer edu-
cation activities. 

In  addition  to  furthering  the  activities  already  discussed,  the  additional  funding 
we have requested from Congress will allow us to undertake several new initiatives 
that  will  greatly  enhance  our  efforts  to  reach  those  consumers  who  currently  rely 
upon  over-the-air  service.  For  example,  in  order  to  reach  consumers  more  directly, 
additional funds would allow us to expand our dissemination of published materials 
through  targeted  direct  mailings  of  DTV-related  information  to  hundreds  of  thou-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

14 

sands  of  households,  with  a  focus  on  underserved  communities  and  senior  citizens. 
And,  we  could  translate  our  DTV  consumer  education  materials  into  languages 
other  than  Spanish,  possibly  including  French  and  Mandarin,  and  distribute  these 
materials  through  government  and  community  organizations  serving  immigrants 
and non-English speaking consumers. 
Conclusion 

In  conclusion,  the  Commission  is  committed  to  ensuring  that  Americans  are  not 
left  in  the  dark  after  the  DTV  transition.  Through  all  of  our  activities—policy,  en-
forcement, and consumer outreach—the Commission is dedicated to minimizing the 
negative impact of the upcoming transition. We look forward to working closely with 
Congress,  other  agencies,  and  industry  and  consumer  groups  during  the  next  18 
months  to  minimize  the  burden  on  consumers  and  ensure  that  all  consumers  reap 
the  benefits  of  the  digital  transition.  As  the  deadline  approaches,  we  plan  to  con-
tinue  our  close  coordination  with  the  NTIA  and  the  DTV  Transition  Coalition  and 
to  accelerate  our  consumer  education  and  outreach  initiatives,  as  funding  permits, 
to ensure that all Americans are aware of the transition and understand what steps 
they need to take in order to continue watching TV when analog broadcasting ends. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
Mr.  Secretary,  Ms.  Seidel,  your  testimony  suggests  that  much  is 
being  done.  However,  recent  polls  taken  in  the  United  States  sug-
gest  that  anywhere  from  60  to  90  percent  of  our  fellow  Americans 
are  not  aware  of  this  transition.  Yet,  on  the  other  hand,  we  have 
been  told  that,  in  the  British  Isles  in  the  United  Kingdom,  about 
80  percent  of  their  citizens  are  aware  of  the  transition.  Is  there 
something they’re doing right, and we’re not doing? 

Mr. Secretary? 
Mr.  KNEUER.  Well,  I  think,  if  you’re  looking  at  whether  or  not 
consumers  are  aware  of  the  actual  date  that  this  transition  con-
cludes,  in  February  of  2009,  I’m  not  surprised  that  there  is  less 
awareness  of  that.  I  expect,  as  our  public  education  campaigns 
ramp  up,  and  as  the  broadcasters’  campaigns  ramp  up,  awareness 
of  the  conclusion  of  this  transition  will  improve.  But  I  think  there 
are  tens  of  millions  of  American  households  that  are  currently 
aware  of  digital  television  and  high-definition  television.  By  the 
end of this year, the reports are, there will be 85 million DTVs sold 
and  in  households  across  America.  So,  I  think  Americans  are  get-
ting very broadly aware of, and accepting of, DTV, but we certainly 
have  more  work  to  do  over  the  next  18  months  to  make  sure  that 
they  are  aware  that  this  transition  will  come  to  a  conclusion  in 
February of 2009. 

The CHAIRMAN. Ms. Seidel, do you have any suggestions? 
Ms.  SEIDEL.  I  agree  with  Mr.  Kneuer,  in  that,  certainly  as  we 
ramp  up  and  accelerate  our  educational  programs  and  our  con-
sumer  outreach,  we  think  that  the  awareness  will  increase.  We 
think  that  the  efforts  we  have  undertaken  so  far  have  increased 
awareness, but recognize there is still much to do. 

We  are  hoping,  for  example—the  Chairman  just  announced  the 
new  membership  of  our  Consumer  Advisory  Committee,  and  he 
tasked  it  with  its  primary  focus  being  on  the  DTV  transition  and 
helping us help to ensure that all consumers are made aware. And 
we  have  a  broad  array  of  organizations  that  are  represented  there 
on  the  membership,  including  AARP,  including  organizations  rep-
resenting people who are disabled, and including organizations rep-
resenting  people  from  rural  communities  and  other  consumer 
groups.  So,  we  think  that  we  will  receive  input  that  will  help  us 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

15 

find and develop partnerships with others, to help us get the word 
out and increase awareness as the transition nears. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  We  have  provided  $5  million  for  the  education 
program  on  the  transition.  On  the  other  hand,  the  British  have 
provided  $400  million  for  similar  education,  with  a  smaller  popu-
lation. Do you think $5 million is adequate, Mr. Secretary? 

Mr.  KNEUER.  Five  million  dollars  is  certainly  a  limited  pool  of 
money  to  do  a  broad  nationwide  education  campaign,  but  I  think 
it  was  at  least  implicitly  understood  by  setting  that  amount  that 
the  vast  majority  of  the  public  education  would  be  performed  by 
those industries that have an interest in this transition: the broad-
casters,  the  cable  industry,  and  the  consumer  electronics  indus-
tries.  And  they  have  committed  to  conducting  a  very  active  and 
broad consumer education campaign. 

We’re focusing our $5 million on making people aware of the ex-
istence  of  our  coupon  program,  that  there  is,  in  fact,  financial  as-
sistance  for  those  consumers  who  need  assistance  with  the  transi-
tion and haven’t effected the transition in some other way on their 
own.  We’re  going  to  be  issuing  a  contract,  middle  of  next  month, 
where,  included  in  that,  will  be  the  funding  of  that  $5  million  for 
that broad consumer education campaign. 
The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
Senator Stevens? 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator STEVENS. Well, thank you very much. 
One  of  the  things  I  pointed  out  in  the  statement  I  put  in  the 
record is that we have tied this coming auction to the whole subject 
of  the  changeover  in  DTV.  We  have  provided  that,  as  the  money 
comes  in  from  the  auction,  it’s  automatically  available  from  the 
Treasury;  a  billion  dollars  for  interoperability  grants,  $11⁄2 billion 
for  a  converter  box  program,  $7.3  billion  for  deficit  reduction.  And 
then we go into a cascade of funds, thereafter, from the auction. 

Now,  Secretary  Kneuer,  it  was  our  estimate  that  the  auction 
would  raise  in  excess  of  $10  billion.  And—based  on  that  estimate, 
we  made  these  allocations.  There  is  money  for  public  safety  pro-
grams, as well as wireless alerts, and E–911. The whole concept re-
lated  to  DTV  conversion  and  the  availability  of  funds  in  order  to 
go into the emergency side is tied to this auction. 

Now, let me ask you this. Do you think the current auction rules 
proposed  by  the  FCC  are  going  to  undermine  that  value?  Should 
we  look  forward  to  having  less  money  come  from  the  auction  be-
cause of the change of the rules proposed by the FCC now? 

Mr.  KNEUER.  I  think  we’ve  had  the  highest  degree  of  success  in 
auctions where we provided maximum flexibility, from a technology 
standpoint,  from  service-providing  standpoint.  You  know,  the  auc-
tion  that  we  concluded  last  year,  for  the  AWS  auction,  raised  $14 
billion.  And  I  think  maximum  flexibility  does  tend  to  lead  to  max-
imum revenues. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  should  we  be  thinking—I’m  sure  the 
Chairman  has  mentioned,  already—should  we  be  thinking  about 
finding  ways  to  finance  a  part  of  the  public  information  program 
because of the reduction in funds available from this auction? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

16 

Mr. KNEUER. I would hesitate to make a guess of what the actual 
auction  revenues  would  be.  You  know,  I  would  look  to  OMB  and 
CBO  and  others  to  come  up  with  actual  scores.  I  am  very  mindful 
of the fact that the money that we’re currently spending, we’ve bor-
rowed  from  the  Treasury.  This  is  in  anticipation  of  those  revenues 
coming  in,  when—like  you  said,  our  first  obligation  when  the  auc-
tion revenues come in is to provide $7.2 billion to the Treasury for 
deficit  reduction.  Then  we  can  pay  back  the  money  that  we’ve  al-
ready borrowed, and, to a large degree, already spent. So, I’m very 
focused  on  making  sure  that  we  do  have  auction  receipts  that  will 
cover all these expenditures under the statute. 

Senator STEVENS. In that legislation, we gave several entities the 
right  to  borrow  against  the  money  that  would  be  in  the  Treasury 
once  this  auction  took  place.  I’m  a  little  worried  about  it.  Not  just 
a little. Senator Inouye and I started the auction concept. The first 
time we had an auction, it was estimated that we’d bring in some-
where  less  than  a  billion  dollars;  I  think  it  was  a  little  over  half 
a  billion  dollars.  That  brought  in  $17  billion,  as  I  recall.  And  now 
we have an estimate that it is at least $10 billion. Based upon that 
conservative  side  of  $10  billion,  Congress,  at  our  request,  made 
these  allocation  of  funds  in  advance,  and  gave  people—gave  enti-
ties—the  right  to  borrow  against  those  funds  based  upon  the  tim-
ing  of  this  auction.  Now,  I’m  sort  of  worried  about  the  fact  that 
there is an undercurrent here now that, maybe, because the public 
isn’t  ready  for  this  auction—this  transition,  we  should  delay  the 
auction,  or  we  should  delay  the  transition  date.  That  either  one  is 
going  to  cost  the  taxpayers  money,  in  my  opinion,  in  the  long  run. 
Because if we don’t get the money from the auction, we’re going to 
have  to  pay  back  the  money  you’ve  borrowed  from  the  Treasury. 
And that’s going to be a real battle up here, I think. 

What  about  the  converter  box  program?  As  I  said,  that  is  basi-
cally  going  to  be  financed  by  the  auction.  What  are  you  doing  now 
to  reach  out  to  places  in  rural  Alaska  or  rural  America,  to  make 
sure people understand about the necessity to have those boxes? 

Mr.  KNEUER.  Absolutely.  We’re  going  to  be  issuing  the  contract 
for  the  vendor  who  will  perform  the  management  of  the  coupon 
program,  including  the  consumer  education  efforts.  When  we  put 
out  our  Request  for  Proposals  for  that  contract,  the  things  we  fo-
cused  on,  and  asked  the  vendors  to  focus  on,  were  their  proposals 
to  reach  out  to  rural  America,  to  reach  out  to  retailers  to  partici-
pate  in  this  program,  not  just  big-box  retailers  and  large  nation-
wide chains, but also give us proposals on how they intend to reach 
out  to  rural  retailers  and  smaller  businesses.  We’ve  been  working 
with  the  Alaskan  Native  Broadcast  Corporation  and  Native  Voice 
One  to  reach  out  to  tribal  communities.  We  clearly  have  a  focus, 
given the limited amount of resources that we have in this program 
for  consumer  education,  to  make  sure  that  those  monies  are  fo-
cused, to the extent possible, on rural, hard-to-reach, hard-to-serve 
communities. 

Senator STEVENS. Ms. Seidel, I don’t know what your responsibil-
ities are, vis-a`-vis the Commission itself, to talk to them about the 
relationship between these proposed changes and the responsibility 
of  the  FCC,  as  far  as  the  transition  is  concerned.  Tell  me,  do  you 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

17 

advise  the  Commission  on  the  impact  of  some  of  the  proposed 
changes and what they might do to consumers? 

Ms.  SEIDEL.  In  terms  of—if  you’re  talking  about  the  specifics  of 
the  particulars  of  the  700  MHz  auction,  that  is  a  proceeding  that 
is handled by our Wireless Bureau, which Fred Campbell heads up. 
Based on the discussion and the exchange a few minutes ago, I will 
certainly  take  your  suggestions  and  your  concerns  back  to  the  Bu-
reau. If you had particular questions about consumer outreach and 
how  we  are  undertaking  to  reach  rural  communities  and  commu-
nities  in  Alaska  and  other  places,  I’m  happy  to  provide  you  with 
some suggestions of things that we have been doing in that regard. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  my  feeling  is  that  maximum  flexibility 
leads to the maximum amount of funds coming in from the auction, 
and if the maximum amount of funds are there, we’re going to have 
all this cascade of funds that Congress has already provided to the 
transition. Now, again, I can’t get involved in some of your in-house 
conversations,  but  do  you  believe  the  Commission’s  aware  of  the 
connection  between  flexibility  and  the  amount  of  funds  that  come 
in? 

Ms. SEIDEL. Oh, certainly. Consumer awareness and making sure 
that we promote the digital television transition and reach all con-
sumers, especially those that are hard to reach, is a priority for the 
Chairman,  and  certainly  the  700  MHz  auction  is  a  priority  for  the 
Chairman. So, certainly I think the interrelationship between those 
two is something that is, you know, constantly discussed. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  I’ve  got  to  confess,  I’m  sorry,  now,  we 
agreed to the concept of 7.3 billion for deficit reduction before some 
of  these  other  matters  are  dealt  with,  including  paying  back  some 
of  the  money  that  has  already  been  borrowed  from  the  allocations 
of  funds  that  are  below  that,  in  terms  of  looking  at  the  total 
amount that’s brought in. 

I  hope  people  are  aware  of  the  connection  between  this  auction 

and the transition. The—— 

Please, I’ve got enough already. Thank you. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator STEVENS. I do think that we have—the greatest problem 
right  now  is  the  distribution  of  these  converter  boxes  to  rural 
America.  If  there  is  anyplace  rural  in  America,  it  is  Alaska,  241 
small  villages  out  there,  and  a  whole  series  of  small  communities 
that  are  not  villages,  they’re  not  tribes  and  tribal  villages.  It  just 
seems  to  me  that  we’ve  got  to  have  a  greater  awareness  of  the 
problems. 

Senator  Inouye’s  Hawaii,  most  people  don’t  realize  that  the  ring 
of  islands  around  there—actually,  if  you  put  a  circle  around  Ha-
waii, it’s larger than Alaska. But there is a lot of water in between. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator STEVENS. But the problems of distribution are the same. 
Their  communications  are  different,  their  means  of  transpor-
tation—70  percent  of  our  villages  can  be  reached  only  by  air,  year 
round,  and  we’ve  got  a  problem  of  dealing  with  them,  in  terms  of 
converter boxes. So, I just don’t think that the people that are sug-
gesting  a  delay  understand  what  the  impact  of  that  delay  is  going 
to be on places like Alaska. And I don’t think the FCC understands 
that this rattling the cage over this, what’s going to happen at the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

18 

auction is doing anything other than reducing the amount of money 
we’re  going  to  get  in.  Now,  I  hope  that  people  settle  down  and  we 
keep  the  schedule,  and  the  schedule  works.  I  think  it  will  work, 
and  I  think  we’ll  bring  in  more  money  than  we  expect  if  we  don’t 
rattle this cage any longer. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Sununu? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN E. SUNUNU, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Senator SUNUNU. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
First, just a couple of observations, as we didn’t all have opening 
statements,  and  I  know  more  formal  comments  will  be  placed  in 
the record. 

But  I,  first,  want  to  make  the  observation  that  there  is  a  little 
bit of good news here, in that we seem to have moved past the idea 
of  delaying  the  transition  date.  And  that’s  really  only  in  the  last 
few months that I think we really nailed that down with the final-
ization of the regulations. And I think everyone feels confident that 
we’ll  be  able  to  get  this  transition  done.  And,  as  an  advocate  of 
doing  it  even  earlier,  I  think  the  fact  that  there  is  so  much  con-
fidence in holding that date, at this point, is an indication that we 
could  have  done  it  even  earlier,  which  would  have  been  good  for 
consumers,  and  good  for  the  economy.  But  I  am  pleased  to  know, 
or to make the observation that we’re beyond a discussion of delay. 
Second,  I  think  we  need  to  remember  that,  among  the  greatest 
beneficiaries of this process will be public safety. We’ve got 24 MHz 
that’s going to be put into the hands of public safety. That’s impor-
tant. It’s something I think the members on this committee strong-
ly support. But it is also important that, at the end of the day, that 
24 MHz is used in—as efficiently as possible, and that we not bur-
den the public safety spectrum with regulations, or with mandates, 
with  regard  to  the  technologies  that  can  be  used  in  providing  that 
spectrum for public safety. 

There’s a lot of skepticism about the intelligence of the American 
consumer,  every  time  we  talk  about  digital  transition,  and  I  want 
to  stand  up  for  the  general  intelligence,  the  ability,  and  the  flexi-
bility of American consumers. We want to make sure we have good 
ad  campaigns,  good  communication,  but,  at  the  end  of  the  day,  I 
remain  confident  that  the  video/television-watching  public  is  going 
to  be  able  to  understand  what’s  available  to  them,  in  the  way  of 
technology, to help with this transition, what’s available to them in 
the  way  of  products  and  services,  whether  it’s  satellite  or  cable  or 
fiber to the home. All of these are going to be able to deal with the 
digital transition in a very effective way. 

Finally,  I  think  it’s  important  to  emphasize  that  if  we  want  this 
to go smoothly, we’ve got to end the debate about other regulations 
in the digital transition. Discussion about down conversion, discus-
sion about multicarriage or must-carry, I don’t think that’s helpful. 
I think those are the kinds of 11th-hour regulations that will cause 
problems  for  consumers,  not  because  they’re  not  capable  or  under-
standing  of  the  process,  but  because  imposing  those  regulations  at 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

19 

a  late  date  will  change  the  dynamics  of  delivering  the  products, 
will change the dynamics of the communications campaign. 

So,  I  think  we’re  on  the  right  track,  and  I  think  consumers  are 
going to be able to handle this well, but I do want to hear our pan-
elists  address  a  couple  of  issues.  One  was  touched  on  briefly,  and 
that  is  the  ad  campaign,  the  publicity  campaign.  The  point  was 
made  that  $5  million  is  a  relatively  small  budget,  in  the  way  of 
communications and advertising it and for Mr. Kneuer. But, as you 
mentioned,  the  private  sector  is  going  to  play  a  role  here,  and  it 
is a little disappointing that we don’t have anyone representing the 
private sector on either of these panels, to talk about what they are 
or  aren’t  doing.  How  much  are  they  spending?  How  do  they  feel 
about the consumers that they serve? Because they’re the ones that 
are  going  to  be  on  the  front  line  in  dealing  with  consumers  if  this 
transition  isn’t  handled  well.  As  politicians,  we’re  going  to  bear 
some  of  the  burden  and  the  blame  if  the  process  doesn’t  go  well, 
but that’s different than dealing with 5 million or 10 million or 20 
million  subscribers  or  viewers  that  might  not  be  happy  with  the 
process. 

So,  I  would  like  you  to  address  the  issue  of  private-sector  sup-
port.  What  do  you  see  out  there  now?  And  have  you  made  any  ef-
fort  to  estimate  how  much  will  be  spent  by  distributors,  content 
providers, and broadcasters in their effort? 

Mr. KNEUER. Sure. The people who are going to be most affected 
by  this,  these  are  the  broadcasters’  customers.  There  are  massive 
market  incentives  for  the  broadcasters  to  reach  out  to  their  cus-
tomers and continue to have contact with their customers after the 
transition.  So,  there  is  absolutely  going  to  be  a  large,  concerted 
campaign, not just by the broadcasters, but also by the cable indus-
try,  the  consumer  electronics  industry.  I  talked  a  little  bit  in  my 
testimony  about  this  DTV  Coalition,  that  started  with  those  three, 
and  now  includes  over  120  members.  It’s  not  just  the  market  par-
ticipants  in  these  industries  that  are  taking  part  in  this  coalition 
now,  but  also  those  organizations  that  have  special  missions  to 
serve  special  constituencies  and  identify  groups  that  may  be  dif-
ficult to reach. 

I think the good news is that the easiest way, and the best way, 
to inform people about a change in television is through television. 
So, the broadcasters, by putting on campaigns, those who rely most 
on  television,  watch  the  most  television,  are  likely  to  get  the  most 
information  about  this  and  accelerate  the  transition  on  their  own. 
So,  I  don’t  have  a  sense—and  I  don’t  know  that  they  have  pro-
vided,  sort  of,  a  dollar  figure,  ‘‘We’re  committing  X  number  of  dol-
lars  in  PSA  announcements,’’  and  the  rest.  But  they  have  been 
working  together,  and  have  made  a  commitment  to  an  accelerated 
broad  campaign  that  will  get  much  larger  and  much  more  intense 
as  we  get  closer  to  the  transition—get  closer  to  the  conclusion  of 
the transition. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  The  money  that’s  been  allocated  for  converter 
boxes,  $1.5  billion,  was  based,  in  part,  on  CBO  estimates,  and,  in 
part,  on  the  estimates  of  the  number  of  households  that  receive 
over-the-air  signals—over-the-air-only  signals.  In  our  committee 
memo,  it’s  noted  that,  according  to  the  FCC,  as  of  June  2004,  less 
than  15  percent  of  households  relied  exclusively  on  over-the-air 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

20 

transmission.  I  can’t  help  but  notice  that  that  number  is  3  years 
old, and it would seem to me to be quite helpful to have a number 
that’s a little bit more current. Do either of you have more current 
figures? 

Ms. Seidel? 
Ms.  SEIDEL.  I  would  have  to  check  with  my  colleagues  in  the 
Media  Bureau  on  that,  but  I  certainly  can  check  and  get  back  to 
you. 

Senator SUNUNU. Mr. Kneuer? 
Mr.  KNEUER.  We  have  been  looking  at  numbers  from  lots  of  dif-
ferent  sources.  There  are  the  FCC  numbers.  Different  industries 
come  up  with  different  numbers.  I’ve  been  hesitant  to  pick  an  in-
dustry number and say, ‘‘This is absolutely the right one.’’ But the 
clear trend is that that number is shrinking, if by nothing else, by 
the virtue of the tens of millions of digital sets that are being sold 
year  after  year.  So,  clearly  that  number  is  going  down.  And,  I 
think, as people get more aware of the transition, millions of Amer-
icans  are  effecting  the  transition  on  their  own,  either  by  buying 
DTV sets or subscribing to cable to satellite. 

Senator SUNUNU. Yes, I agree with that answer, but I can’t help 
be  a  little  bit  disappointed  that  it  seems  neither  the  Senate  Com-
merce  Committee,  nor  the  FCC,  nor  any  of  the  other  sources  that 
we  rely  on  can  give  us  a  more  updated  number  than  that  June 
2004  number.  Clearly,  it’s  going  down.  I  think  that’s  a  good  thing. 
And  I  think,  on  the  whole,  the  estimates  of  the  cost  of  this  con-
verter  program  were  probably  higher  than  will  ultimately  be  the 
case. 

A  final  point.  On  the  proceeds  of  the  auction  that  Senator  Ste-
vens raised concerns about, I’m concerned about the proceeds of the 
auction.  Mr.  Kneuer,  as  you  emphasize,  the  more  regulations,  the 
more  encumbrances,  the  more  requirements  you  place  on  those 
that  purchase  or  win  in  the  auction  for  spectrum,  the  less  you’re 
going to get from that auction. That’s an economic fact of life. And 
it  does  place  some  of  these  programs  at  risk.  There  could  ulti-
mately  be  less  in  proceeds,  because  of  the  regulations  and  encum-
brances  the  FCC  is  considering  on  the  upcoming  auction.  That  is 
a reason not to change the allocations, but not to place the encum-
brances  on  the  auction  in  the  first  place.  If  the  goal  for  the  tax-
payers,  for  the  country,  for  competitive  reasons,  is  to  make  spec-
trum  available  so  that  it  can  be  used  in  innovative  and  dynamic 
ways, then we need to avoid coming up with new ways to regulate 
and devalue the spectrum just prior to its auction. That’s certainly 
something—I  feel  very  strongly—but  I’d  like  to  give  you  both  an 
opportunity to respond. 

Mr. Kneuer, has the administration raised concerns or voiced op-

position to limitations on the 700 MHz spectrum? 

Mr. KNEUER. You know, I am, likewise, with regards to the auc-
tion  proceeds  and  the  revenues,  I  think,  as  Senator  Stevens  was 
saying,  we’ve  already  borrowed  large  amounts  of  money.  It’s  my 
signature that’s on the promissory note, so getting the auction rev-
enue  in  to  pay  back  those  notes  is  of  keen  importance  to  me.  I 
think  you’re  right,  that  the  more  flexibility  we  put  on  spectrum  in 
the  past—you  know,  we’ve  had  maximum  revenues  and  lots  of  in-
novation—that  being  said,  I  think  the  situation  around  700  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

21 

mains pretty fluid. There are still people out there pushing for even 
more regulation than the things that have been proposed, whether 
it  be  wholesale,  which  sounds  a  lot  like  regulated  resale  rather 
than  wholesale.  I  think  there  are  people  who  are  expressing  con-
cerns  about,  if  there  are  constraints  on  the  big  block  of  spectrum, 
maybe the incumbents will be forced into, and dominate, the small-
er geographic areas and the smaller blocks. So, I think there is lots 
of  movement.  You’re  seeing  people  in  the  industry  still  putting  in 
proposals, so there is lots of movement around this, as of now. 

At  the  end  of  the  day,  I  would  certainly  hope  that  they  would 
adopt  policies  that  maximize  innovation  and  maximize  investment 
and  bring  in  enough  revenue  that  we’re  going  to  be  able  to  cover 
all  these  programs  and  have  the  $7.2  billion  for  deficit  reduction. 

Senator SUNUNU. Thank you. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you, Mr. Chair. 
And  thank  you  for  being  here.  I  would  share  what  Senator 
Sununu is saying, that this is an exciting opportunity, with digital 
television,  but,  at  the  same  time,  we’re  only  19  months  away,  as 
you know—I assume you have the calendar marked on your wall— 
from  the  February  17,  2009,  transition  date;  and  I  was  thinking 
back to Y2K. I was county attorney at the time, and everyone was 
hooked up with cell phones that night. It was New Year’s Eve, and 
I think I talked to our sheriff and our police chief, and I remember 
us just waiting for something to happen, and everything went quite 
well. And I think part of that was the planning. 

I’m  concerned  about  this,  because  of  the  fact  that  we  have 
457,000 households—this is according to Nielsen, that are over-the- 
air  analog  TV  in  Minnesota,  and  that’s  just  in  my  state.  And,  of 
course,  most  of  them  are  rural  customers,  and  many  of  them  are 
elderly. 

My  question,  just  to  follow  up  on  some  of  the  Chairman’s  ques-
tions,  with  Great  Britain,  80  percent  of  them  know—and  I  think 
our  stats  show  60  percent  of  American  consumers  don’t  know,  or 
even  higher—and  in  Great  Britain,  you  have  80  percent  of  them 
aware of the transition. So, what exactly are they doing differently? 
Just concisely, what are they doing differently in Great Britain? 

Mr.  KNEUER.  Well,  they’ve  got  a  very  different  relationship  with 
their  TVs  in  Great  Britain.  They’ve  got  a  annual  tax  that  the  gov-
ernment reaches out to consumers every year and says, ‘‘This is the 
amount  of  money  you  owe  for  your  television.’’  So,  the  government 
already  has  a  built-in  relationship  with  every  TV  customer.  So, 
that may be one aspect of it. 

But, like I said, I’m not surprised that the awareness of the con-
clusion of this transition is not extraordinarily high right now, but 
I  think  there  is  a  broad  awareness  and  a  broad  acceptance  of  the 
DTV  transition,  and  American  consumers  are  availing  themselves, 
and  effecting  the  transition  on  their  own,  in  huge  numbers.  As  we 
get  closer,  I  think,  if  the  ad  campaigns  by  the  broadcasters  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

22 

others  focus  on,  as  we  get  closer,  ramping  up,  making  people 
aware, that, you know, the end is, in fact, coming. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  So,  is  there  a  commitment  that  the  broad-
casters are going to be making these—doing these ads and commer-
cials? 

Mr. KNEUER. Well, they’ve made public announcements and com-
mitments.  I  don’t  have  regulatory  authority.  I  think  the  Commis-
sion  is  introducing  rulemakings  on  specific  commitments  on  the 
amount of public awareness that they’ll be required to do. But cer-
tainly  it  is  not  only  their  responsibility,  but  it’s  in  their  own  best 
interest  to  make  sure  that  their  customers  are  aware  of  this  and 
that they retain access to those customers after the transition. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Maybe this is for Ms. Seidel. This might be 
a naive question, but is there a way to target the advertising to the 
analog TV customers? 

Ms. SEIDEL. I think, in talking with the Digital Television Tran-
sition Coalition, and in talking to NAB in that respect, as well, my 
understanding is that there is a fair amount of research underway 
to  try  to  target  in  more  detail  exactly  where  those  over-the-air 
households are. And I’ve received or, I’ve seen some statistics, thus 
far,  that  are  by  state,  and  percentages  of  the  population  within 
each  state  that  are  over-the-air  viewers.  And  my  understanding  is 
that members of the coalition are trying to get that down to a more 
granular  level,  and  getting  it  down  by  county,  and  that  they  feel 
confident they’ll be able to get that figure by county. And then, you 
know,  we  would  target—certainly,  the  Commission  would  be  look-
ing  to  target  our  outreach  in  those  counties  and  in  those  areas 
where that percentage is relatively high, and starting there. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. And then—— 
Ms. SEIDEL. But—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR.—you know, I’m—go ahead. 
Ms. SEIDEL. Oh, excuse me. 
Back  to  what  Mr.  Kneuer  said,  though,  the  item,  that  I  men-
tioned  earlier  in  my  remarks,  that  the  Commission  is  considering, 
does  ask  questions  about  whether  the  broadcasters  should  be  re-
quired  to  report  on  their  outreach  efforts  to  date,  and  whether 
there  should  be  other  types  of  industry-required  reporting  or  ac-
tions to help further outreach on the private sector. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  And  when  will  the  Commission  complete 

this consideration? 

Ms.  SEIDEL.  My  understanding  is  that  the  Commission  has 
adopted  the  item  and  is  endeavoring  to  get  it  released  as  quickly 
as possible, so that will be in the very near term. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Then  my  last  group  of  questions  are  about 
the rural customers. And, as we know, they disproportionately rely 
on  this.  It’s  my  understanding  that  they  will  most  likely  have  to 
rely  on  a  coupon  program  to  get  a  converter  box.  I’m  trying  to 
imagine how this will work, in practice. You know, what’s going to 
happen to those that are not near an electronics retailer? We have 
some counties in Minnesota that it can take hours to get to a elec-
tronics  retailer.  So,  how  are  they  going  to  get  the  converter  box? 
Is  there  going  to  be  a  mail-order  system?  Or  what’s  going  on  to 
help them to get these boxes? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

23 

Mr.  KNEUER.  The  coupon  program  is  designed  to  reach  all  of 
those  kinds  of  consumers.  With  regards  to  retailers,  we  want  to 
make  sure  that  we  have  an  outreach  to  retailers  that  goes  beyond 
just  the  big  nationwide  chains  and  the  large  consumer  electronics. 
So,  we’ve  allowed  for  retailer  participation  from  mail-order,  over 
the  Internet,  as  well  as  traditional  brick-and-mortar,  and  we’ve 
also required that the vendor who’s going to fulfill the coupon pro-
gram for us has a plan to reach out to some of those nontraditional 
retailers  to  make  sure  that  the  same  sorts  of  retailers  that  your 
constituents  rely  on  for  all  of  their  day-to-day  needs  will  also  be 
able to participate in the coupon program. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you very much. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator McCaskill? 

STATEMENT OF HON. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSOURI 
Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I’m concerned that, as of fairly recent data from Nielsen and the 
broadcasters,  one  in  five  Missourians  is  getting  over-the-air  signal 
right  now.  I  mean,  frankly,  this  scares  me,  politically.  I  mean, 
there is no anger that comes close to the anger of an American who 
can’t get television. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  I  know  who  they’re  going  to  blame. 
They’re  not  going  to  call  you,  Mr.  Kneuer.  And  they’re  not  going 
to  call  you,  Ms.  Seidel.  But  you  know  who  they’re  going  to  call? 
They’re going to call me, and they’re going to be mad. So, I am very 
discouraged  that  we  don’t  have  more  finite  answers  this  morning. 
I mean, we’re talking about something—I mean, this is like tomor-
row, if we’re talking about government time. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  I  mean,  the  idea  that  this  rule  hasn’t  been 
finalized  yet  as  to  what  we  can  even  expect,  in  terms  of  PSAs  and 
bill  inserts,  really  worries  me.  Can  you  tell  us  what  the  Commis-
sion—are  they  going  to  require  the  broadcasters  to  begin  PSAs  at 
a  certain  date?  Are  they  going  to  require  bill  inserts  anywhere,  in 
terms  of  that?  I  mean,  do  we  know  what  they’re  going  to  require, 
the Commission? 

Ms.  SEIDEL.  Because  that  proceeding—the  item  has  not  been  re-
leased,  and  the  text  of  it  will  be  released  soon—I  think  it  would 
be  premature  for  me,  and  because  I  was  not  part  of  the  staff  that 
worked  on  that  proceeding,  I  can’t  really  tell  you  the  specifics,  but 
it  would  seek  comment  on  issues  such  as  those.  But,  in  addition, 
I  can  talk  to  you  a  little  bit  about  the  concerns  you  raised  about 
outreach and how people are going to be made aware. 

I  think  your  point’s  well  taken,  that  it  will  be  very  challenging 
to  directly  touch  every  single  American  about  the  transition  and 
make sure—or make sure the ones we’re touching are the ones that 
are the consumers who rely exclusively on over-the-air. That’s why 
part  of  the  Commission’s  approach  to  this  has  been,  not  only  just 
developing the materials and making sure that we distribute them 
to  consumers  who  call,  or  consumers  who  write  us,  or  e-mail  us, 
but  making  sure  that  we  establish  partnerships  with  groups  all 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

24 

around  the  country  that  serve  and/or  have  members  who  are  part 
of  the  group—the  communities  we  think  will  be  most  difficult  to 
reach, including people in rural areas and senior citizens, people in 
tribal  areas.  We  had  a  very  productive  Indian  telecommunications 
initiative  earlier  in  the  month,  where  we  had  over  78  different— 
I believe it was 78 different tribes there representing over 30 tribal 
nations, and we had radio stations—tribal radio stations and tribal 
broadcast  stations  who  agreed  to  work  with  us  to  make  sure  the 
word got out to those hard-to-reach—— 

Senator MCCASKILL. I think that’s fine. But let me disagree with 
you.  And  I  don’t  have  a  lot  of  time,  and  I’ve  got  several  questions. 
You  know,  it’s  not  hard  to  educate  the  United  States  of  America. 
It’s  called—you  do  it  over  television.  You  know,  look  around  this 
room,  and  you’ll  see  people  that  spent  a  great  deal  of  their  lives 
raising  money  in  order  to  communicate  over  television.  We  know 
how  to  reach  people  through  television.  And  what  I’m  frustrated 
about  is  that  these  PSAs  and  this  education—I  mean,  you  all  are 
supposed  to  be  the  experts  on  educating  consumers  on  this  transi-
tion,  but  yet,  no  one  can  give  us  definite  answers  when  broadcast 
education  is  going  to  begin  with  public  service  announcements.  I 
would  appreciate,  just  as  soon  as  either  one  of  you  know—when 
there  is  any  kind  of  requirement  that  these  broadcast  announce-
ments are going to begin so that people will understand. 

Let  me  move  to  the  boxes.  Has  NTIA  field  tested  any  of  these 

boxes yet? 

Mr.  KNEUER.  We’ve  received—under  our  regs,  manufacturers 
that wanted to submit a box have to submit an expression of inter-
est in detail saying that, ‘‘We intend to build the boxes, and we in-
tend  to  participate  in  the  program,’’  60  days  prior  to  submitting  a 
box  to  us.  We’ve  received  a  large  volume  of  those  expressions.  We 
have some boxes already in. We’ve got an MOU with the FCC that 
we  will  be  using  their  labs,  in  coordination  with  us,  to  verify  the 
boxes,  to  make  sure  that  the  boxes  that  enter  the  marketplace  ac-
tually meet our specs and are functional. 

Senator MCCASKILL. I take it—— 
Mr. KNEUER. But we’ve had—— 
Senator MCCASKILL.—that is no. 
Mr.  KNEUER.  We  have—we  do  have  boxes  that  are—have  been 

submitted. We have not—— 

Senator MCCASKILL. Have they—— 
Mr. KNEUER. We have not—— 
Senator MCCASKILL.—been field tested yet? 
Mr.  KNEUER.  I  don’t  know  the  status  of  the  actual  testing,  but 

all that is ongoing. 

Senator MCCASKILL. OK. I would love to know if any of the boxes 
have,  in  fact,  been  field  tested  and  what  the  results  of  those  field 
tests  were.  The  only  thing  that’s  going  to  make  people  madder  is 
if  they  get  these  coupons,  and  they  get  the  boxes,  and  then  their 
signal is degraded and they don’t get a good signal. And so, I would 
like to know what the specific plans are for field testing, and what 
the results of those field tests are. 

It’s  my  understanding  these  coupons  are  going  to  be  available 

January 1. 

Mr. KNEUER. Yes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

25 

now. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  So,  we’re  talking  literally  6  months  from 

Mr. KNEUER. Yes. 
Senator MCCASKILL. It’s also my understanding that we couldn’t 
get  Best  Buy’s  CEO,  in  the  House,  to  even  commit  that  he  would 
put coupon-eligible boxes in all of his stores. Do we have any com-
mitment  from  the  retailers  of  America  as  to  the  availability  of 
these boxes? And the second part of my question is, do we have any 
plans  underway  to  protect  seniors?  Because  this  is  going  to  be  an 
area  that  will  be  very  easy  for  the  elderly  to  be  preyed  upon  with 
people  handing  out  coupons  that  aren’t  real,  providing  boxes  that 
don’t work. So, I’m concerned that since we’re going to start hand-
ing  these  coupons  out  in  6  months,  and  we  don’t  even  have  a  rule 
we can talk about in public yet as to how we’re going to tell people 
about  the  coupons,  but  yet,  we’re  going  to  have  the  coupons  avail-
able in 6 months. I mean, I am really worried about this. 

Mr.  KNEUER.  To  the  point  on  the  boxes,  the  details  on  what  the 
field  tests  are,  what  the  requirements  of—all  of  those  were  pub-
lished  in  our  rule.  They’re  transparent.  We’ll  get  you  the  informa-
tion on that. 

And, as we conclude testing, and we approve boxes, that informa-
tion  will  be  made  public.  So,  all  that  information  will  come  out  on 
a  rolling  basis  as  they  enter  the  market.  Multiple  manufacturers 
are  on  the  record  saying  they  intend  to  have  these  boxes  in  the 
marketplace,  so  I’m  confident,  given  the  resources  that  we’ve  put 
into  the  program,  there  is  a  billion-dollar  marketplace  for  this. 
There have been very broad expressions of interest by the manufac-
turers that there will be boxes in the marketplace. 

As  far  as  the  retailers,  as  I  said,  we’re  going  to  be  issuing  our 
contract  with  the  vendor  in  the  middle  of  next  month.  Part  of  our 
agreement—part  of  the  request  that  we  put  in  to  the  vendors  that 
would fulfill that contract is outreach to the retailers to make sure 
that they are getting as many retailers as possible to get into—par-
ticipate in the program. 

Getting to your point on seniors and fraud, one of the challenges, 
and  one  of  the  reasons  you  don’t  want  to  allow  any  retailer,  with-
out  any  constraints,  to  participate  in  the  program,  is,  you  want  to 
have  some  constraints,  to  make  sure  that  these  retailers  have  sys-
tems in place to prevent waste, fraud, and abuse, that they are not 
coming  up  with  phantom  coupons  and  defrauding  the  government. 
So, all of those things are, sort of, balanced together in our rule. 
But,  no,  I  absolutely  agree,  it’s  very  important  that  we  have  as 
broad a cross-section of retailer participation as possible, that these 
devices  are  out  there,  as  widely  distributed  as  we  can  get  them. 
That’s why we didn’t rely simply on brick-and-mortar, but we’re al-
lowing  for  online  retailers  and  catalogs.  So,  I  think  there  will  be 
a broad distribution of these across, essentially, all communities. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  I  thank  you  very  much.  I  appreciate—Mr. 
Chairman—I  will  warn  you  that,  when  people  start  calling  in,  I’m 
giving them your numbers. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Snowe? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

26 

STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Well,  I  know,  from  the  outset,  when  we  considered  this  whole 
transition,  almost,  I  guess,  10  years  ago,  could  be  more  than  that, 
that  this  was  one  of  the  driving  concerns,  the  fact  that,  you  know, 
we’re  going  to  get  ahead  of  the  consumer  in  this  process.  And  now 
that we have a definitive time, in terms of the deadline, and being, 
you know in 2009, in February 2009, and you still have 40 million 
households and, you know, 60 to 70 million television sets that will 
require this conversion, I mean, that’s a monumental undertaking. 
Now, I know that both of your agencies have websites. I’d be in-
terested  in  knowing,  Mr.  Kneuer,  if  you  could  explain  to  the  Com-
mittee  as  to  how  many  people  have  been  visiting  your  website. 
What  type  of  information  or  feedback  are  you  getting  from  con-
sumers?  Does  it  engage  the  consumer?  I  know,  we  have  looked  at 
it,  and  it  seems  to  be,  probably,  you  know  not  user-friendly,  in 
terms  of  engaging  the  consumer  in  how  this  is  all  going  to  work, 
more practical information. So, can you describe what kind of feed-
back  and  traffic  that  you’re  getting  from  this  website?  Because 
that’s  going  to  be  crucial.  That  can’t  be  the  only  thing.  That’s  just 
one dimension to this enormous problem. But it’s going to be public 
education, without question. 

The  Horowitz  Associates  found  that  approximately  60  percent  of 
consumers  weren’t  even  familiar  with  the  DDT—DTV  transition 
that’ll  affect  them  in  this  digital  transition,  and  only  25  percent 
could  even  discuss  it  in  any  detail.  So,  we  really  do  have  a  long 
ways to go in this process. 

Mr.  KNEUER.  I’m  happy  to  get  you  the  numbers  on  the  number 

of web hits we’ve had at our webpage, and DTV.gov. 

What  I  can  tell  you  is—based  on  the  most  recent  meeting  of  the 
broad DTV Transition Coalition that includes the broadcasters and 
the industry participants they’ve got their own webpages. 

Currently,  the  vast  majority  of  the  traffic  to  their  webpages  is 
being driven by ours. So, consumers are starting out coming to the 
Government, looking at DTV.gov. We’ve got links to the other com-
mercial  sites.  My  expectation  and  anticipation  is,  as  the  education 
campaign  ramps  up,  and  the  broadcasters  and  others  engage  in 
their  activity,  that  ratio  will  shift  dramatically,  so  consumers  will 
be  made  aware  of  the  transition  by  this  broad  industry  campaign. 
We intend to slipstream behind that, making sure that, as they are 
notifying  people  about  the  broader  transition,  they  are  also  direct-
ing  them  to  us  so  they  can  find  out  about  this  program  we  have 
that  will  give  financial  assistance  to  those  consumers  who  need  it. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Do  you  have  an  agency  that’s  designing  your 
websites?  I  mean,  do  you  have  any—I  think,  certainly,  that  you 
would  want  to,  you  know,  probably  reexamine  it  from  that  stand-
point. 

OK. Ms. Seidel? 
Ms. SEIDEL. We have the DTV.gov website, and I can get you the 
number of hits and what feedback we have been receiving on those. 
I don’t have it with me. 

But  the  number  of  hits  to  the  website  have  increased  signifi-
cantly,  even  from  October  of  this  past  year.  And,  in  terms  of  feed-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

27 

back once people visit it, we do get e-mails from people about DTV 
questions.  And  I  don’t  recall—and  we’ll  check—but  I  don’t  recall 
input  about  how  to  modify  the  site  itself.  But,  then  again,  as  I 
think  I  mentioned  earlier,  we  are  working  with  a  number  of  com-
munity  organizations  and  organizations  representing  the  people 
that  you  all  have  talked  about,  and  one  of  the  things  we  do  ask 
them  is  whether  there  are  ways  that  we  can  make  our  website 
more  friendly.  But  then,  also,  we  recognize  that  not  everyone  uses 
the  Internet.  How  else  can  we  reach  the  consumers  and  the  con-
stituencies that you serve? 

But  we  do  have,  on  the  DTV.gov  website,  one  of  the  pieces  to 
that  is  a  DTV  Deputy  Program  Quiz.  We’ve  received  very  positive 
feedback  on  that  piece  of  it,  in  particular,  because  it  is  geared  to-
ward students, who we know, in many cases, may be more techno-
logically  savvy  than  their  parents  and  grandparents,  and  we  go 
through, What is DTV? And what is the difference between the dif-
ferent  types  of  DTV?  When  is  the  DTV  transition  occurring?  And 
what  might  it  mean  for  you?  And  what  might  you  need  to  do,  or 
your  families  and  your  friends  and  other  ones—other  people  you 
know—need to do, to be sure that you’re ready, come February 17, 
2009? So, that is one piece of the website that I know we have got-
ten very favorable feedback. But we constantly look for ways to im-
prove  it.  So,  to  the  extent  you  all  have  suggestions,  we  would  wel-
come them. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  do  you  think  $5  million  is  sufficient  for  a 

national campaign to educate the public? 

Ms.  SEIDEL.  You  know,  I  would  refer  to  what  the  Chairman  has 
said, and I think what we have been endeavoring to do is to maxi-
mize,  with  the  resources  that  we  have,  our  ability  to  reach  people. 
Certainly,  to  the  extent  additional  resources  were  made  available, 
we could enhance the campaign. I think the Chairman has spoken 
about  some  of  the  things  he  would  do  with  the  additional  2008 
funds,  like  making  sure  that  we  have  brochures  and  information 
about  the  transition  in  grocery  stories  in  communities  where  we 
know  there  may  be  a  high  percentage  of  over-the-air  users,  and 
being  able  to  run  some  print—you  know,  doing  some  PSAs  our-
selves, and certainly direct mail. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  you  know,  given,  you  know,  this  monu-
mental task, and the number of TV sets and households remaining 
to  make  this  transition  to  digital,  you  know,  I  would  suggest  hav-
ing some kind of measurement, in terms of deadlines, to accomplish 
this  goal.  Can  you  measure  it  by  the  converter  box  purchases? 
What  can  you  measure  it  by?  And  you  should  have  timelines, 
frankly, so that it can go through this process through 2008. Other-
wise,  you’re  going  to  converge,  in  2009,  and  we’re  going  to  have  a 
disaster on our hands. 

Mr.  KNEUER.  We’re  going  to  be  able  to  measure  the  take  rate  of 
the  coupons,  and  then,  as  the  coupons  are  actually  redeemed— 
under  the  statute,  the  coupons  expire  after  3  months,  and  I  think 
we  can  expect  that  a  lot  of  consumers  will  request  these  coupons, 
go  into  a  retailer,  and  then  decide  to  take  some  other  path,  either 
buy  a  set-top  box  with  more  functionality,  buy  a  television,  do 
something  else.  That  coupon,  then,  would  not  be  redeemed.  We’ll 
be  able  to  track  the  coupons  going  out,  as  they’re  redeemed,  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

28 

those coupons that aren’t redeemed and expire after 3 months. So, 
we’ll have very real time tracking of how consumers are taking ad-
vantage  of  our  program,  where  our  resources  are,  and  the  amount 
of money that we have left. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  you  should  have  a  timeline  for  all  that— 
I  mean,  certainly  to  know  how  many  are  outstanding,  and  having 
measurement  along  the  way,  so  it  doesn’t  all  converge  in  2009.  I 
mean, you really should have that calendar and measurement and 
standards,  so  that  further  outreach  or  other  efforts  have  to  be  un-
dertaken in order to accomplish this goal. 

One  other  question.  You  know,  I  come  from  a  small  rural  state, 
and the National Association of Broadcasters estimates that 90 per-
cent  of  the  full-power  stations  will  already  be  transmitting  both 
digital  and  analog,  and  the  conversion  will  be  fairly  seamless,  but 
there  are  10  percent  or  so—and  there  are  certainly  some  stations 
in  my  state—that  will  have  to  have  an  immediate  flash  cut.  So,  is 
there a procedure in place to address that, to make sure that that’s 
seamless, as well? 

Mr. KNEUER. On the full-power stations? 
Senator SNOWE. The smaller stations. 
Mr.  KNEUER.  The  low-power  stations,  we’ve  got  additional  pro-
grams,  under  our  responsibility,  where  we  will  provide  translators 
for the low-power stations, so that, immediately upon the transition 
in 2009, where the high-power stations drop off, the LPTV stations 
will  be  able  to  have  translators  to  continue  transmitting  to  their 
communities.  A  second  program  will  give  them  additional  re-
sources, to actually upgrade their translators to go to all-digital. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Cantwell? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  Kneuer,  I’m  glad  you  brought  up  the  coupons,  because  my 
understanding  is  they  are  for  90  days,  and  obviously  they’ll  be 
available  at  the  beginning  of  2008.  So,  do  you  think  that  all  the 
set-top  boxes  will  be  available  for  purchase,  at  that  point  in  time? 
Mr.  KNEUER.  Certainly  we  expect  there  will  be  set-top  boxes  in 
the marketplace in January of 2008. If, for whatever reason, we got 
information there were not boxes available, and consumers were re-
questing coupons—the statute requires us to be able to process cou-
pons as of January 1, 2008—if there was a disconnect between the 
availability of boxes, we wouldn’t want consumers to get those cou-
pons,  have  them  expire  in  90  days,  and  not  have  boxes.  So,  we 
would hold, and not deliver, the coupons to consumers if there was, 
for some reason, a disconnect in the supply chain of the boxes. 

Senator CANTWELL. How are you going to do that? 
Mr.  KNEUER.  We  will  have  information  from  the  retailers,  from 
the manufacturers, we’ll know how many boxes are out there. If we 
get  an  influx  of  coupon  requests,  but  we  have  information  that 
there aren’t, in fact, boxes—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

29 

Senator CANTWELL. Are you going to look up every ZIP Code and 
then  find  a  retailer  in  that  neighborhood,  and  then  see,  and,  if  it 
is, then you’ll send out the coupon, and, if not—— 

Mr. KNEUER. I wouldn’t expect that the supply issues, to the ex-
tent  there  were  any,  would  be  small-market  specific.  There  would 
either  be  a  problem  that  they  didn’t  get  the  manufacturing  com-
pleted,  or  there  was  only  a  few  manufacturers  that  had  gotten 
boxes  done.  Like  I  said,  we’ve  had  a  huge  expression  of  interest 
from manufacturers, so I would expect there to be—— 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So,  you’re 

thinking  Wenatchee  and 
Ellensburg  and  the  Tri-Cities  and  Walla  Walla,  and  all  these 
places, they’re going to, on January 1, 2008, have available set-top 
boxes for purchase. 

Mr.  KNEUER.  That’s  everything  that  we’ve  seen  in  the  response, 

that there would be boxes in place. 

Senator CANTWELL. And if they’re not, somehow are you going to 
look up that ZIP Code, and you’re not going to send out the coupon. 
Mr.  KNEUER.  Those  are  issues—like  I  said,  if  we  received  infor-
mation  that  there  were  geographic  problems  on  the  distribution  of 
boxes, we would have to go back to our vendor and make sure they 
have systems in place to deal with that. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  But  there  are  no  inventory  requirements,  is 

that right? 

Mr. KNEUER. That’s right. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  So,  what  happens  if  they  run  out  of  stock? 
Mr. KNEUER. Like I said, I think our intention, in designing this 
program, was to create it, to make it as easy as possible for manu-
facturers  and  retailers  to  participate,  while  doing  what’s  respon-
sible to guard against waste, fraud, and abuse. So, we have adopt-
ed a standard for the boxes that was the broad industry-suggested 
standard. We adopted criteria for retailers that represented a broad 
consensus  among  the  retail  industry.  So,  we  have,  to  the  extent 
possible,  wanted  to  encourage  as  much  marketplace  participation 
as possible, but, no, we don’t have regulatory authority to reach out 
to  every  retailer  in  American  and  say,  ‘‘Here  are  the  number  of 
boxes  you  need  to  carry.  You  know,  make  sure  you  have  this,’’ 
that’s not the way the program is currently set up. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Well,  I  think  you’re  hearing  a  lot  of  frustra-
tion  from  members.  It’s  one  of  the  reasons  I’ve  been  concerned 
about the dates that we had set for this transition, is just how long 
it  takes.  Just  because  technology  exists  doesn’t  mean  that  you  can 
deploy  it  that  quickly.  And  so,  how  we’re  setting  these  mandates 
up,  and,  if  you  ask  me,  there  is  a  high  potential  for  a  train  wreck 
here. You’re basically, as we ask these questions, telling us, ‘‘Well, 
we’ve  not  optimized  the  program  for  that.  We  optimized  the  pro-
gram for the retailers.’’ Well, it’s the consumers we’re asking to do 
something.  We’re  asking  them  to  make  a  big  transition.  We’re 
using  resources  to  try  to  help  that,  but  a  plan  that  basically  has 
coupons available, and maybe not products available, and then the 
coupon expires, all of this. 

So,  I  think  there  is  a  great  deal  of  confusion  that  could  go  on  in 
this plan, and I suggest, Mr. Chairman, that we, certainly, look at 
upping the education process of the American consumer about this. 
I  think  the  notion  that  this  many  people  can  transition  over  to  an 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

30 

adoption  of  new  technology  without  significant  problems  is  being 
shortsighted. 

But,  let  me  turn  to  Ms.  Seidel  for  a  second,  because  one  of  the 
other issues is about—you know, I think in our state we have four 
different  television  markets,  36  different  television  stations,  and 
over 2,000 translator stations. Some of those translators are in sub-
urban  communities,  some  of  them  are  in  small  rural  communities. 
I’m trying to understand, if you’re a consumer sitting at home and 
getting  a  signal  from  Seattle,  but  through  a  translator  station 
that’s  saying  that  you  need  to  make  this  switch.  Isn’t  that  process 
going to be confusing for some people? Because they might actually 
have  a  signal  that  they  never  have  to  switch,  or  at  least  there  is 
no  deadline  in  the  legislation  that  says  that  they  have  to  switch. 
Ms. SEIDEL. I think the point you raise about that issue and the 
potential  for  confusion  is  one  we’ve  talked  about,  as  well,  and  we 
do  envision  putting  together  consumer  materials  to  help  answer 
questions  before  they  arise,  and  to  build  awareness,  and  to  try  to 
help  address  questions  that  the  consumer  may  have,  if  that’s  the 
situation. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  What’s  the  answer  you’re  going  to  give  to 
that  consumer,  who’s  getting  the  signal  from  a  Seattle  station 
that’s emphasizing the digital transition and so, they listen to that, 
and  they  go  out  and  make  a  set-top  box  purchase;  then  they  find 
out  from  their  neighbor,  ‘‘Guess  what?  You  never  had  to  do  that. 
We  didn’t  have  to  do  that,  because  we  have  a  translator  station 
here.  You  didn’t  have  to  go  make  that  purchase.’’  So,  now  they’ve 
signed up for digital broadcast, the extra dollars that it takes to get 
the digital broadcast, they went out and made the purchase for the 
set-top box, and they find out from their neighbor they didn’t have 
to. How are you going to deal with that? 

Ms.  SEIDEL.  Well,  I  think  part  of  it  is  an  education  and  aware-
ness  issue.  But  I  do  think  you’re  right,  that  it  will  be  fact-specific 
in many cases, so it’s hard to do, like, an across-the-board outreach 
on  an  issue  that  will  vary  from  one  area  to  another,  but  those 
issues—I  think  they  are  important  ones,  and  I  think  they’re  ones 
that  will,  you  know,  have  the  potential  for  raising  questions  for 
consumers,  and  certainly  it’s  one  I’ll  take  back  and  see  what  more 
we could do on our side. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Is  there  a  hard  date  after  which  the  tele-
vision broadcasters—after February 2009, will we still have analog 
broadcasts? 

cease. 

Ms.  SEIDEL.  On  February  17,  2009,  analog  broadcasting  would 

Senator CANTWELL. But—— 
Ms.  SEIDEL.  But  the  low-power—I  think,  in  terms  of  the  low- 
power  stations,  the  analog  translators,  that  would  be  a  different 
issue, and, I think, related to the question you just posed. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Again,  I’m  asking,  because,  obviously,  these 
low-powered  stations—this  notion  and  the  uses  of  ‘‘white  space’’ 
and where we’re going with that. I think having a plan as it relates 
to the percentage of, you know, class A and low-power stations, and 
what you’re really going to do with them—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

31 

Ms.  SEIDEL.  Well,  I  think  probably  the  best  thing  for  me  to  do 
is  to  take  your  questions  back  to  the  Media  Bureau,  who’s  looking 
at those issues, and make sure that we get back to you. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Smith? 

STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
For the record, I would note that some of the concerns being ex-
pressed—and,  I  think,  specifically  by  Senator  McCaskill,  we  in-
cluded, in last year’s bill, a requirement for broadcasters to inform 
the  public  through  public  service  announcements.  And  I  guess  my 
question is—you know, obviously they have an incentive to do this, 
do  you  know  of  a  date,  a  plan  of  theirs—have  they  shared  it  with 
you—as to when they begin to meet this requirement to make pub-
lic service announcements? 

Mr.  KNEUER.  Not  with  the  level  of  granularity  that  would  say, 
‘‘On this date, we will commence PSAs at the following volume, and 
then we will ramp up to a higher volume, and that, by the end, we 
are  going  to  do  an  explicit  number  of  PSAs  and  commit  X  number 
of  resources.’’  They  have  committed  that  they  will  be  conducting  a 
broad campaign that will be based on polling on awareness, focused 
on  pockets  of  population,  based  on  what,  the  level  of  penetration, 
what their awareness is, and ramping it up as we get closer to the 
date. 

Senator SMITH. Well, I—obviously, they understand their own in-

terests in this, do they not? 

Mr. KNEUER. I would think so. 
Senator  SMITH.  OK,  you’ve  got  that—you’ve  gotten  that  sense 

from them. 

You  know,  my  own  experience,  as  a  dad,  is  that  my  kids—and 
I  suspect  all  of  yours—are  really  up  on  this,  and  they’ve  already 
made  the  transition,  and  they’re  already  with  high  definition,  and 
they’re  demanding  mom  and  dad  get  new  TVs.  And  I  know  that 
has  happened  in  our  household.  But  I  suspect  that  the  AARP  is 
correct in their concern about, specifically, the elderly. I know we’re 
sort  of  beating  a  dead  horse  here,  because  we’ve  mentioned  this 
over and over again, but obviously we mention it because of the ob-
vious concern that many who are not part of the high-tech age are 
intimidated  by  it,  don’t  know  what  to  do  or  where  to  go,  and  are, 
frankly, subject to exploitation through fraudsters and others. And 
I really think that needs to be the focus of your efforts. 

To  that  end,  Senator  Pryor  and  I  sent  a  letter  to  Secretary 
Gutierrez and to FCC Commissioner Martin—it was to them joint-
ly—and we asked them to do a number of specific things: to jointly 
prepare  a  program  that  has  an  explanation  of  the  DTV  transition, 
including its effective date and who is affected; second, instructions 
to determine whether a television’s—a television will receive a dig-
ital  signal,  and,  if  not,  the  options  to  ensure  reception  of  a  digital 
signal,  and  the  related  cost;  to,  third,  inform  related—information 
related  to  the  National  Telecommunications  and  Information  Ad-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

32 

ministration  Digital-to-Analog  Converter  Box  Coupon  Program; 
and,  fourth,  tips  on  how  to  avoid  potential  fraudulent  schemes  re-
lated to the DTV transition that may target the elderly. 

Do you know whether the commissioner or the Secretary have re-

sponded to that, have you gotten directions to this—— 

Mr. KNEUER. Well, we’ve got the letter, and we’re preparing a re-
sponse  for  you.  Each  of  the  things,  that  I  think  you  called  out  in 
your  letter,  are  things  that  we’ve  been  looking  at  and  working  on, 
either  directly,  through  our  relationship  with  seeking  a  vendor  to 
fulfill this coupon program for us, or through our collaboration with 
other  Federal  agencies  that  have,  as  a  responsibility,  reaching  out 
to  elderly  communities,  our  partnership  with  AARP.  So,  we’ll  cer-
tainly  be  getting  back  to  you  with  more  detail  on  each  of  those 
points. But all of those things are things that we’re focused on. 

I think—— 
Senator SMITH. But—— 
Mr. KNEUER.—one thing—sorry. 
Senator SMITH. No, go ahead. 
Mr.  KNEUER.  One  thing,  with  regard  to  seniors  and  the  elderly, 
is that relative to other age groups, they actually watch a little bit 
more  television.  And  so,  to  the  extent  that  most  of  this  cam-
paign—— 

Senator  SMITH.  I’m  not  sure  that’s  possible,  when  I  think  about 

my sons watching. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator SMITH. But you—you’re probably—— 
Mr. KNEUER. It’s high-school kids, and—— 
Senator SMITH.—right. 
Mr. KNEUER.—then it ramps up. But it’s—for 55–64, it’s an aver-
age of 2.6 hours a day. By the time you get above 75, it’s more than 
4  hours  a  day.  So,  they’re  going  to  be  recipients  of  a  lot  of  this 
broadcast  information  about  that.  That  being  said,  we  need  to 
make sure that, as they respond to this, that they’re not taken ad-
vantage of, as you said, by people who may seek to do that. 

Senator SMITH. Do you have any other comments, Ms. Seidel? 
Ms.  SEIDEL.  If  I  might.  I  do  think  the—I  think  the  first  couple 
of  points  that  you  mentioned,  about  having  information  available 
to  the  elderly  that  would  explain  to  them  how  to  find  out  whether 
or  not  what  they  have  is  a  digital  television,  or  what  they  would 
need  to  do,  and  making  sure  to  explain  what  the  transition  is  and 
when  the  transition  date  is,  and  providing  information  for  them 
about  what  options  are  available  for  them  to  continue  viewing 
broadcast  television,  come  the  completion  of  the  transition—we  do 
have  a  DTV  fact  sheet  that  includes  all  of  those  elements,  and  it 
also links to the NTIA website and information about the coupon— 
about converter boxes and the coupon program. 

In  addition  to  that,  we  are  definitely  emphasizing  our  efforts  to 
reach  out  to  organizations  that  represent  the  elderly.  And  the 
Leadership Council on Aging, as I understand it, is an umbrella or-
ganization that represents something more than—close to 60 orga-
nizations that help people who are elderly. 

And  then,  finally,  I  would  say  that  the  Commission  is  definitely 
committed  to  addressing  and  investigating  any  information  that  it 
gets  about  potential  scams  that  may  be  targeting  the  elderly,  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

33 

is definitely committed to taking enforcement action in this regard, 
just  as  it  has  done  with  respect  to  the  labeling  requirements  and 
violations  of  the  labeling  requirements.  So,  certainly  we  under-
stand your concern. 

Senator  SMITH.  Well,  thank  you  for  that.  I  look  forward  to  a  re-
sponse to the letter and appreciate anything and everything you do 
in regards to these very obvious, but very important, steps that we 
need  to  take,  as  a  government,  to  do  our  part  of  this.  I  think  the 
number  of  Senators  that  have  been  here  this  morning  are  an  indi-
cation  that  we  understand,  firsthand,  that,  while  we  get  lots  of 
calls  in  our  offices  about  Medicare  or  Social  Security  or  veterans 
issues, ranking right among those concerns is trouble with their TV 
sets, and so, that’s why we know the flood that’s going to come, and 
if we can make sure it’s not a tsunami, that would be great. 

Thanks. 
Mr. KNEUER. If I could put—— 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Mr. KNEUER.—in a plug for our—— 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Thune? 
Mr.  KNEUER.  As  I  say,  we’ve  supplied  our  pamphlets,  in  both 
Spanish  and  English,  to  every  member  of  the  Senate  and  of  the 
House  of  Representatives,  supplied  a  PDF  link.  So,  to  the  extent 
you are getting constituent concerns about this, we’ve got informa-
tion that I think can be helpful. 

Ms. SEIDEL. As do we. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Thune? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator  THUNE.  And  they’re  all  watching  C–SPAN,  so  they’re 
going  to  make  sure  that  they’re  following  all  this  that  has  hap-
pened. So—— 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  THUNE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Vice  Chairman 
Stevens,  for  holding  this  hearing.  I  also  want  to  thank  our  wit-
nesses for their testimony. 

And  the  digital  transition  is  coming.  It’s  going  to  be  here  in  18 
months,  and  I  think  it’s  important  for  this  committee,  as  well  as 
the  agencies  and  groups  that  are  represented  on  our  witness  pan-
els,  to  do  their  part  in  highlighting  the  coming  transition.  There 
are  a  lot  of  other  groups—industry  groups  that  will  also  be  re-
quired  to  play  an  important  role.  But,  as  we  all  know,  change 
comes  easier  for  some  than  others,  and  our  younger  generations 
are  going  to  be  more  able  to  easily  adapt  to  the  digital  transition. 
My  daughters  seem  to  intuitively  know  how  to  operate  their  iPods 
without reading the instructions, but our older generations, myself 
included,  I  think  will  probably  find  a  lot  of  these  changes  a  little 
harder  to  deal  with.  And  I  know  the  clock  on  my  parents’  VCR  is 
still  blinking  12  o’clock,  so  I  think  that’s  probably  an  indication  of 
what we may be dealing with. 

But,  in  South  Dakota  we  have  12.2  percent  of  our  households 
who rely on free over-the-air broadcast television, which represents 
about  36—almost  37,000  households.  And  I’m  sure  a  lot  of  those 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

34 

households  are  older  or  lower-income  families.  And  so,  what  we’re 
hearing  from  our  witnesses  this  morning,  I  think,  reinforces  the 
fact  that  it’s  these  households  that  are  going  to  be  most  impacted 
by the digital transition. And it’s my hope that, through efforts like 
what  we’re  doing  here  today,  we  can  highlight  the  coming  transi-
tion, help get people prepared for the change. 

I’ve got a couple of questions. This one, I’ll direct to either of Ms. 

Seidel or Mr.—do you say it ‘‘Kneuer’’? 

Mr. KNEUER. Kneuer. 
Senator THUNE. Kneuer. 
Ms.  Seidel  mentioned,  in  her  testimony,  that,  as  of  March  1, 
2007, all television receivers shipped in interstate commerce or im-
ported into the United States must have digital capabilities. Retail-
ers  are  obviously  still  allowed  to  sell  current  inventory.  But  when 
do you believe there will be no more analog televisions for sale? 

Ms.  SEIDEL.  At  this  point,  I  wouldn’t  speculate  but  I  can  cer-
tainly  take  your  question  back  and  see  if  some  of  my  other  col-
leagues  in  the  agency  have  a  good  estimate  for  you.  But  I’m  not 
sure I would have a good answer for you. 

Mr.  KNEUER.  I’m  not  sure  we  have  good  market  data  on  that.  I 
think  the  important  thing—and  I  think  the  Commission’s  been 
doing  good  work  in  this  regard—is  making  sure  that  the  retailers 
have clear labeling in the stores. There are consumers who actually 
may  want  one  of  those  old  analog  TVs  that  are  cheap,  so  they  can 
hook it up to a video game or cable set-top box or whatever it may 
be. So, there are consumers who are going in, who, you know, may 
very well want to make an informed choice to purchase one of those 
sets.  The  critical  thing  is  that  it’s  an  informed  choice  and  that 
there isn’t confusion in the marketplace as those last sets do move 
through. 

Senator  THUNE.  In  your  testimony,  Ms.  Seidel,  you  mentioned 
that  the  FCC  staff  had  inspected  1,089  retail  stores  around  the 
country  to  see  how  well  retailers  are  informing  consumers  about 
the  impending  transition  and  complying  with  the  new  labeling  re-
quirements, and you mentioned 262 citations that were issued dur-
ing  those  inspections.  That’s  about  a  76  percent  score  for  those  re-
tail  outlets,  those  stores.  As  far  as  grades  go,  that’s  not  quite  an 
F, but it’s a long ways from an A or a B. What do you think needs 
to be done to improve that labeling compliance at retail stores? 

Ms.  SEIDEL.  A  couple  of  things.  One  thing,  I  think,  which  seems 
to  always  occur  is,  once  there  are  enforcement  actions  taken,  it 
does  seem  to  get  attention  from  others,  from  other  companies 
around  the  country.  So,  I  think  the  fact  that  enforcement  action 
has been swift, and has been consistent, will help. 

Second,  we  have  been  working  with  the  Consumer  Electronics 
Retailers  Council,  who  has,  in  conjunction  with  the  FCC,  put  out 
a joint advisory to the retailers, reminding them of the labeling ob-
ligation  and  the  requirement.  And  I  think  that,  too,  will  help,  be-
cause  we  do  have  the  commitment  of  that  organization  to  help  us 
in  this  regard,  and  I  think  that,  the  consistent  and  continuous  en-
forcement action, when it’s appropriate, will be helpful. 

Senator  THUNE.  What  happens  when  you  issue  a  citation?  I 
mean, is there some sort of consequence associated with that for a 
retailer? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

35 

Ms. SEIDEL. And, again, this is probably a better question for my 
colleagues  in  the  Enforcement  Bureau,  but  I  used  to  work  there. 
The  citation  indicates  that  it  appears  that  this  violation  has  oc-
curred, and warns them that, if it is occurs a second time, a Notice 
of  Apparent  Liability  could  be  issued,  and  actual  monetary  for-
feiture issued. So, they have a very clear incentive, after that cita-
tion,  to  fix  the  problem.  And,  historically,  you  know,  that  is  gen-
erally the case. 

Senator THUNE. Citation will get their attention—— 
Ms. SEIDEL. Yes. 
Senator  THUNE.—in  other  words.  OK.  And  when  you  choose  are 
you  selective  about  how  you  audit,  or  is  that  sort  of  random  retail 
stores around the country? And—— 

Ms.  SEIDEL.  That  question,  I  will  have  to  take  back  to  my  col-
leagues  in  the  Enforcement  Bureau  and  let  you  know.  But  I  can 
tell you that enforcement of these issues is, indeed, a high priority 
for  the  Chairman  and  the  Commission.  And  so,  I  will  get  the  an-
swer to your specific question, but it will be one that will be ongo-
ing effort. 

Senator  THUNE.  We’ve  got  a  billion  and  a  half  allocated  for  the 
Digital  Conversion  Box  Program,  and  my  understanding  is  that 
NTIA  is  going  to  use  the  first  $990  million  to  distribute  $40  cou-
pons  to—for  converter  boxes,  on  a  first-come  first-serve  basis. 
There’s  no  means  test  and  no  requirement  for  a  household  to  cer-
tify  that  they  solely  rely  on  the  over-the-air  broadcasts  for  tele-
vision  viewing.  And  I  guess  my  question  would  be,  What  was 
NTIA’s  rationale  for  that  decision?  And,  you  know,  you’ve  got  the 
other $550-million contingency fund, and have indicated that that’s 
going to be used differently. My question, I guess, if you could give 
us  a  little  bit  background  into  what  your  thought  process  was—— 

Mr. KNEUER. Sure. I think the—— 
Senator THUNE.—with regard to that. 
Mr.  KNEUER [continuing].  The  legislative  history  made  it  clear 
that  this  was  intended  to  be  a  broad  program,  that  the  transition 
is  essentially  going  to  affect  all  television  households,  so  the  pro-
gram  should  be  as  broadly  applicable  as  possible.  So,  that’s  why, 
for  the  first  $990  million,  we’ve  said,  essentially,  any  U.S.  house-
hold,  without  any  restrictions  of  any  kind,  can  participate  in  the 
program. 

The  second  pool  of  money,  we  had  a  different  criteria  for  that, 
where  we  have  limited  access  to  those  dollars  to  households  that 
self-certify  that  they’re  exclusively  over-the-air,  that  they  don’t  re-
ceive  cable  or  satellite  on  some  set  in  the  house.  Our  thinking  on 
that  was  that  to  maximize  the  possibility—the  likelihood  that  no 
household—household  that  would  otherwise  lose  television  serv-
ice—doesn’t  have  access  to  some  financial  assistance,  if  they  need 
it.  So,  if  we  go  through  the  first  billion  dollars,  and  the  money  is 
now limited to an additional $500 million, make sure that 500 mil-
lion  goes  as  far  as  possible  to  make  sure  that  no  household  would 
actually  lose  television  service,  absent  that  resource.  So,  house-
holds  that  are  ineligible  for  the  second  $500  million  still  have  ac-
cess to television, either through cable or satellite. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

36 

Senator  THUNE.  And  do  you  have  pretty  firm  estimates  about 
whether  that’s  going  to  be  enough  money  and,  in  those  two  pools, 
is going to be sufficient to deal with the—— 

Mr.  KNEUER.  Given  the  take-up  of  digital  televisions—as  I  said, 
the numbers I’ve seen are that by the end of this year it’ll be more 
than 85 million digital set-tops in American households—given the 
penetration  of  cable  and  satellite,  given  some  of  the  polling  that 
we’ve seen with regards to, what do consumers intend to do at the 
end  of  this  transition?  You  know,  you  take  a  focus  group,  and  you 
educate them, say, ‘‘It’s coming in February, your options are: sub-
scribe  to  cable,  subscribe  to  satellite,  buy  a  digital  television,  buy 
your  own  set-top  box  that  has  some  degree  of  functionality  beyond 
what  is  eligible  under  the  rule,  or  participate  in  this  government 
program.’’  Lots  of  consumers  indicate  that  they  are  going  to  effec-
tuate  this  transition  on  their  own.  Aside  from  the  program,  even 
exclusively  over-the-air  households  I  think  a  lot  of  consumers  are 
going to take these coupons and go into a store and say, ‘‘You know 
what?  That  digital  TV  is  actually  what  I  want,’’  and  the  coupon 
won’t  be  redeemed.  So,  given  the  consumer  acceptance  of  DTV  in 
the marketplace, as we’re currently seeing it, given the options con-
sumers  have  to  effect  the  transition  on  their  own,  I’m  confident 
that the—with the full $1.5 billion, we’ll have enough money. 

Senator THUNE. Well, I appreciate your answers to the questions, 
and  I  would  just,  again,  say  that  this  is  going  to  be—getting  this 
right  is  going  to  be  important  for  a  lot  of—particularly,  seniors,  in 
my  state  at  least—the  television  is  a  kind  of  a  lifeline  and—in 
those—particularly in those cold winter months, it is especially im-
portant.  And  I  think  that  making  sure  that  this  transition  occurs 
smoothly is going to be critical. So, I hope that, as it moves forward 
and—we’ll  continue  to  have,  I  think—all  of  us,  probably,  on  this 
committee—an  ongoing  interest  in  that  process,  and  what  we  can 
do to be helpful. 

So, thank you for your testimony. 
Mr. KNEUER. Thank you. 
Senator THUNE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
Mr.  Secretary  and  Ms.  Seidel,  I  thank  you  very  much  for  your 

testimony, it’s been very helpful. Thank you. 

Ms. SEIDEL. Thank you. 
Mr. KNEUER. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. We will be submitting more questions, if we may. 
Our  next  panel  consists  of  a  member  of  the  AARP  Board  of  Di-
rectors, Ms. Nelda Barnett; the President and CEO of the National 
Hispanic Media Coalition, Mr. Alex Nogales; the Vice President/Di-
rector  of  Public  Policy  of  Leadership  Conference  on  Civil  Rights, 
Ms. Nancy Zirkin. 

While  they’re  assembling,  I’d  like  to  announce  that  this  com-
mittee  will  be  conducting  another  hearing  in  September,  and  at 
that  time  we  will  have  industry  witnesses,  including  electronic 
manufacturers, retailers, broadcasters, and cable. 

I’m certain you’ve been waiting a long time, and I know that you 

want to go ahead, so may I call upon Ms. Nelda Barnett. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

37 

STATEMENT OF NELDA BARNETT, MEMBER, 

BOARD OF DIRECTORS, AARP 

Ms.  BARNETT.  Thank  you  very  much,  and  good  morning.  There 

it is. I’m sorry. 

Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee. 

Thank you for this opportunity to testify on behalf of AARP. 

AARP  has  been  actively  engaged  in  addressing  DTV  transition 
issues before Congress and Federal agencies; in particular, with the 
FCC  and  NTIA.  AARP  has  urged  policymakers  to  lighten  the  bur-
den  of  this  transition  for  all  consumers,  particularly  older  Ameri-
cans. 

Based  on  data  provided  by  the  National  Association  of  Broad-
casters, 38 percent know that there is going to be a transition, and 
only 10 percent know what the date is on it. 

AARP’s testimony centers on five different points and the impact 

it will have on the transition for older Americans: 

Number  one,  a  large  percentage  of  analog-only  households  are 
older  Americans,  who  will  be  disproportionately  affected  by  the 
DTV  transition,  and  who  are  not  prepared.  The  approximately  20 
million analog-only households should be the primary focus of edu-
cation  and  outreach  campaigns.  Some  40  percent  of  these  house-
holds include at least one person 50 years of age or older. 

A recent study conducted by CENTRIS reports that older Ameri-
cans  are  more  likely  to  be  found  in  over-the-air  households,  and 
are,  therefore,  more  vulnerable  to  the  consequences  of  the  digital 
television transition. In the most recent quarter of 2007, the study 
found  that  24  percent  of  households  with  Americans  65  and  older 
receive  their  TV  programming  over  the  air,  compared  with  19  per-
cent of the younger population. 

The  CENTRIS  study  revealed  that  41  percent  of  older  Ameri-
cans,  as  compared  to  55  percent  of  those  younger,  have  purchased 
a TV set in the past 3 years. This suggests older Americans are not 
likely to be as exposed to DTV transition messages from electronic 
retailers. 

The second point: Older Americans confront additional challenges 
related  to  obtaining  and  redeeming  converter  box  coupons  and  in-
stalling the converter boxes. For older persons, there are additional 
challenges involved in the DTV transition that should be addressed 
over the next several months. Among these are mobility issues, in-
firmity, isolation from other family members, and distance from re-
tail  centers  to  purchase  the  box.  It  may  be  difficult,  if  not  impos-
sible, for many older people to leave their homes to purchase a con-
verter  box.  Another  hurdle  would  be  the  installation  process.  Mov-
ing  the  TV  to  get  to  the  back  of  the  set  and  connect  the  box  will 
be  difficult  for  frail  and  disabled  persons,  including  many  elderly 
individuals living on their own. 

Number  three,  coupons  should  not  be  distributed  until  sufficient 
numbers  of  converter  boxes  are  available  for  purchase  in  retail 
stores.  A  mechanism  should  be  implemented  to  inform  consumers 
about local stores that have the coupon-qualified boxes in stock. 

Number  four,  older  Americans  are  particularly  vulnerable  to  po-
tential coupon fraud and abuse, and could be subjected to retailers’ 
up-selling  efforts.  It  is  also  critical  that  steps  be  taken  to  protect 
consumers  against  scam  artists  who  could  sell  unsuspecting  con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

38 

sumers  counterfeit  or  illegally  duplicated  converter  box  coupons. 
There  may  also  be  efforts  to  sell  legitimate  free  converter  box  cou-
pons. Further, consumers will need clear information to prepare for 
the possibility of retailers up-selling. 

The  fifth  one,  a  coordinated  outreach  and  education  campaign 
should  include  Federal,  State,  and  local  agencies,  and  programs 
serving consumers who have the greatest risk of losing their broad-
cast  television  service,  particularly  vulnerable  population  groups, 
such as the low-income and the older people. 

In  conclusion,  on  the  morning  of  February  18,  2009,  consumers 
in  households  around  the  country  could  discover  that  they  are  un-
able to view their regular morning TV programs. These consumers 
will  be  confused,  frustrated,  and  angry  that  this  important  infor-
mation  and  entertainment  source  in  their  home  is  no  longer  oper-
ational,  through  no  fault  of  their  own.  We  all  have  an  important 
role  to  play  in  keeping  consumers  connected.  AARP  is  committed 
to doing their part to educate the nearly 39 million AARP members 
around  the  country  about  the  DTV  transition  and  Converter  Box 
Coupon Program. AARP and the older Americans we represent are 
also counting on policymakers to take the necessary steps to ensure 
that all consumers, regardless of age, income, native language, and 
other factors, stay connected. 

Thank you, sir. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Barnett follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF NELDA BARNETT, MEMBER, BOARD OF DIRECTORS, AARP 
Good morning. Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee, thank you for this 
opportunity  to  testify  today  on  behalf  of  AARP  regarding  consumer  issues  related 
to the digital television transition. My name is Nelda Barnett. I’m from Owensboro, 
Kentucky, and I am a member of AARP’s Board of Directors. 

AARP has been actively engaged in addressing DTV transition issues before Con-
gress  and  Federal  Government  agencies.  We  have  worked  closely  with  the  Federal 
Communications  Commission  (FCC)  and  the  National  Telecommunications  and  In-
formation  Administration  (NTIA),  holding  numerous  meetings  with  senior  officials 
to  discuss  AARP’s  concerns  regarding  the  DTV  transition.  AARP  has  urged  policy-
makers to mitigate the burden of this transition for all consumers, particularly older 
Americans.  We  supported  the  establishment  of  the  converter  box  coupon  program 
and we continue to call attention to the importance of comprehensive consumer edu-
cation and outreach to inform all affected individuals about the DTV transition and 
converter box coupon program. 

My remarks this morning will focus on the following issues concerning the transi-

tion’s impact on older Americans. 

1.  A  large  percentage  of  analog-only  households  are  older  Americans  who  will 
be disproportionately impacted by the DTV transition and who are not prepared 
for the transition; 
2.  Older  Americans  confront  additional  challenges  related  to  obtaining  and  re-
deeming converter box coupons, and installing the converter boxes; 
3. Coupons should not be distributed until sufficient numbers of converter boxes 
are available for purchase at retail stores. There should be a mechanism imple-
mented  to  inform  consumers  about  local  stores  that  have  the  coupon-qualified 
converter boxes in stock. 
4.  Older  Americans  are  particularly  vulnerable  to  potential  coupon  fraud  and 
abuse and could be subjected to retailers’ ‘‘upselling’’ efforts. 
5.  A  coordinated  outreach  and  education  campaign  should  include  Federal  and 
state agencies and programs serving consumers who are at the greatest risking 
of  losing  their  broadcast  television  service,  particularly  vulnerable  population 
groups such as older Americans. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

Background 

39 

Older  Americans  have  had  a  growing  reliance  on  television  technology.  TV  offers 
more than just entertainment. For older Americans, television can be a primary con-
nection  to  the  outside  world—providing  life-saving  weather  forecasts,  public  safety 
announcements,  information  on  government  and  politics,  and  community  news.  In 
fact,  Americans  aged  50  and  above  watch  the  greatest  average  number  of  hours  of 
television a day, almost 5.5 hours.1 

The  transition  to  digital  television  will  offer  consumers  real  benefits:  better-qual-
ity  transmission  and  a  wider  range  of  programming  options.  However,  as  Congress 
has  recognized,  there  are  significant  costs  associated  with  this  transition.  Con-
sumers with analog sets will need to purchase a new set with an integrated digital 
component,  connect  the  set  to  a  cable  or  satellite  service,  or  purchase  a  converter 
box.  These  costs  are  not  inconsequential.  But  for  older  Americans  additional,  non- 
monetary costs may be especially challenging: the inconvenience of searching for an 
available  converter  box,  potential  difficulties  in  attaching  the  converter  box  to  the 
back of their set, and confusion regarding the transition itself. 

1.  A  large  percentage  of  analog-only  households  are  older  Americans  who  will  be 
disproportionately impacted by the DTV transition and who are not prepared for the 
transition. 

According  to  a  2004  survey,2 about  21  million  households  rely  on  over-the-air 
(OTA) broadcast-only television. A more recent Nielsen Media Research report esti-
mates  that  the  current  number  of  OTA  households  is  approximately  20  million. 
These  are  the  consumers  who  will  be  without  television  service  at  the  point  of  the 
transition, and they should be the primary focus of any education and outreach cam-
paign,  and  the  priority  households  for  receipt  of  the  converter  box  coupons.  The 
GAO  reported  that  of  these  OTA  households,  about  48  percent  have  incomes  under 
$30,000. Moreover, approximately 8 million—or 40 percent—of these households in-
clude at least one person over the age of 50.3 

Recently,  CENTRIS  released  data  from  a  survey 4 conducted  to  assess  the  prob-
ability  that  older  Americans  are  more  likely  to  be  found  in  over-the-air  households 
and  are  therefore  more  vulnerable  to  the  consequences  of  the  digital  TV  transition. 
The survey’s findings revealed that older Americans: 

1. Over age 65 are more likely to be found in OTA households; 
2.  As  a  group,  are  less  likely  to  have  purchased  a  new  TV  in  the  past  3  years; 
3. Are less likely to have HDTV capabilities in their households; and 
4. Are less likely to own a digital TV. 

ing television services as the digital transition is completed; 

The survey analysis conducted by CENTRIS concluded: 
• Older Americans over 65 are a more vulnerable group with respect to maintain-
• Older  Americans  will  not  be  as  exposed  to  DTV  transition  messages  from  elec-
• The  population  of  older  Americans  will  need  special  focus  in  efforts  to  educate 

tronic retailers as will younger members of the population; and 

the public with respect to the end of the DTV transition. 

2.  Older  Americans  confront  additional  challenges  related  to  obtaining  and  re-

deeming converter box coupons, and in installing the converter boxes. 

There are additional challenges involved with the transition to DTV that confront 
older  Americans,  and  they  should  be  addressed  over  the  course  of  the  next  several 
months.  Among  these  may  be  mobility  issues,  infirmity,  isolation  from  other  family 
members, and distance from retail centers in rural communities. It may be difficult, 
if  not  impossible,  for  many  older  Americans  to  leave  their  home  to  purchase  a  con-
verter  box.  Although  it  may  be  possible  to  purchase  the  converter  box  online,  there 
are  a  number  of  older  Americans  who  do  not  have  Internet  access  in  their  home. 
Another  potential  barrier  for  all  consumers  will  be  the  converter  box  installation 
process.  Assuming  the  consumer  is  able  to  request  coupons  and  purchase  the  con-
verter  box,  the  next  hurdle  will  be  the  installation.  The  process  could  require  mov-
ing  the  television  to  get  to  the  back  of  the  set  and  connect  the  box,  which  could  be 
difficult for frail or disabled persons, including many older Americans living on their 
own.  Of  course,  there  is  also  the  possibility  that  the  actual  connection  process  re-
quired will be difficult for some to master. 

1 Nielsen Media Research, 2005. 
2 Knowledge Networks/SRI, Home Technology Monitor Ownership Survey, Spring 2004. 
3 Nielsen Media Research TV Household Estimates, 2003–2004. 
4 CENTRIS, Analysis of Older Americans and the Digital TV Transition, July 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

40 

AARP  urges  Congress  to  work  with  the  appropriate  Federal  agencies  to  address 
these issues in the next several months, to assist older Americans and other vulner-
able individuals with these challenges. 

3.  Coupons  should  not  be  distributed  until  sufficient  numbers  of  converter  boxes 
are  available  for  purchase  at  retail  stores.  A  mechanism  should  be  implemented  to 
inform  consumers  about  local  stores  that  have  the  coupon-qualified  converter  boxes 
in stock. 

The  success  of  the  converter  box  coupon  program  involves  some  uncertain  timing 
elements. There are some consumers who will act expeditiously, perhaps in response 
to  initial  consumer  outreach  and  education  campaigns,  and  request  converter  box 
coupons  when  they  first  become  available  in  January  2008.  According  to  NTIA’s 
rules, the coupons will expire 90 days after they are mailed to the requesting house-
holds.  AARP  has  heard  from  a  variety  of  sources  that  the  converter  boxes  may  not 
actually be available in electronic retail establishments until April of 2008. If a con-
sumer  receives  the  coupon  in  early  January,  it  could  actually  expire  prior  to  the 
availability  of  converter  boxes  in  stores.  It  is  critical  that  NTIA  coordinate  the  dis-
tribution of the coupons with the availability of the converter boxes for purchase in 
stores. 

AARP is also concerned that older Americans, particularly those with limited mo-
bility,  may  have  to  travel  to  several  retail  establishments  before  locating  a  store 
that  has  coupon-qualified  converter  boxes  on  the  shelves.  In  any  one  community, 
there could be a limited number of electronics stores that would stock the boxes for 
sale, and some stores may carry only a limited number of boxes. The NTIA will need 
to  work  with  the  selected  coupon  vendor  to  design  a  mechanism  to  track  the  loca-
tions  of  stores  that  have  stocked  the  coupon-qualified  boxes  for  purchase,  and  up-
date  this  information  on  a  regular  basis.  Consumers  should  be  able  to  access  this 
information and locate the store in their area with boxes in stock, by calling a toll- 
free number as well as by going to an Internet website. 

4.  Older  Americans  are  particularly  vulnerable  to  potential  coupon  fraud  and 

abuse and could be subjected to retailers’ ‘‘upselling’’ efforts. 

As  recent  consumer  protection  history  has  shown,  whenever  there  is  an  oppor-
tunity  for  scam  artists  to  take  advantage  of  the  consumer,  it  will  happen.  The  con-
verter box coupon program provides such an opportunity. It is critical that the nec-
essary  steps  be  taken  to  protect  consumers  against  scam  artists  who  could  sell 
unsuspecting  consumers  counterfeit  or  illegally  duplicated  converter  box  coupons. 
Assuming such steps are taken, there will still be an opportunity for legitimate free 
converter  box  coupons  to  be  offered  for  sale.  Assisting  consumers  to  avoid  this  un-
necessary  extra  cost  will  require  educational  materials  to  inform  consumers  as  to 
how they can receive a valid coupon, and to offer tips on how to avoid scam artists. 
Consumers will need to be savvy shoppers to understand, and perhaps reject, an-
ticipated efforts by retailers to sell enhanced converter boxes that do not qualify for 
the  coupon  discount,  or  encourage  consumers  to  purchase  new,  digital  sets.  The 
process of ‘‘upselling’’ can be avoided by providing consumers with clear information 
on the types of converter boxes qualifying for use of the coupon, and for tips on what 
they need in their home to continue television reception. 

5.  A  coordinated  outreach  and  education  campaign  should  include  Federal  and 
state agencies and programs serving consumers who have the greatest risking of los-
ing their broadcast television service, particularly vulnerable population groups such 
as low income and older Americans. 

Congress  should  work  with  the  NTIA  and  FCC  to  construct  a  coordinated  effort 
to  educate  the  public  about  the  transition  with  other  Federal,  state  and  local  gov-
ernment  agencies  that  serve  vulnerable  population  groups,  including  older  Ameri-
cans and low-income households. 

There  are  a  number  of  Federal  assistance  programs,  such  as  those  administered 
by  the  U.S.  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services,  that  could  be  tapped  to 
help.  For  example,  the  aging  network  represents  a  great  resource.  The  Administra-
tion  on  Aging,  State  Units,  and  Area  Agencies  on  Aging  (AAA’s),  along  with  the 
wide range of service providers they fund, such as Meals on Wheels and local senior 
centers, could play critical roles in education and outreach. 

Low  income  assistance  programs,  such  as  Supplemental  Security  Income  (SSI), 
the  Low  Income  Home  Energy  Assistance  Program  (LIHEAP)  and  the  Commodity 
Supplemental  Food  Program,  should  also  be  engaged  in  distributing  information  to 
the  low  income  population  most  vulnerable  in  this  transition.  Congress  should  re-
quest  a  specific  plan  that  addresses  the  coordination  of  efforts  among  these,  and 
other government agencies. 

AARP  recognizes  that  the  task  of  educating  the  general  public  about  the  DTV  is 
enormous—and  the  $5  million  designated  by  Congress  for  consumer  outreach  and 
education related to the converter box coupon program is inconsequential, given the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

41 

task at hand. However, these are the resources that are available and many organi-
zations  will  need  to  step  up  to  inform  their  own  members.  AARP  is  committed  to 
doing  our  part  to  educate  the  38  million  AARP  members  around  the  country  about 
the DTV transition and the converter box coupon program. 

AARP  has  several  publications,  including  the  AARP  Magazine  and  Bulletin  that 
reach  over  24  million  households.  In  addition,  the  AARP  Spanish  language  maga-
zine,  Segunda  Juventud,  is  distributed  to  over  1  million  Spanish-speaking  older 
Americans. AARP is also planning other media activities and an outreach campaign 
to inform and educate mid-life and older American members. Materials will be pre-
pared  and  distributed  to  AARP  state  offices  and  volunteer  chapters,  to  implement 
a  coordinated  outreach  plan  to  extend  AARP’s  reach  into  the  community  at-large. 
Conclusion 

On  the  morning  of  February  18,  2009,  just  a  little  over  eighteen  months  from 
today, consumers in households around the country could discover that they are un-
able  to  view  their  regular  morning  television  programs.  These  consumers  will  be 
confused,  frustrated,  and  angry  that  this  important  information  and  entertainment 
source  in  their  household  is  no  longer  operational,  through  no  fault  of  their  own. 
Thousands  of  telephones  will  ring  in  communities  around  the  country  as  well  as 
right  here  in  hundreds  of  Congressional  offices.  Constituents  will  call  their  elected 
officials to complain and ask: ‘‘What has happened to my television set?’’ 

We  all  have  an  important  role  to  play  in  keeping  consumers  connected.  AARP  is 
committed to doing its part. AARP, and the older Americans we represent, are also 
counting on policymakers to take the necessary steps that will ensure all consumers, 
regardless of age, income, native language, or other factors, stay connected. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
May I call upon Mr. Nogales. 

STATEMENT OF ALEX NOGALES, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

NATIONAL HISPANIC MEDIA COALITION 

Mr. NOGALES. Thank you, Senator. 
Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee, thank you for giv-
ing  me  the  opportunity  to  speak  to  you,  on  behalf  of  the  National 
Hispanic  Media  Coalition,  on  preparing  consumers  for  the  digital 
television  transition.  NHMC  has  13  chapters  across  the  Nation, 
and  is  also  secretariat  for  the  National  Latino  Media  Council, 
which consists of 17 of the largest Latino civil rights and advocacy 
organizations across the Nation. 

We  joined  the  DTV  Transition  Coalition,  and  have  been  working 
with  Consumer  Electronics  Retailers  Coalition  on  their  Spanish- 
language  translations  as  part  of  their  outreach,  as  well  as  on  the 
outreach itself. 

You  have  my  complete  statement  on  record,  but  allow  me  to 

highlight the following points: 

The DTV transition consumer educational program is grossly un-
derfunded, and needs to be supplemented. The $5 million allocated 
to  NTIA,  and  the  $2  million  that  the  FCC  has  for  consumer  edu-
cation,  translates  to  2  and  half  cents  per  person  for  300  million 
people here in the United States. When Berlin, Germany, made the 
transition with less than 1 million people, it spent 33 cents per per-
son. What a difference! 

Consumers need to be informed on the basics, such as: 
How to figure out if they have an analog or digital television set. 
I don’t know. And I know very few people that know the difference. 
Two,  that  their  analog  TV  sets  will  go  dark  in  less  than  2  years 
without  a  converter  box,  if  they  are  not  connected  to  cable  or  sat-
ellite services. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

42 

Three, they need to know that they don’t need to purchase a new 
television  set,  that  over-the-air  television  will  continue  to  be  free, 
will  offer  them  many  more  channels,  and  will  give  them  a  better 
picture, even on an older set. 

Four,  consumers  need  to  be  able  to  access  user-friendly  instruc-
tions on how to connect the converter boxes to their television sets, 
and  be  able  to  contact  a  live  person  to  help  them  with  the  connec-
tions if they have difficulties. 

Since  a  predominantly  high  number  of  Spanish  speakers  will  be 
impacted  by  this  transition,  bilingual  and  bicultural  staff  is  essen-
tial. We have the number of 21 million households that have rabbit 
ears, at this point. A full third of those, 7 million, are Latinos. For 
any educational campaign to be effective, it’s not only relevant that 
the  person  be  able  to  speak  the  language,  but  also  understand  the 
culture.  English-written  materials  should  not  be  translated  to 
Spanish,  as  they  are  seldom  culturally  effective.  Materials  to  the 
Spanish-speaker  should  be  original,  and  the  appropriate  place  to 
advertise  to  Latinos  should  be  fully  considered.  For  example, 
Latinos, more than anyone else, consume a great deal of radio pro-
gramming  because  of  the  fact  that  many  of  our  jobs  are  outdoors. 
Already,  we  have  seen  coordination  problems  that  can  come  up 
in  major  national  campaigns  that  involve  translation.  Specifically, 
‘‘converter  boxes’’  was  translated  in  four  different  ways  by  the 
NAB,  the  DTV  Transition  Coalition,  the  National  Telecommuni-
cation  and  Information  Administration,  NTIA,  and  the  Federal 
Communications  Commission.  In  fact,  the  FCC  was  using  two  dif-
ferent terms for the boxes. It is imperative that we avoid confusing 
the  consumer  by  using  different  terms  for  key  terms.  Let’s  agree 
on  a  translation,  and  remain  consistent.  We  prefer 
‘‘caja 
convertidora,’’  because  it  is  a  precise  translation  of  ‘‘converter 
boxes’’ and easy for the Spanish consumer to understand. 

I  wish,  Mr.  Chairman,  that  I  was  as  optimistic  as  some  of  the 
other  witnesses  have  been,  in  terms  of  this  being  a  smooth  transi-
tion.  I  am  not.  I  just  came  from  a  meeting  of  the  National  Latino 
Media Council membership, and, I have to tell you, out of the eight 
people  that  were  there—they’re  all  very  sophisticated,  very  smart 
individuals  in  the  entertainment  and  also  in  the  newspaper  busi-
ness—and not one of them really knew very much about the digital 
transition.  They  knew  the  term,  but  they  don’t  know  the  mechan-
ics. 

As  to  the  advertising,  we  can’t  really  leave  it  to  cable,  and  we 
can’t  really  leave  it  to  the  broadcasters.  As  you  have  heard,  there 
is no firm date as to when they are going to start with their PSAs. 
I  don’t  doubt  their  intentions.  I  don’t  doubt  their  intentions  at  all, 
but  the  fact  of  the  matter  remains  that  they  still  cannot  give  us 
a date when they’re going to start their advertising campaign, their 
PSAs,  and  everything  else.  So,  that  being  the  case,  there  are  no 
firm  dates,  and  we’re  all  kind  of  in  the  air  that  this  is  going  to 
occur. 

Now,  I  have  it  not  only  from  the  NAB  that  this  is  the  case,  but 
also  from  the  presidents  of  several  of  the  organizations  involved, 
both the Spanish-language and English-language networks. They’re 
going  so  fast  with  their  business,  and  they  live  and  die,  as  you 
know, by the overnight ratings, and they have their hands full. So, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

43 

this  is  a  priority,  but  a  priority  that  they  keep  thinking,  that  is 
way  down  in  the  future,  not  realizing  that  it’s  happening  in  18 
months. So, until we have timeframes that tell us specifically when 
this  is  going  to  begin,  I  can  tell  you  that  I’m  not  optimistic  at  all 
that we’re going to reach the American public. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Nogales follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ALEX NOGALES, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

NATIONAL HISPANIC MEDIA COALITION 

Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee, thank you for giving me the oppor-
tunity  to  speak  to  you  today  on  behalf  of  the  National  Hispanic  Media  Coalition’s 
(NHMC) regarding preparing consumers for the Digital Television Transition. 

My  name  is  Alex  Nogales;  I  am  the  President  and  CEO  of  NHMC.  NHMC  is  a 
21-year-old non-profit Latino civil rights, media advocacy organization based in Los 
Angeles,  California.  We  have  13  chapters  nationwide  and  our  mission  is  to:  (1)  im-
prove  the  image  of  American  Latinos  as  portrayed  by  the  media;  (2)  increase  the 
number  of  American  Latinos  employed  in  all  facets  of  media;  and  (3)  advocate  for 
media  and  telecommunications  policies  that  benefit  the  Latino  community.  NHMC 
is  also  the  Secretariat  for  the  National  Latino  Media  Council,  a  national  coalition 
comprised  of  15  of  the  largest  Latino  Civil  Rights  Advocacy  groups  in  the  Nation. 
Additionally,  NHMC  is  an  Executive  Committee  Member  of  the  Media  and  Democ-
racy  Coalition,  a  national  coalition  comprised  of  many  of  the  largest  mainstream 
media  advocacy  groups  in  the  Nation.  Recently,  NHMC  joined  the  DTV  Transition 
Coalition membership. 

As you know, the transition from analog to digital television brings great opportu-
nities  but  also  great  challenges.  In  2005,  the  Government  Accountability  Office 
(GAO) reported that 21 million U.S. households rely solely on over-the-air television. 
Of  these  households,  about  48  percent  earn  less  than  $30,000  per  year  per  house-
hold.  These  21  million  households  include  a  disproportionate  number  of  Spanish 
language speakers: one-third or 7 million people who will be impacted by the digital 
transition are Spanish language speakers. It is also estimated that one-third of the 
21 million households include residents over the age of fifty, many of whom live on 
fixed-incomes; millions of these households will be in rural areas or will include per-
sons  with  disabilities.  Further,  according  to  the  National  Association  of  Broad-
casters  (NAB),  African-American  households  are  22  percent  more  likely  to  rely  ex-
clusively on over-the-air reception. In summary, households impacted by the digital 
transition  will  be  minorities,  low-income  families,  living  on  a  fixed-income,  and  re-
quiring  a  well-defined  and  more  specific  educational  outreach  campaign  then  the 
overall  population  requires.  I  will  refer  to  the  groups  that  I  just  mentioned  as  our 
target groups or target population. 

A  more  specific  educational  outreach  campaign  to  these  target  populations  must 
be  pro-active,  consumer-friendly  and  culturally,  linguistically  sensitive.  Appropriate 
outreach to disabled, minority, rural, low-income and senior citizens is essential. For 
example,  the  public  service  announcements  promoting  this  initiative  must  include 
closed  captioning  for  the  hearing  impaired  and  should  be  available  in  Spanish  as 
well as other relevant languages. The call-in centers handling the voucher questions 
must  include  live-operators  that  include  Spanish-speakers,  wait  time  should  not  go 
over  10  minutes  and  must  accommodate  telecom  relay  services  that  make  it  easier 
for  the  deaf  to  communicate  by  phone.  And  it  is  not  sufficient  to  translate  the 
English  materials  to  Spanish.  Those  doing  the  outreach  must  communicate  with 
Spanish  speakers  in  a  manner  where  their  message  will  be  understood.  Cultural 
awareness here is fundamental for the outreach campaign to be successful. Already, 
we have seen coordination problems that can come up in major national campaigns 
that involve translation. ‘‘Converter boxes’’ was translated in four different ways by 
the  NAB,  the  DTV  Transition  Coalition,  the  National  Telecommunications  and  In-
formation  Administration  (NTIA),  and  the  Federal  Communications  Commission 
(FCC).  The  FCC  was  actually  using  two  different  terms  for  the  boxes.  It  is  impera-
tive  that  we  avoid  confusing  the  consumer  by  using  different  words  for  key  terms. 
Let’s  agree  on  a  translation  and  remain  consistent.  We  prefer  ‘‘caja  convertidora’’ 
because  it  is  a  precise  translation  of  converter  boxes  and  easy  for  the  Spanish  con-
sumer to understand. 

Congress  allocated  $5  million  to  NTIA  to  educate  consumers  about  the  DTV  cou-
pon  program.  The  FCC  has  only  requested  $1.5  million  for  consumer  education  ef-
fort in its 2008 budget request. That’s a total of $6.5 million to educate 300 million 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

44 

people,  about  2  cents  per  person.  This  is  a  seriously  under-funded  consumer  edu-
cation  program.  When  Berlin,  Germany  transitioned  to  DTV,  it  spent  $984,000  to 
educate about three million people, or 33 cents per person. Why is the City of Berlin 
willing to make this expenditure on its citizens, but our Nation is not? Furthermore, 
the FCC does not plan to begin its public education campaign until 2008, when the 
converter  box  coupons  and  the  boxes  are  expected  to  be  available  on  January  1, 
2008.  In  our  opinion,  the  FCC  campaign  is  starting  a  year  late.  Consumers  need 
to  know  about  the  DTV  transition  generally,  and  the  coupon  program  specifically, 
as  soon  as  possible,  but  certainly  well  before  NTIA  makes  the  coupons  available  to 
the public. We need to start seeing Y2K-level consumer education efforts soon or you 
will  have  a  big  problem  on  your  hands.  Consumers  need  to  be  aware  of  how  the 
transition  will  impact  them.  They  need  to  know  (1)  how  to  figure  out  if  they  have 
an  analog  or  digital  TV;  (2)  that  their  analog  TV  sets  will  go  dark  in  less  than  2 
years without a converter box if they are not connected to cable or satellite service; 
(3)  they  need  to  know  that  they  don’t  need  to  purchase  a  new  TV  set,  that  over- 
the-air  television  will  continue  to  be  free,  will  offer  them  many  more  channels  and 
will  give  them  a  better  picture  even  on  an  older  set;  (4)  consumers  need  to  be  able 
to  access  user-friendly  instructions  on  how  to  connect  the  converter  boxes  to  their 
TV  sets  and  be  able  to  contact  a  live  person  to  help  them  with  the  connection  if 
they have difficulties . 

We  strongly  encourage  the  NTIA  to  bring  in  community  based  organizations 
(CBOs)  that  represent  the  disabled,  minority,  rural  and  senior  advocates  that  will 
help develop a thorough outreach plan to ensure that the outreach and educational 
component  of  this  program  is  solid  and  has  no  holes.  We  can’t  afford  to  make  mis-
takes  on  a  program  that  is  a  first-come,  first-serve  program  where  the  populations 
that are in most need of these coupons run the risk of being the last to hear about 
the program. 

NAB estimates that about 5 percent of the population knows that the digital tran-
sition  is  taking  place.  I  suspect  the  NAB  is  being  optimistic.  Not  many  people  out-
side the Beltway have heard about the digital transition and its possible impact on 
their households. Not enough has been done so far to educate our target groups that 
this  historic  change  is  taking  place  and  that  their  over-the-air  televisions  will  go 
dark after February 17, 2009 without a converter box. The outreach program needs 
to  start  today  and  more  effort  needs  to  be  made  by  the  NTIA,  FCC  and  the  DTV 
Transition  Coalition  to  reach  community-based  organizations  that  focus  on  the  tar-
get  groups.  We  need  more  people  outside  of  D.C.  to  know  about  the  transition  and 
be  able  to  communicate  in  a  clear  and  understandable  manner  to  those  that  will 
be impacted. 

Finally,  NHMC  objects  to  the  two-phase  plan  that  NTIA  is  proposing  for  the  dis-
tribution of the coupons. In the first phase, where $990,000,000 is allocated, all U.S. 
households  will  be  able  to  apply  for  up  to  two  $40  coupons  per  household  to  pur-
chase  converter  boxes.  The  second  phase  is  only  open  to  households  that  certify  in 
writing  that  they  rely  on  over-the-air  reception.  Once  the  $990,000,000  is  spent, 
those  that  apply  late  or  do  not  find  out  about  the  coupon  program  in  time  will  be 
burdened  by  an  added  certification  that  may  deter  them  from  applying.  Changing 
eligibility  mid-course  will  result  in  needless  customer  confusion.  Indeed,  the  certifi-
cation  will  be  a  deterrent  to  low-income  families,  especially  those  that  do  not  pre-
dominantly  speak  the  English  language.  Ladies  and  gentleman,  I  have  no  doubt 
that  the  disenfranchised  population  that  will  be  the  most  impacted  by  the  digital 
transition  will  be  the  last  to  apply  for  the  coupons.  This  being  the  case,  having  to 
certify  in  writing  that  they  rely  on  over-the-air  reception  is  just  adding  an  addi-
tional  burden  that  will  discourage  many  of  them  from  applying  for  the  converter 
boxes.  A  two  phase-plan  with  an  added  burden  for  those  that  are  hardest  to  reach 
doesn’t make a lot of sense. If the reason for this two-phase system is because NTIA 
thinks  there  is  a  likelihood  that  the  program  will  run  out  of  funds  before  all  the 
impacted  households  have  obtained  their  coupons,  then  NTIA  should  go  back  to 
Congress and ask for additional funding. 
Summary 

needs to be supplemented. 

• The DTV Transition consumer educational program is grossly under-funded and 
• We  need  to  start  seeing  Y2K-level  efforts  for  the  DTV  Transition.  Efforts  must 
be pro-active, consumer-friendly and culturally sensitive and they need to begin 
now.  Efforts  should  include  a  well-coordinated  campaign  that  includes  CBOs 
working closely with the NTIA. 
• Since  a  predominantly  high  number  of  Spanish-speakers  will  be  impacted  by 
this  transition,  bilingual  and  bi-cultural  staff  is  essential.  For  any  educational 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

45 

campaign  to  be  effective  it’s  not  only  relevant  that  the  person  be  able  to  speak 
the language but also understand the culture. 
• English-written  materials  should  not  be  translated  to  Spanish  as  they  are  sel-
dom  culturally  effective.  Materials  to  the  Spanish-speaking  should  be  original 
and the appropriate place to advertise to Latinos should be carefully considered. 
For example, Latinos more then anyone else consume a great deal of radio pro-
gramming. 
• We oppose a two-phase program that adds a burdensome requirement for those 
that  apply  later.  The  second-phase  certification  requirement  is  in  effect  a  de-
tractor. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Mr. Nogales. 
Ms. Zirkin? 

STATEMENT OF NANCY M. ZIRKIN, VICE PRESIDENT, 

DIRECTOR OF PUBLIC POLICY, LEADERSHIP CONFERENCE ON 

CIVIL RIGHTS (LCCR) 

Ms.  ZIRKIN.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye.  And  thank  you,  Sen-

ator Stevens. 

I am Nancy Zirkin, and I’m Vice President—— 
Senator STEVENS. Pull the mike up toward you, Ms. Zirkin. 
Ms. ZIRKIN. Is it on? 
Senator STEVENS. Yes. 
Ms. ZIRKIN. OK. Thank you. 
I’m  Nancy  Zirkin,  Vice  President  and  Director  of  Public  Policy 
with  the  Leadership  Conference  on  Civil  Rights.  Thank  you  very 
much  for  the  opportunity  to  testify.  It’s  a  very  important  issue  for 
the Leadership Conference. 

LCCR,  as  many  of  you  know,  is  our  Nation’s  oldest,  largest,  and 
most  diverse  coalition  of  nearly  200  national  civil  rights  and 
human  rights  organizations.  LCCR  is  also  a  founding  member  of 
the DTV Transition Coalition. 

The huge switch from analog into digital TV will have a profound 
impact on millions of Americans, as we have heard throughout this 
morning,  especially  seniors,  the  poor,  the  minority  communities, 
people  with  disabilities,  and  those  for  whom  English  is  not  their 
first language. 

And  the  reality  today,  as  Senator  Thune  said,  is  that  everybody 
needs  TV,  not  just  for  entertainment,  but  for  news,  both  local,  na-
tional, and worldwide. Imagine 9/11 without TV coverage and you’ll 
understand how important a working television is to the 21 million 
American households who now rely solely on free analog TV. 

LCCR believes that access to communications in the 21st century 
is  not  a  luxury,  but  a  fundamental  right  of  every  American.  The 
challenges involved in preparing Americans for the digital TV tran-
sition  are  of  such  magnitude  that  a  strong  Congressional  response 
is required. I think Senator McCaskill had it right; in the end, vot-
ers will look to Congress if their TVs go dark. 

LCCR applauds Congress, and both of you, for your leadership in 
this  transition,  and  for  recognizing  the  need  for  government  sup-
port to help consumers know about the coupon program, and about 
covering the cost for the transition for the converter boxes. But we 
are  troubled.  The  $5  million  allotted  by  Congress  to  educate  con-
sumers  about  the  coupon  program  is  not  nearly  enough  to  support 
the kind of public education campaign that we all know is required. 
Public  education  campaigns  are  not  unlike  State  election  cam-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

46 

paigns,  where  people  running  for  office  try  to  educate,  across  the 
board. The actual cost of Senate campaigns last year in California, 
Ohio,  Pennsylvania,  three  states  whose  combined  population  is 
about  21  million  households,  was  $39  million,  way  more  than  the 
$5 million allocated for the transition. 

Our  fear  is  that  the  people  who  will  be  most  affected  by  the 
change won’t hear about it and, therefore, won’t have access to the 
coupons.  We  are  also  concerned  that  our  most  vulnerable  popu-
lations  will  be  the  least  likely  to  receive  the  first-come,  first-serve 
limited  number  of  coupons  for  the  converter  boxes.  That  is,  unless 
Congress  ensures  that  a  comprehensive,  coordinated,  national  con-
sumer  education  effort  focuses  on  both  the  transition  and  the  cou-
pon program to be administered by NTIA. 

We heard Mr. Kneuer’s assertion on monitoring the program, but 
we believe Congress must determine that the coupons are going to 
those  who  need  them  most.  Sufficient  independent  research  is  re-
quired  to  determine,  early  on,  who  is  taking  advantage  of  the  cou-
pon program, so that NTIA knows how to respond, or whether and 
where  to  deploy  additional  funds  for  the  program.  We  believe  that 
the  government  can  play  an  important  role  in  conducting  this  re-
search  through  the  GAO,  with  Congress  tracking  the  whole  proc-
ess. 

NTIA  and  FCC  have  stated  their  commitment  to  educating  all 
consumers  about  the  transition  and  the  coupon  program,  but  a 
public  education  effort  must  be  done  by  all  agencies.  Each  agency 
should  serve  as  a  site  where  the  coupons  could  be  distributed. 
These efforts should be replicated at the State and local level. 

Unless  the  very  people  in  underserved  communities  who  rely  on 
free  TV  are  reached  early,  they  will  be  left  with  only  unaffordable 
actions.  It  is  a  complete  luxury  for  them  to  have  a  set-top  box  or 
to have to afford even a converter box. It is equivalent to 1 week’s 
food  for  a  poor  family.  Congress  can  make  sure  that  that  does  not 
happen. 

Finally,  let  me  say  that  LCCR,  through  our  member  organiza-
tions  representing  over  60  million  Americans,  will  do  our  part  to 
educate  consumers,  but  we  and  the  DTV  Transition  Coalition  can-
not  do  it  without  additional  help  and  oversight  from  the  Congress 
and NTIA. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Zirkin follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF NANCY M. ZIRKIN, VICE PRESIDENT, DIRECTOR OF PUBLIC 

POLICY, LEADERSHIP CONFERENCE ON CIVIL RIGHTS (LCCR) 

Chairman  Inouye,  Ranking  Member  Stevens,  and  members  of  the  Committee:  I 
am Nancy Zirkin, vice president and director of public policy of the Leadership Con-
ference  on  Civil  Rights  (LCCR).  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  in  today’s 
hearing on preparing consumers for the digital television transition. 

LCCR  is  the  Nation’s  oldest  and  most  diverse  coalition  of  civil  rights  organiza-
tions.  Founded  in  1950  by  Arnold  Aronson,  A.  Philip  Randolph,  and  Roy  Wilkins, 
the  Leadership  Conference  seeks  to  further  the  goal  of  equality  under  law  through 
legislative  advocacy  and  public  education.  LCCR  consists  of  approximately  200  na-
tional organizations representing persons of color, women, children, organized labor, 
persons with disabilities, the elderly, gays and lesbians, and major religious groups. 
Additionally,  LCCR  is  a  founding  member  of  the  DTV  Transition  Coalition,  a  large 
coalition  that  includes  as  members  the  Federal  Communications  Commission,  the 
U.S. Department of Commerce, industry groups, grassroots and membership organi-
zations,  manufacturers,  retailers,  trade  associations,  civil  rights  organizations,  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

47 

community groups. I am privileged to represent the civil and human rights commu-
nity in submitting testimony for the record to the Committee. 

Today, I would like to discuss what the government-mandated transition to digital 
television means for the communities LCCR represents, and what needs to be done 
to  ensure  than  no  community  is  left  in  the  dark.  Will  all  Americans  be  sufficiently 
educated  about  the  transition,  so  that  they  will  be  able  to  make  it  relatively  easy 
and  without  undue  economic  burden?  Moreover,  will  all  Americans  actually  receive 
the  benefits  of  digital  television,  including  High  Definition  Television  and  multi-
casting, or will they be deprived of these remarkable technological advances? 

While a wide range of private stakeholders in the broadcasting, cable, retail, and 
manufacturing  industries  are  already  working  hard  to  address  the  impact  of  the 
transition,  LCCR  believes  that  the  challenges  involved  in  preparing  Americans  for 
the  digital  television  transition  are  of  such  magnitude  that  a  strong  Congressional 
response is required. 
What’s at Stake 

Making  the  transition  to  digital  is  not  simply  a  matter  of  being  able  to  watch 
wrestling,  or  American  Idol,  or  reruns  of  Friends.  At  stake  in  the  transition  to  dig-
ital television is the ability of the Nation’s most vulnerable populations to maintain 
uninterrupted  access  to  their  key  source  of  news  and  information  and  emergency 
warnings:  free,  over-the-air  television.  It  would  be  a  great  tragedy  if  the  millions 
of  Americans  who  rely  on  free  TV  wake  up  after  February  17,  2009  and  find  that 
their TVs simply don’t work. 

A successful digital television transition will require well-informed consumers who 
can access what, for many, will be brand new technology. This cannot occur without 
a  comprehensive,  coordinated  national  consumer  education  effort  focusing  on  not 
only  the  transition  itself,  but  also  on  the  coupon  program  to  be  administered 
through  the  U.S.  Department  of  Commerce’s  National  Telecommunications  and  In-
formation Administration (NTIA). 

The  need  for  such  an  effort  is  particularly  important  for  the  communities  that 
LCCR  member  organizations  represent.  In  2005,  the  GAO  found  that  up  to  19  per-
cent,  or  roughly  21  million  American  households,  rely  exclusively  on  over-the-air, 
free  television.  According  to  the  GAO,  48  percent  of  households  that  rely  solely  on 
over-the-air television have incomes under $30,000. 

These  consumers  will  face  an  expensive  choice  to  continue  to  receive  a  television 
signal: subscribe to cable or satellite, buy a digital television set, or purchase a dig-
ital-to-analog  converter  box  without  assistance  from  the  government  through  its 
coupon program. All of these options cost money. Even an inexpensive converter box 
can cost more than a week’s food budget for many low-income families and for many 
elderly persons living alone and on Social Security. 

We are especially concerned because minority and aging households are dispropor-

tionately affected by the transition. 

rely on over-the-air television than are white and non-Hispanic households. 

• According  to  the  GAO,  non-white  and  Hispanic  households  are  more  likely  to 
• Of the 21 million over-the-air households, one-third (or seven million people) are 
Spanish-language  speakers,  according  to  the  testimony  of  Alex  Nogales,  Presi-
dent and CEO of the National Hispanic Media Coalition, before the House Sub-
committee on Telecommunications and the Internet in March 2007. 
• Eight million of the 21 million over-the-air households include at least one per-
son  over  50  years  of  age,  according  to  the  March  2005  testimony  of  Lavada 
DeSalles  on  behalf  of  AARP,  before  the  House  Subcommittee  on  Telecommuni-
cations and the Internet. 
• One-third  or  more  of  over-the-air  television  viewers  have  disabilities,  according 
• African  Americans  make  up  23  percent  of  over-the-air  households,  according  to 

to the American Association of People with Disabilities. 

the National Association of Broadcasters. 

LCCR  believes  that  access  to  communications  is  a  fundamental  right  of  every 
American. Given the impact the transition will have on all our most vulnerable com-
munities, LCCR applauds Congress for recognizing the need for a government com-
pensation  program  to  be  administered  by  NTIA  to  assist  with  the  transition.  But 
the process that has been created raises a number of troubling concerns. 
Funding 

First and foremost, we are deeply concerned that the $5 million that Congress has 
allocated to NTIA to educate consumers about the coupon program will be woefully 
inadequate  to  support  the  kind  of  public  education  effort  that  the  transition  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

48 

quires. Public education campaigns are not unlike state election campaigns in terms 
of  scope.  Therefore,  consider  California,  Pennsylvania,  and  Ohio,  whose  combined 
population  is  approximately  21  million  households—comparable  to  the  number  of 
households  that  will  likely  need  to  be  educated  on  the  digital  television  transition. 
The cost of a Senate campaign in Ohio in 2006 was nearly $9 million; for all three, 
it was approximately $39 million. 

The  lack  of  sufficient  resources  within  the  digital  television  transition  consumer 
education  effort  for  support  of  nonprofit,  social  justice,  or  community-based  organi-
zations  further  limits  the  scope  of  public  education  efforts  that  will  be  possible. 
LCCR  is  committed  to  working  with  our  community-based  organizations  to  make 
sure  their  members  know  about  the  transition  and  the  coupon  program.  However, 
we are skeptical about the success of these efforts without additional resources. We 
believe  that  the  costs  of  the  digital  transition  to  the  21  million  over-the-air  house-
holds  should  be  paid  for  by  the  ample  proceeds  generated  by  the  auctions  of  re-
claimed spectrum. 

If Congress wants the digital television transition and coupon program to succeed, 
it must adequately invest in an educational program that truly leaves no community 
behind.  We  strongly  urge  Congress  to  supplement  the  amount  of  funding  for  con-
sumer  education  efforts.  In  the  end,  voters  will  look  to  Congress  if  their  televisions 
go dark. 
Research and Oversight 

In addition to our concerns that those populations most in need will be least likely 
to know about the coupon program, LCCR is concerned that low-income and minor-
ity  communities,  seniors,  and  people  with  disabilities  will  be  least  likely  to  receive 
the first-come, first-served limited number of coupons. 

NTIA’s  Digital-to-Analog  Converter  Box  Coupon  Program  currently  contemplates 
what is essentially a two-phase process. Under the first phase, while the initial $990 
million  allocated  for  the  program  is  available,  all  U.S.  households—including  cable 
and  satellite  customers—will  be  eligible  to  request  up  to  two  $40  coupons  to  pur-
chase up to two, digital-to-analog converter boxes. Under the second phase, if NTIA 
requests  the  additional  $510  million  already  authorized  by  Congress,  then  house-
holds  that  certify  in  writing  they  rely  on  over-the-air  reception  will  be  eligible  for 
coupons. 

LCCR  urges  Congress  to  ensure  that  the  transition  to  digital  television  serves  to 
benefit all Americans. In order to do so, there must be a way for Congress to deter-
mine that coupons are going to those who most need them. 

• It is too early to comment on the oversight of government-funded consumer out-
reach,  since  the  Request  for  Proposals  (RFP)  award  to  provide  services  in  sup-
port  of  the  Digital-to-Analog  Converter  Box  Coupon  Program  has  not  yet  been 
made. 
• However,  it  is  clear  now  that  we  will  need  sufficient  independent  research  to 
determine  who  is  taking  advantage  of  the  coupon  program  during  the  first 
phase of the process, so that NTIA knows how to respond or whether and where 
to deploy additional funds. 
• The government can play an important role in conducting this research through 

the General Accounting Office, with Congress tracking the progress. 

Additional Governmental Outreach 

While both NTIA and the Federal Communications Commission are committed to 
educating  consumers  about  the  transition  and  the  coupon  program,  a  public  edu-
cation effort of this magnitude should not be limited to only a few agencies. 

state, and local level. 

• Ensuring  a  successful  transition  will  require  public  education  at  the  national, 
• At  a  minimum,  every  Federal  agency  should  be  required  to  participate  in  edu-
cational outreach, and if possible, serve as a site where coupons can be distrib-
uted. 

• These efforts should also be replicated at the state and local level. 

Conclusion 

I  want  to  acknowledge  that  despite  the  great  challenges  in  making  sure  that  all 
Americans know about the digital television transition and the coupon program, the 
transition  presents  great  opportunities.  Industry,  broadcasters,  manufacturers,  in-
terest groups, and Federal officials agree that digital TV offers viewers better qual-
ity transmission and a wider range of programming options. Because the digital sig-
nal has the ability to provide so much more information, it has the ability to provide 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

49 

more services to those who speak languages other than English and people with dis-
abilities (such as enhanced closed captioning and video description services). We do 
not know if the broadcasters are going to provide such services, but we do know that 
there  is  the  potential  to  do  so.  Thus,  the  transition  has  the  potential  to  open  the 
door  for  more  Americans  to  participate  fully  in  the  digital  age.  This  will  only  be 
true,  however,  if  all  families  will  be  able  to  access  digital  television  programming. 
Thank you for both the opportunity to speak today and for your leadership as we 
move  forward  in  addressing  the  digital  television  transition.  I  look  forward  to  an-
swering any questions you may have. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
The  population  of  the  United  States  is  about  five  times  the  size 
of the United Kingdom. the United States will spend $5 million for 
education.  The  British  Isles  are  spending  $400  million.  They  will 
be sending out individuals to vulnerable households, such as the el-
derly,  to  provide  them  with  individual  service  for  installation  and 
explanation. Their program of transition will begin in 2008 and end 
in 2012. Ours will begin in 2009. They’ve already started their edu-
cation program; in fact, a year ago. So, I can assure you that Con-
gress  has  heard  your  message,  and  we  will  do  something  about  it. 
Thank  you  very  much.  We  have  to  rush  off;  a  vote  is  on,  and 

they’re holding it up for us. 

Thank you. 
[Whereupon, at 11:55 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for holding this hearing on the transition to digital tel-

evision. We are on the cusp of a revolution in television. 

On  February  17,  2009,  just  a  little  more  than  a  year  and  a  half  from  today,  we 

will make the transition to digital television. 

The  DTV  transition  will  be  the  biggest  development  in  television  since  color  TV. 
Consumers will enjoy more programming, a clearer picture, a wider screen, and im-
proved  sound  quality.  And  the  transition  will  free  up  valuable  spectrum  that  can 
be used to improve public safety and to provide wireless broadband service. 

But  for  some  consumers,  the  DTV  transition  will  not  mean  improved  television 

service. Instead, it will mean no television service at all. 

Those  viewers  who  rely  on  free  over-the-air  broadcast  television  could  see  their 
TV  sets  go  black  on  February  17,  2009  unless  they  are  prepared  for  the  transition. 
Nearly 110,000 New Jersey households rely on over-the-air television. 

We  know  that  these  viewers  are  disproportionately  poor  and  elderly.  These  are 
households  that  need  television  for  their  news  and  to  learn  about  everything  from 
local storms to national emergencies. We can’t leave them in the dark. 

The  National  Telecommunications  and  Information  Administration  (NTIA)  has  a 
coupon program to help consumers who rely on over-the-air TV buy converter boxes 
for  their  television  sets.  But  that  program  will  only  work  if  consumers  know  about 
it. We need education programs so that all consumers are ready for the DTV transi-
tion. 

I  am  also  concerned  that,  even  with  the  DTV  transition  18  months  away,  there 
are  analog-only  television  sets  still  on  the  market.  I  want  to  know  what  is  being 
done  to  ensure  that  consumers  are  fully  informed  before  they  purchase  TVs  that 
may not work in the very near future. 

The  DTV  transition  presents  tremendous  opportunities.  But  we  must  make  sure 

that everyone can benefit from it. 

Thank you Mr. Chairman. 

NATIONAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS AND INFORMATION ADMINISTRATION 

Washington, DC, August 30, 2007 

Hon. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, 
U.S. Senate, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senator McCaskill: 

Thank  you  for  your  letter  following  up  on  my  testimony  before  the  Senate  Com-
merce,  Science,  and  Transportation  Committee  hearing  held  on  July  26,  2007,  re-
garding ‘‘Consumers and the Digital Television Transition.’’ I am pleased to respond 
to your letter. 

NTIA’s  goals  with  respect  to  certifying  digital-to-analog  converter  boxes  that  will 
be  eligible  for  purchase  with  coupons  are  twofold:  (1)  to  ensure  that  the  converter 
boxes  meet  the  required  performance  standards  set  forth  in  NTIA’s  Final  Rule  (47 
C.F.R. § 301 Technical Appendix 1); and (2) to adopt a certification process that will 
not add significant costs or delay to the development and production of coupon-eligi-
ble  converter  boxes.  The  core  technical  performance  requirements  are  based  on  the 
Advanced  Television  Systems  Committee  (ATSC)  Recommended  Practice:  Receiver 
Performance  Guidelines  ATSC  A/74;  Federal  Communications  Commission  (FCC) 
Rules;  and  industry  standards,  such  as  those  issued  by  the  Consumer  Electronics 
Association  (CEA).  NTIA  received  public  comments  on  its  proposed  certification 
process and carefully considered the suggestions that we adopt the well-established 
procedures  used  by  the  FCC  in  certifying  certain  types  of  new  products.  Field  test-

(51) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

52 

ing was not suggested and is not required in NTIA’s Final Rule. Further, NTIA and 
FCC  engineering  specialists  have  determined  that  laboratory  tests  performed  ac-
cording to the A/74 Guidelines will reliably predict performance in the field. 

Once  prototypes  are  ready,  participating  manufacturers  must  conduct  tests  or 
have  independent  laboratories  conduct  tests  to  demonstrate  that  each  converter 
model  meets  the  features  and  performance  specifications  set  forth  in  our  regula-
tions. The manufacturers are required to submit detailed certified test results, along 
with a sample of the tested equipment, to NTIA and the FCC laboratories. Working 
closely  with  the  FCC  to  review  the  performance  of  each  converter  box  while  in  the 
laboratory,  NTIA  will  certify  those  converter  boxes  that  meet  the  requirements. 
Manufacturers  will  then  be  notified  as  soon  as  possible  whether  or  not  each  model 
has been certified. 

In  addition,  NTIA  plans  to  purchase  and  randomly  test  certified  coupon-eligible 
converter  boxes  to  ensure  that—as  manufactured  and  marketed—they  conform  to 
the  certified  specifications.  If  a  converter  box  is  found  not  to  meet  NTIA’s  require-
ments, that model will no longer be eligible for the Coupon Program. 

NTIA  has  responded  to  several  technical  inquiries  and  has  posted  responses  to 
Frequently  Asked  Questions  on  its  website  to  help  manufacturers  understand  the 
requirements  in  order  to  help  them  to  comply.  Those  responses  can  be  found  at: 
http://www.ntia.doc/gov/dtvcoupon/manufacturerFAQ.html. 

With  regard  to  your  second  inquiry,  concerning  manufacturers’  prototypes  and 
testing  activities,  NTIA’s  Final  Rule  indicates  that  the  notices  of  intent  received 
from  manufacturers  shall  be  treated  as  business  confidential  and  proprietary  infor-
mation, and states that NTIA will not release this information unless otherwise re-
quired by law. NTIA has accepted notices of intent, test results, and prototypes from 
manufacturers  who  have  relied  on  NTIA’s  assurance  of  confidential  protection  for 
their  highly  proprietary  information.  The  Coupon  Program  relies  on  the  voluntary 
participation  of  manufacturers.  NTIA  has  not  requested  commitments  from  any 
companies  to  manufacture  converter  boxes  by  a  certain  date.  NTIA  is  aware,  how-
ever,  that  manufacturers  are  in  the  process  of  negotiating  distribution  and  mar-
keting contracts with retailers and others. This activity is consistent with our expec-
tation  that  converter  boxes  will  be  available  for  purchase  by  consumers  in  early 
2008. 

NTIA  will  be  very  active  in  the  coming  months  publicizing  the  Coupon  Program 
and the coupon-eligible converter boxes. On August 15, 2007, NTIA awarded a con-
tract  to  IBM  to  support  the  Coupon  Program.  Among  its  responsibilities,  IBM  will 
work to achieve NTIA’s consumer education objectives with the assistance of an ex-
perienced  public  relations  and  communications  firm.  IBM  has  hired  Ketchum,  a 
global public relations firm with proven ability to drive consumers to action, as dem-
onstrated by their leadership in educating more than 40 million seniors about Medi-
care’s Prescription Drug Coverage. 

NTIA’s  strategic  plan  includes  two  objectives  that  are  especially  relevant  to 
achieving a successful digital transition for all Americans. First, our consumer edu-
cation  resources  will  focus  on  households  that  rely  on  over-the-air  television.  Our 
research  indicates  these  households  are  on  average  more  likely  to  consist  of  rural 
residents,  minorities,  the  economically  disadvantaged,  seniors,  and  people  with  dis-
abilities. Therefore, our consumer education activities will target these groups. Sec-
ond,  our  efforts  will  leverage  resources  through  partnerships  to  maximize  engage-
ment  among  diverse  stakeholders.  I  have  enclosed  a  summary  of  NTIA’s  outreach 
activities to date, which illustrates some of our partnership activities. 

With  regard  to  your  request  that  NTIA  secure  commitments  from  the  broadcast 
community to begin running Public Service Announcements, NTIA has no statutory 
or  regulatory  authority  to  secure  such  commitments.  As  commercial  licensees, 
broadcasters  are  regulated  by  the  Federal  Communications  Commission.  However, 
NTIA  has  been  working  closely  with  the  DTV  Transition  Coalition.  In  a  July  letter 
to  Senate  Commerce  Committee  Chairman  Inouye,  the  National  Association  of 
Broadcasters  (NAB)  addressed  your  question  about  the  commitment  of  commercial 
broadcasting to produce and air PSAs informing the public about the digital transi-
tion. I would refer you to this letter for the NAB’s specific consumer education plan. 
In  particular,  the  NAB  has  committed  to  producing  four  to  six  on-air  announce-
ments  on  the  transition  and  is  exploring  how  to  best  use  ‘‘crawls’’—that  is,  DTV- 
related messages that scroll across television screens during programming—to alert 
consumers  to  the  transition.  Based  on  discussions  with  the  NAB,  it  is  my  under-
standing  that  these  announcements  will  begin  airing  this  fall,  before  NTIA  begins 
to accept consumers’ coupon requests on January 1, 2008. 

NTIA has produced and made available on its website a brochure about the Cou-
pon  Program,  which  we  distributed  to  every  member  of  the  Senate  and  House.  I 
would welcome Senators and other Members of Congress linking to this information 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

53 

on  their  websites.  This  brochure  is  available  in  English  and  Spanish  at  http:// 
www.ntia.doc.gov/dtvcoupon.  I  would  also  invite  you  and  your  staff  to  attend  and 
participate  in  NTIA’s  September  25,  2007,  DTV  Transition  Public  Meeting,  Expo 
and Networking Event, to be held at the U.S. Department of Commerce. This event 
will be an important opportunity to hear from industry CEOs and key constituency 
groups about their specific plans to inform consumers about the transition. 

I  look  forward  to  continuing  to  work  with  you  and  all  the  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee, and the U.S. Congress, on efforts to ensure a smooth digital television tran-
sition. If you have any questions, please contact me at (202) 482–1840. 

Sincerely, 

cc:  The  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye,  Chairman,  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science  and 

Assistant Secretary for Communications and Information. 

JOHN M.R. KNEUER, 

The  Hon.  Ted  Stevens,  Vice  Chairman,  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science  and 

Transportation, U.S. Senate 

Transportation, U.S. Senate 

The Hon. Kevin J. Martin, Chairman, Federal Communications Commission 

FACT SHEET ON NTIA’S OUTREACH ACTIVITIES DIGITAL-TO-ANALOG CONVERTER BOX 

COUPON PROGRAM 

ATTACHMENT 

As  of  August  23,  2007,  NTIA  is  actively  seeking  partnerships  with  over  145 
groups and organizations—including 14 Federal Government departments and agen-
cies and 5 local and state organizations—to work with us to raise consumer aware-
ness about the Coupon Program and to prepare our citizens for the transition. NTIA 
is focusing its consumer education activities on over-the-air-reliant households who, 
on  average,  are  more  likely  to  be  (1)  elderly;  (2)  economically  disadvantaged;  (3) 
rural residents; (4) minorities; and (5) people with disabilities. Some examples of our 
outreach include: 
Senior Outreach 

• NTIA  is  working  closely  with  AARP  to  ensure  that  the  Coupon  Program  will 
be highlighted in their publications and online newsletters, both in English and 
Spanish.  AARP  The  Magazine  reaches  22.5  million  members  and  AARP 
Segunda Jeventud reaches 400,000 members. 

• NTIA will partner with SeniorNet, an organization that supports about 200 sen-
ior learning centers across the country, to provide information about the Coupon 
Program to seniors through those centers. 

• During  the  recent  National  Cable  and  Telecommunications  Association  conven-
tion,  Assistant  Secretary  Kneuer  participated  on  a  panel  hosted  by  Retirement 
Living  TV  designed  to  raise  awareness  among  seniors  of  the  upcoming  digital 
transition. 

Economically Disadvantaged Outreach 

• NTIA  is  working  with  the  American  Library  Association  to  distribute  posters 
and coupon applications to participating libraries, and to train librarians to help 
its  patrons  apply  for  coupons.  For  consumers  without  home  Internet  access, 
NTIA will provide a link to be placed on library terminals that will enable con-
sumers to quickly go to the coupon application page and apply online. 

• Other  groups  NTIA  is  actively  recruiting  include  the  Salvation  Army,  United 

Way, YMCA, America’s Second Harvest, and Catholic Charities. 

• NTIA will work with the Community Action Partnership, the national organiza-
tion representing the interests of the 1,000 Community Action Agencies (CAAs) 
working to fight poverty at the local level. 

Minority Outreach 

• NTIA  has  reached  out  to  the  National  Congress  of  American  Indians,  the  Pan- 
Asian Council on Aging, Native American Council on Aging, The National Cau-
cus  and  Center  on  Black  Aging,  National  Council  on  Aging,  and  the  National 
Hispanic Council on Aging. 

• NTIA is exploring with Univision (with reach into 99 percent of Hispanic house-
holds)  the  development  of  Public  Service  Announcements  and  a  ‘‘how  to’’  video 
aimed at Hispanic consumers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

54 

• NTIA  is  partnering  with  the  Southeast  Asia  Resource  Action  Center  and 
Panasonic  to  produce  and  distribute  brochures  in  the  most  commonly  spoken 
Asian languages, including Chinese, Vietnamese, Tagalog, and Korean. 

Disabled Outreach 

• NTIA will meet the needs of citizens with special needs to enable them to take 
advantage  of  the  Coupon  Program.  For  example,  NTIA’s  Final  Rule  requires 
that manufacturers pass through Closed Captioning so that this service will be 
uninterrupted  with  the  installation  of  the  converter  box  and  the  transition  to 
all-digital broadcasting. NTIA will work with disability groups to allay concerns 
that  coupon-eligible  converters  will  not  pass  through  Closed  Captioning  to  dis-
play on existing analog televisions. 

• NTIA will continue to reach out to private and public organizations serving the 
home-bound  and  people  with  special  needs.  Organizations  that  provide  home 
health care, meals on wheels, senior day care, and other elder care services will 
be a particular target of our efforts. 

• NTIA  has  actively  sought  the  input  of  disability  groups  in  the  development  of 
its program, including the American Association of People with Disabilities, the 
Northern Virginia Resource Center for Deaf and Hard of Hearing Persons, and 
Easter  Seals.  NTIA  participated  in  the  Telecommunications  for  the  Deaf  and 
Hard of Hearing, Inc. (TDI) conference in San Francisco on August 24. 

Rural Outreach 

• NTIA  is  working  closely  with  the  Appalachian  Regional  Commission  (ARC)  to 
provide  information  packets  to  70  councils  of  government,  local  development 
districts representing 23 million people in 410 counties (42 percent rural). 
• In  October,  NTIA  will  actively  participate  in  the  Rural  Telecommunications 
• NTIA has reached to the U.S. Department of Agriculture Cooperative State Re-
search, Education, and Extension Service to distribute information to extension 
offices nationwide. 

Congress Conference in Springfield, Illinois. 

Government Outreach 

• NTIA will leverage relationships with government departments and agencies to 
reach constituencies they serve. NTIA will continue to expand its group of gov-
ernment contacts and expects to reach millions of households through these ini-
tiatives. 
• NTIA is partnering with departments and agencies to use their existing publica-
tions and electronic newsletters to insert coupon information in scheduled mail-
ings; link to the coupon application form from their websites; put coupon appli-
cations  at  local  social  service  offices;  talk  about  the  program  at  meetings  and 
conventions;  and  utilize  all  existing  communication  opportunities  to  inform 
them of the Coupon Program. 
• NTIA  has  reached  out  to  the  U.S.  Department  of  Agriculture  Food  Stamp  Pro-
gram,  Center  for  Medicare  &  Medicaid,  Social  Security  Administration,  Vet-
erans  Affairs,  Department  of  Education’s  Faith-Based  Office,  General  Services 
Administration,  Health  and  Human  Services  Administration  for  Children  & 
Families,  the  Administration  on  Aging,  IRS  and  its  Earned  Income  Tax  Credit 
section, the USDA’s Rural Development and Cooperative Extension, and the De-
partment of Defense. 
• NTIA is also reaching out to state and local organizations to reach people where 
they live and work. NTIA has initiated outreach relationships with the National 
Association  of  Counties,  National  League  of  Cities,  National  Council  of  State 
Legislatures, and the National Association of Regulatory Utility Commissioners. 

Publications, Meetings, and Conferences 

• Assistant Secretary Kneuer will be writing and submitting an article for publi-
cation  later  this  year  in  the  National  Association  of  Telecommunications  Offi-
cers  and  Advisors  (NATOA)  Journal:  Promoting  Community  Interests  in  Com-
munication, The National Education Association’s Today Magazine reaching 3.2 
million  readers,  and  the  American  Library  Association’s  American  Libraries. 
The article will be timed to reach consumers around January 1, 2008, when con-
sumers can begin to request converter coupons. 
• NTIA staff will continue to attend meetings and conferences over the next year 
spreading  the  word  of  the  transition  and  the  government  program  designed  to 
offset the cost of the converter boxes. For example, NTIA will attend the White 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

House  Faith-Based  and  Community  Initiatives  Conference  and  the  AARP  Con-
vention in September and other major conferences focused on our target groups. 

55 

Ease of Information and Application 

ish and other languages as appropriate. 

• Brochures, flyers, posters, and applications will be printed in English and Span-
• NTIA intends to make the application process as simple and straightforward as 
possible  for  consumers.  We  will  encourage  consumers  to  apply  over  the  phone 
using  a  toll-free  number,  but  they  will  also  have  the  option  to  use  the  Internet 
or mail or fax their applications. The actual coupon application will be straight-
forward and will be market tested to ensure it is understandable and consumer 
friendly. 
• NTIA  will  make  the  process  to  use  the  coupon  to  purchase  and  install  a  con-
verter box as simple as possible. NTIA will work with retailers to simplify their 
processes  and  encourage  retailers  to  accept  phone  orders  from  consumers  to 
meet the needs of the home-bound. NTIA will provide a list of retail outlets sell-
ing  the  converter  boxes,  including  online  retailers,  and  also  a  list  of  approved 
boxes that can be purchased with the coupon. 
• NTIA is working with the Consumer Electronics Association (CEA) to create an 
installation  video  and  quick  set-up  guide  to  help  seniors  set  up  the  converter 
as effortlessly as possible. 

CONSUMER ELECTRONICS ASSOCIATION 

Arlington, VA, July 26, 2007 

Hon. DANIEL INOUYE, 
Chairman, 
Committee on Commerce. Science, and 

Hon. TED STEVENS, 
Vice Chairman, 
Committee on Commerce, Science, and 

Transportation, 

Transportation, 

U.S. Senate, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Stevens and Members of the Committee: 

U.S. Senate, 
Washington, DC. 

Thank  you  for  holding  today’s  hearing  on  Preparing  Consumers  for  the  Digital 
Television  Transition.  The  Consumer  Electronics  Association  (CEA)  has  long  been 
committed  to  ensuring  that  consumers  are  informed  about  the  DTV  transition.  As 
the  transition  date  of  February  17,  2009  approaches,  CEA’s  tireless  efforts  to  edu-
cate  consumers  are  even  more  paramount  to  ensuring  a  seamless  transition.  Even 
as  we  are  less  than  2  years  away  from  the  transition  date,  we  continue  to  lead  the 
way with our efforts. 

Currently, CEA’s educational tools for retailers and consumers to use include: 
Five websites that promote the DTV transition through consumer and dealer edu-

cation: 

• myCEknowhow: www.myCEknowhow.com. To help consumers navigate the new 
features  and  options  made  available  by  digital  television.  the  CEA  and  CNET 
have  joined  forces  to  produce  interactive  CEknowhow  Buying  Guides.  The 
Guides, which can be found on CNET.com and the CEA’s consumer information 
site,  www.myCEknowhow.com.  are  designed  to  introduce  consumers  to  digital 
television and to ease confusion about the technology before shoppers even enter 
the store. Information regarding NTIA’s DTV converter box program also is in-
cluded in this program. 
• Antenna  Web:  www.antennaweb.org.  This  website  specifically  permits  con-
sumers and salespeople to determine the free, over-the-air DTV signals that can 
be  received  at  their  location  and  what  type  of  antenna  is  needed  to  do  so.  The 
site receives approximately 100,000 hits per month. 
• The  Connections  Guide  website  is  an  interactive  resource  designed  to  help  con-
sumers better understand how to connect their audio and video (including DTV) 
products. This site is located at: www.ce.org/connectionslapplication/. 
• CE  Know  How:  www.ceknowhow.com.  This  is  an  online  retailer  education  pro-
gram that is designed to equip retailers with up-to-date product category train-
ing  for  sales  associates.  CEknowhow.com  is  customizable,  allowing  retailers  to 
license and tailor the program to suit their particular needs. In 2004, more than 
24,000 sales persons completed training via CEknowhow.com. 

In addition to these websites, CEA includes a wealth of information about HDTV 
on its own website: www.ce.org/hdtv. In addition, CEA recently issued a DTV Tool-
kit  for  legislators.  The  Toolkit  contains  materials  for  answering  constituent  ques-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

56 

tions  about  the  transition.  All  of  the  materials  included  in  the  packet  are  available 
on CEA’s website: www.ce.org/hdtv. 

We have an ambitious schedule of additional consumer education education plans 
for  2007  include  producing  an  HDTV  Handbook  for  Retailers  and  Consumers  in 
partnership  with  Dealerscope  and  e-Gear.  We  also  are  developing  and  producing  a 
number  of  short  videos  for  use  on  various  websites  and  for  use  at  retail  locations. 
Video  topics  will  include  a  transition  overview,  setting  up  a  converter  box  and  how 
to receive HDTV. 

We are updating our Ceknowhow.com consumer website to include information on 
the  converter  box  coupon  program  and  DTV  labeling  information.  In  addition,  we 
are translating the website into Spanish. We are continuing our ongoing media out-
reach,  including  press  kits  mailing,  satellite  media  tours  and  matte  service  arti-
cles—in  English  and  Spanish.  As  part  of  this  outreach,  we  are  developing  public 
service  announcements  about  the  transition  and  the  coupon  program.  Further,  we 
are  reaching  out  to  local  government  officials  and  libraries  to  educate  about  the 
transition and where to send their constituents for more information. 

Finally,  CEA  is  exhibiting  at  a  myriad  of  relevant  conferences,  including  the  Na-
tional  Association  of  Consumer  Advocacy  Agencies  (NACAA),  National  Conference 
of State Legislatures (NCSL), and Digital Life in order to explain all aspects of the 
DTV transition and coupon program. 

We  appreciate  your  interest  and  support  regarding  DTV  education.  We  welcome 
the  Committee’s  use  of  our  materials  to  educate  constituents  and  welcome  the  op-
portunity to speak to your constituents at any time. 

It  is  critical  that  all  stakeholders  play  a  part  in  educating  consumers.  CEA  is 
working  closely  with  industry  and  government  partners  and  we  are  proud  of  our 
leadership role in the DTV Transition Coalition (www.dtvtransition.org). It would be 
extremely helpful for the Committee to ensure that all stakeholders are involved in 
reaching  out  to  our  Nation’s  consumers.  CEA  remains  steadfast  in  its  commitment 
to educate consumers about all aspects of the DTV transition. 

We respectfully request that this letter be submitted into the formal record of this 

today’s hearing. 
Sincerely, 

GARY SHAPIRO, 
President and CEO. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

HON. JOHN M.R. KNEUER 

Question  1.  Your  written  testimony  indicates  that  NTIA  will  not  award  the  con-
tract for administering the converter box coupon program until mid-August. Will the 
entity  awarded  the  contract  have  enough  time  to  establish  the  program  before  cou-
pons become available on January 1, 2008? 

Answer.  On  August  15,  NTIA  awarded  a  contract  to  IBM  to  provide  end-to-end 
services for the Coupon Program. NTIA and IBM will be open for business to accept 
coupon  requests  between  January  1,  2008  and  March  31,  2009.  At  that  time  con-
sumers  will  be  able  to  call  1–888–DTV–2009,  go  online  at  www.MyDTV2009.gov  or 
mail in their coupon applications to request their coupons. 

Question  2.  What  is  the  NTIA  doing  to  work  with  retail  outlets  to  ensure  that 

they will display converter boxes conspicuously? 

Answer.  NTIA  has  been  working  aggressively  to  recruit  retailers  of  all  sizes  into 
the  program.  Manufacturers  and  retailers  have  every  incentive  to  market  and 
merchandize  converter  boxes  just  as  they  do  their  other  products.  Manufacturers 
with  whom  we  have  spoken  plan  to  make  it  clear  on  the  converter  box  that  these 
are  coupon  eligible  devices  and  have  been  certified  by  the  government.  Retailers, 
such as Radio Shack, have committed to in-store signage that will inform consumers 
about  the  transition  and  the  benefits  of  the  converter  option.  Other  major  retailers 
who have expressed their intent to participate in the Coupon Program include Wal- 
Mart, Best Buy, and Circuit City. 

Question  3.  Are  you  confident  that  workable,  affordable  converter  boxes  will  be 

widely available on January 1, 2008? 

Answer. Yes. Retailers are ordering converters from manufacturers in order to be 
ready to serve consumers after the Holiday 2007 season. To date, NTIA has certified 
three  models  and  18  retailers.  Retailers  are  responsible  for  determining  when  con-
verters will be available in their stores. Indications are good that they will be ready 
to sell converters and redeem coupons in early 2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

57 

Question  4.  How  will  consumers  be  able  to  determine  which  retailers  carry  con-
verter  boxes,  especially  given  that  many  consumers  who  rely  on  over-the-air  broad-
casting may not have Internet access? 

Answer.  When  NTIA  mails  out  the  coupons,  we  will  include  an  enclosure  in  the 
mailing  with  important  information  about  the  Coupon  Program  including  a  list  of 
nearby certified retailers, linked to household zip code, as well as makes and models 
of  eligible  converter  boxes.  NTIA  will  also  provide  a  list  of  eligible  online  retailers. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

CATHERINE W. SEIDEL 

Question 1. How many analog-only televisions remain in retailers’ inventories? 
Answer.  The  Commission  does  not  have  estimates  of  the  number  of  analog-only 
televisions  currently  in  retailers’  inventories.  I  would  note,  however,  that  industry 
statistics indicate that shipments of analog-only television sets to retail outlets have 
declined  precipitously  in  recent  years.  For  example,  between  2005  and  2006,  the 
number  of  analog-only  televisions  shipped  to  retail  stores  dropped  from  20.43  mil-
lion sets to 10.79 million sets. In addition, industry estimates project that shipments 
of analog-only television sets this year will total 1.35 million. Further, we note that, 
the  Nation’s  largest  consumer  electronics  retailer,  Best  Buy,  recently  announced 
that  it  has  pulled  all  remaining  analog  television  products  from  store  shelves  and 
will  only  sell  digital  television  products.  See  http://bestbuymedia.tekgroup.com/ 
articleltext/101707l2DNRFCC.pdf. 

Question  2.  What  recourse  is  there  for  consumers  who  unwittingly  buy  analog- 

only televisions because labeling requirements have not been complied with? 

Answer.  The  Commission  is  devoting  significant  resources  to  enforcing  our  label-
ing  requirements.  We  are  doing  so  in  order  to  prevent  unwitting  consumers  from 
purchasing  analog  televisions.  With  respect  to  the  Commission’s  labeling  require-
ment,  the  Commission  has,  as  of  October  31,  2007,  inspected  nearly  1,325  retail 
stores  and  websites  and  issued  nearly  283  citations  notifying  retailers  of  violations 
for  failing  to  comply  with  our  requirements.  Because  retailers  are  not  licensees,  we 
must give them a citation prior to issuing a Notice of Apparent Liability (NAL). Cur-
rently  there  are  NALs  pending  against  fourteen  retailers  for  apparently  violating 
the  Commission’s  labeling  requirements.  These  fines,  in  the  aggregate,  total  nearly 
$4  million.  In  addition,  the  Enforcement  Bureau  has  issued  another  six  NALs  on 
delegated  authority.  It  is  my  hope  that  through  our  vigorous  enforcement  actions, 
retailers will take concrete actions to avoid consumer confusion as the digital transi-
tion draws near. 

Question 3. Is the FCC working with retailers to educate their salespeople on how 

to explain the digital transition to customers? 

Answer.  In  addition  to  television  broadcasters,  cable  and  satellite  providers,  and 
consumer  electronics  manufacturers,  retailers  can  play  an  important  role  in  edu-
cating consumers about the transition to digital broadcast television. For some time 
now,  the  Commission  has  been  working  with  the  Consumer  Electronics  Retailers 
Coalition (CERC) on educating members of the public about the DTV transition. In 
the  spring  of  2006,  the  FCC,  CERC,  and  the  Consumer  Electronics  Association 
(CEA) developed and disseminated a ‘‘Buying a Digital Television’’ tip sheet for con-
sumers.  Together  with  CERC  and  CEA,  we  are  in  the  process  of  updating  the  tip 
sheet with the latest information on DTV. Also, in June of 2007, the FCC and CERC 
developed  and  disseminated  a  join  ‘‘Retailer  Advisory  on  Mandatory  Labeling  of 
Consumer  Electronics  Products,’’  to  assist  in  educating  CERC  members  and  mem-
bers of the public on the Commission’s labeling requirements regarding sales of ana-
log-only  TVs  and  TV  equipment.  Additionally,  CERC  participated  in  the  Commis-
sion’s  recent  DTV  Consumer  Education  Workshop,  serving  on  a  panel  that  ad-
dressed  the  industry’s  role  in  the  transition.  Further,  in  July  and  August  of  2007, 
CERC  distributed  over  400  packets  of  FCC  DTV  information  at  retailer  events  and 
conferences. Finally, Chairman Martin recently circulated a draft Report and Order 
to  the  other  Commissioners  that,  if  adopted,  would  require  industry  participants  to 
implement a number of public outreach and education measures to help ensure that 
consumers  receive  timely  and  accurate  information  about  the  DTV  transition. 
Among  other  things,  the  Report  and  Order  contemplates  that  the  Commission  will 
work  closely  with  NTIA  to  ensure  that  retail  outlet  personnel  are  fully  trained  and 
that consumers have access to the information they need to make informed choices. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\75739.TXT JACKIE

